UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020
OR
☐TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ______________ to ______________
Commission file number 001-38769
Cigna Corporation
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
  
Delaware 82-4991898
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
900 Cottage Grove Road, Bloomfield, Connecticut 06002
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
(860) 226-6000
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which
registered
Common Stock, Par Value $0.01 CI New York Stock Exchange, Inc.
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
NONE
Indicate by check mark Yes No
•if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. ☒ ☐
•if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act ☐ ☒
•whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required
to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days☒ ☐
•whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to
Rule 405 of Regulation S-T  during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was
required to submit such files)☒☐
•whether the registrant is a lar ge accelerated filer , an accelerated filer , a non-accelerated filer , a smaller reporting company or an emer ging
growth company . See definitions of “lar ge accelerated filer ,” “accelerated filer ,” “smaller reporting company” and “emer ging growth
company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐
 Smaller reporting
company ☐Emer ging growth company
☐
•If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended
transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to
Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.☐  
•whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’ s assessment of the ef fectiveness of
its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by
the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report☒
•whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act) ☐ ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting stock held by non-af filiates of the registrant as of June 30, 2020 was approximately $ 68.9 billion.
As of January 31, 2021,  351,845,606  shares of the registrant’ s Common Stock were outstanding. 
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Part III of this Form 10-K incorporates by reference information from the registrant’ s definitive proxy statement related to the 2021 annual meeting
of shareholders.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
FREQUENTLY REQUESTED 10-K INFORMATION
 Page
Risk Factors 34
Executive Overview 53
Industry Developments and Other Matters 58
Liquidity and Capital Resources 60
Critical Accounting Estimates 65
Segment Information 138
Revenues by Product Type 142
  Page
Cautionary Statement  
PART I   
Item 1. Business 1
 Overview 1
 Evernorth 3
 U.S. Medical 10
 International Markets 15
 Group Disability and Other 17
Data, Analytics and Technology 19
 Investment Management 20
Human Capital Management 21
 Miscellaneous 22
 Regulation 22
Item 1A. Risk Factors 34
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 48
Item 2. Properties 48
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 48
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 48
Information about our Executive Officers 49
PART II    
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 50
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations (“MD&A”) 52
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 76
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 77
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 143
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 143
Item 9B.
 Other Information 143
 
PART III   
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance. 144
 A. Directors of the Registrant
 B. Executive Officers of the Registrant
 C. Code of Ethics and Other Corporate Governance Disclosures
 D. Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports
Item 11. Executive Compensation 144
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 145
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence. 145
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 145
    
PART IV    
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 146
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 155
Signatures 156
Index to Financial Statement Schedules FS-1
Exhibits
CAUTIONARY NOTE REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation
Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements are based on Cigna’s current expectations and projections about future trends,
events and uncertainties. These statements are not historical facts. Forward-looking statements may include, among others,
statements concerning future financial or operating performance, including our ability to deliver affordable, personalized and
innovative solutions for our customers and clients, including in light of the challenges presented by the COVID-19 pandemic; future
growth, business strategy, strategic or operational initiatives; economic, regulatory or competitive environments, particularly with
respect to the pace and extent of change in these areas; financing or capital deployment plans and amounts available for future
deployment; our prospects for growth in the coming years; strategic transactions; and other statements regarding Cigna’s future
beliefs, expectations, plans, intentions, liquidity, cash flows, financial condition or performance. You may identify forward-looking
statements by the use of words such as “believe,” “expect,” “plan,” “intend,” “anticipate,” “estimate,” “predict,” “potential,” “may,”
“should,” “will” or other words or expressions of similar meaning, although not all forward-looking statements contain such terms.
Forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties, both known and unknown, that could cause actual results to differ
materially from those expressed or implied in forward-looking statements. Such risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited
to: our ability to achieve our strategic and operational initiatives; our ability to adapt to changes in an evolving and rapidly changing
industry; the scale, scope and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic and its potential impact on our business, operating results, cash
flows or financial condition, our ability to compete effectively, differentiate our products and services from those of our competitors
and maintain or increase market share; price competition and other pressures that could compress our margins or result in premiums
that are insufficient to cover the cost of services delivered to our customers; the potential for actual claims to exceed our estimates
related to expected medical claims; our ability to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with physicians, hospitals, other
health service providers and with producers and consultants; our ability to maintain relationships with one or more key
pharmaceutical manufacturers or if payments made or discounts provided decline; changes in the pharmacy provider marketplace or
pharmacy networks; changes in drug pricing or industry pricing benchmarks; political, legal, operational, regulatory, economic and
other risks that could affect our multinational operations; risks related to strategic transactions and realization of the expected
benefits of such transactions, as well as integration difficulties or underperformance relative to expectations; dependence on success
of relationships with third parties; risk of significant disruption within our operations or among key suppliers or third parties; our
ability to invest in and properly maintain our information technology and other business systems; our ability to prevent or contain
effects of a potential cyberattack or other privacy or data security incident; potential liability in connection with managing medical
practices and operating pharmacies, onsite clinics and other types of medical facilities; the substantial level of government regulation
over our business and the potential effects of new laws or regulations or changes in existing laws or regulations; uncertainties
surrounding participation in government-sponsored programs such as Medicare; the outcome of litigation, regulatory audits,
investigations; compliance with applicable privacy, security and data laws, regulations and standards; potential failure of our
prevention, detection and control systems; unfavorable economic and market conditions, stock market or interest rate declines, risks
related to a downgrade in financial strength ratings of our insurance subsidiaries; the impact of our significant indebtedness and the
potential for further indebtedness in the future; unfavorable industry, economic or political conditions; credit risk related to our
reinsurers; as well as more specific risks and uncertainties discussed in Part I, Item 1A – Risk Factors and Part II, Item 7 –
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations of this Form 10-K and as described from
time to time in our future reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”).
You should not place undue reliance on forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date they are made, are not
guarantees of future performance or results, and are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict or
quantify. Cigna undertakes no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information,
future events or otherwise, except as may be required by law.
PART I
Item 1. BUSINESS
OVER VIEW
Cigna Corporation, together with its subsidiaries (either individually or collectively referred to as “Cigna,” the “Company,” “we,”
“our” or “us”) is a global health service organization.
 Our Purpose and Mission
To improve the health, well-being and peace of mind of those we serve 
 Our Strategy  
Champions for  affordable, pr edictable, and simple health car e
Making it af fordable:  We build on our leading, dif ferentiated position to lower the total cost of
care.
 Making it predictable:  We take the surprise out of the system and help people make informed
health care choices. 
 Making it simple:  We make it easier for the people we serve to get the care they need.  
Cigna is a global health services company uniquely capable of driving affordable, predictable, and simple health care, with expansive
and deep capabilities that accelerate our strategy to achieve our mission of improving health, well-being and peace of mind. Cigna’s
employees are champions for the people we serve and over the past decade, our focus has shifted to helping individuals and families
thrive by offering solutions to prevent and better manage health challenges. When sickness or disability do occur, we support our
customers by offering broad choices to help them best access high quality, affordable, whole person care. We see three primary ways
to help individuals maintain, improve or recover their physical or mental health: 1) behavioral and lifestyle changes – with more than
1,000 health coaches helping individuals set and meet health goals; 2) affordable, effective medication options – with access to our
leading pharmacy services improving health and driving affordability; and 3) targeted medical and surgical interventions – with a
clear and proven strategy around partnerships and value-based care quality programs, powered by data and analytics and aligned
incentives. We maximize use of evidence-based care, while delivering best-in-class service for our customers with acute and chronic
conditions through enhanced real-time insights across an expanded platform with industry-leading solutions to support care
decisions.
Our portfolio of offerings solves diverse challenges across the health care system. We offer a differentiated set of pharmacy, medical,
behavioral, dental and supplemental products and services, primarily through two brands: Cigna and Evernorth. Our capabilities
include: 1) a broad portfolio of solutions and services, some of which can be offered on a stand-alone basis; 2) integrated behavioral,
medical and pharmacy management solutions; 3) leading specialty pharmacy, clinical and care management expertise; and 4)
advanced analytics that help us engage more meaningfully with individuals, plan sponsors we serve and our provider partners.
We put medicine within reach for patients, and help providers improve access to prescription drugs, by making them more
affordable.
We work with key stakeholders across the health care system to improve health outcomes and patient satisfaction, increase efficiency
in drug distribution and manage costs of the pharmacy benefit.
In 2020 Cigna launched Evernorth, a new health services platform, and renamed the Health Services segment as Evernorth,
accordingly. Evernorth brings together our array of health services capabilities, as well as those from partners across the health care
system in pharmacy solutions, benefits management solutions, care solutions and intelligence solutions. Innovative products include:
Healthy Ways to Work, a broad suite of solutions to help health plans and employers move forward by addressing unique
challenges resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic; FamilyPath, a comprehensive fertility solution to reduce avoidable costs,
provide holistic care coordination and deliver more flexible options for individuals; and inMynd, a solution that helps clients and
customers better recognize, treat and support mental health conditions.SM
SM
SM
1
We present the financial results of our businesses in the following segments (see "Executive Overview" section of the MD&A
located in Part II, Item 7 of this Form 10-K for a Financial Summary):
Evernorth includes a broad range of coordinated and point solution health services, including pharmacy solutions, benefits
management solutions, care solutions and intelligence solutions, which are provided to health plans, employers, government
organizations and health care providers.
U.S. Medical includes Cigna’s U.S. Commercial and U.S. Government businesses that provide comprehensive medical and
coordinated solutions to clients and customers. U.S. Commercial products and services include medical, pharmacy, behavioral
health, dental, vision, health advocacy programs and other products and services for insured and self-insured customers. U.S.
Government solutions include Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and Medicare Part D plans for seniors, Medicaid plans,
and individual health insurance plans both on and off the public exchanges.
International Markets includes supplemental health, life and accident insurance products and health care coverage in our
international markets as well as health care benefits to globally mobile employees of multinational organizations.
Group Disability and Other contains the remainder of our business operations, consisting of the following:
•Group Disability and Life provides group long-term and short-term disability, group life, accident, voluntary and specialty
insurance products and related services. The sale of this business to New York Life was completed on December 31, 2020.
The transaction with New York Life included the sale of our businesses offering group long-term and short-term disability,
group life, accident, and specialty insurance products and related services. Our business that offers group voluntary products
and services was not sold to New York Life and results of this business will be reported in the U.S. Medical segment
beginning in the first quarter of 2021. See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and Liquidity section of the
MD&A for additional information on the impacts of this sale on our results of operations, liquidity and financial position.
•Corporate-Owned Life Insurance (“COLI”) offers permanent insurance contracts sold to corporations to provide coverage
on the lives of certain employees for financing employer-paid future benefit obligations.
•Run-off businesses:
•Reinsurance: predominantly comprised of guaranteed minimum death benefit (“GMDB”) and guaranteed
minimum income benefit (“GMIB”) business effectively exited through reinsurance with Berkshire Hathaway Life
Insurance Company of Nebraska (“Berkshire”) in 2013.
•Settlement Annuity business in run-off.
•Individual Life Insurance and Annuity and Retirement Benefits Businesses: comprised of deferred gains from
the sales of these businesses.
In 2020, our business was impacted by the emergence and unprecedented global spread of the novel strain of coronavirus ("COVID-
19"). COVID-19 was declared a pandemic by the World Health Organization in March 2020 because the virus had surfaced in nearly
all regions around the world. The COVID-19 pandemic has pervasively impacted the economy, financial markets and the global
health care delivery systems. Cigna’s COVID-19 response actions focused on customer care, employee care and safety, as well as
support for the medical community and execution of business continuity plans over our operations. COVID-19 continues to spread
and we are actively managing our response and assessing impacts to our financial position and operating results, as well as adverse
developments in our business. While it is difficult to predict the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our results beyond 2020, we
believe that such results may be impacted by, among other things, higher medical costs to treat those affected by the virus, lower
customer volumes due to rising unemployment, lower future risk adjustment revenue due to disrupted care impeding appropriate
documentation of customer risk profiles in our Medicare Advantage business, the return of costs for those who had previously
deferred care, vaccine costs, continued cost share waivers, the potential for continued deferral of care, or lower investment returns.
Additionally, in response to the pandemic, U.S. federal and state governments have enacted new regulatory requirements as
discussed in the "Business - Regulation" section of this Form 10-K.
Other Information
The financial information included in this Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020 is in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America (“GAAP”) unless otherwise indicated. In the segment discussions that
follow, we use the terms “adjusted revenues” and “pre-tax adjusted income from operations” to describe segment results. See the
introduction to the Management Discussion and Analysis section of this Form 10-K for definitions of those terms. Industry rankings
and percentages set forth herein are for the year ended December 31, 2020 unless otherwise indicated. In addition, statements set
forth in this document concerning our rank or position in an industry or particular line of business have been developed internally
based on publicly available information unless otherwise noted.
2
Cigna Holding Company (formerly Cigna Corporation) was incorporated in Delaware in 1981. Halfmoon Parent, Inc. was
incorporated in Delaware in March 2018. Halfmoon Parent, Inc. was renamed Cigna Corporation and Cigna Holding Company
became its subsidiary concurrent with the consummation of the combination with Express Scripts on December 20, 2018.
You can access our website at http://www.cigna.com to learn more about our company. We make annual, quarterly and current
reports and proxy statements and amendments to those reports available, free of charge through our website (http://www.cigna.com,
under the “Investors—Quarterly Reports and SEC Filings” captions) as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file
these materials with, or furnish them to, the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”). We also use our website as a means of
disclosing material information and for complying with our disclosure obligations under the SEC’s Regulation FD (Fair Disclosure).
Important information, including news releases, analyst presentations and financial information regarding Cigna is routinely posted
on and accessible at http://www.cigna.com. Accordingly, investors should monitor the Investor Relations portion of our website, in
addition to following our press releases, SEC filings and public conference calls and webcasts. The information contained on, or that
may be accessed through, our website is neither incorporated by reference into nor a part of this report. See also “Code of Ethics and
Other Corporate Governance Disclosures” in Part III, Item 10 of this Form 10-K for additional information regarding the availability
of our Codes of Ethics on our website.
EVERNOR TH
Evernorth brings together coordinated and point solution health services including pharmacy solutions, benefits management
solutions, care solutions and intelligence solutions, and specialized expertise – from inside and outside the company – to deliver
custom and flexible solutions that meet the needs of our clients and customers. In 2020, Evernorth reported adjusted revenues of
$116.1 billion and pre-tax adjusted income from operations of $5.4 billion.
HOW WE WIN
Evernorth accelerates delivery of innovative and flexible solutions to create value and meet the diverse needs of health plans,
employers, health care providers and government organizations by:
·Partnering in unconventional ways to solve complex problems across a fragmented health care ecosystem, fueled by connected
data and expertise that drives purposeful innovation
·Creating flexible and focused solutions tailored to client needs, using Evernorth's combined strengths and capabilities, as well
as strategic partnerships, to deliver: better, more efficient care for patients; better experiences for clients, providers and
customers; and enhanced choices for clients and customers through our open architecture model
·Evaluating medicines, digital therapeutics and other health solutions for efficacy, adherence, value and price to assist clients in
selecting a cost-effective formulary
·Offering home delivery and specialty customer-centric solutions that meet the needs of our clients and customers in ways that
unlock greater value and better health services while providing better and specialized clinical care
·Aggregating purchasing volume to deliver discounts and drive risk-sharing and value-based care across the pharmaceutical
supply chain
·Promoting the use of generics and lowest-cost, clinically effective brands of medications
3
The following chart depicts a high-level summary of our principal products and services in this segment with definitions on
subsequent pages.
Principal Products & ServicesBrands/
SubsidiariesKey Relationships Primary Competitors
Pharmacy Solutions Express Scripts Pharmacy , Accredo ,
Freedom Fertility Pharmacy ,
Therapeutic Resource CenterClients, Customers, Health
Care ProvidersIndependent Pharmacy Benefit
Managers (“PBMs”), Managed
Care PBMs, Retail Pharmacies,
Specialty Pharmacies
Benefits
Management
SolutionsPharmacy and
Medical Benefits
ManagementeviCore Healthcare , Express Scripts
PBM, myMatrixx®, Care
Continuum , Evernorth Embarc
Benefit Protection , Evernorth
FamilyPathClients, Customers, Health
Care Providers, Consultants,
Health Plans, Commercial and
Government PayorsHealth Plans, Independent
PBMs, Managed Care PBMs,
Third-Party Benefit
Administrators, Group
Purchasing Or ganizations,
Clinical Solutions and Health
Care Data Analytics Companies
Supply Chain
Administration
and Network
ManagementValue Based Programs (Express
Scripts SafeGuardRx , Patient
Assurance ), National Preferred
Formulary , SaveOnSP , Express
Scripts MedRx Management ,
Express Scripts Parachute Rx ,
Ascent Health Services, Econdisc,
Inside RxClients, Self-paying customers
(InsideRx only), Pharmacy
ProvidersHealth Plans, Independent
PBMs, Managed Care PBMs,
Third Party Benefit
Administrators, Group
Purchasing Or ganizations
Care SolutionsEvernorth Healthy Ways to Work ,
inMynd , Health Connect 360 ,
Evernorth Digital Health
Formulary , Advanced Utilization
Management, Enhanced Fraud, Waste
& Abuse, Advanced Opioid
Management , ScreenRx ,
Behavioral HealthClients, CustomersIndependent PBMs, Managed
Care PBMs, Third-Party Benefit
Administrators
Evernorth Intelligence SolutionsExpress Scripts Lab, RationalMed ,
MediCUBE , Express Scripts
ScriptV isionHealth Care Providers, ClientsHealth Care Data Analytics
Companies
Provider Services CuraScript SDHealth Care Providers,
Clinics, HospitalsSpecialty Drug Distributors
Principal Pr oducts & Services
•Pharmacy Solutions: The pharmacy operations consist of ten order processing pharmacies, five patient contact centers, 26
specialty branch pharmacies and 11 high-volume automated home delivery and specialty dispensing pharmacies located
throughout the United States. Dispensing pharmacies are located in Arizona, Delaware, Florida, Indiana, Massachusetts,
Missouri, New Jersey, Pennsylvania and Tennessee.
◦Express Scripts Pharmacy: Express Scripts Pharmacy dispenses approximately 1.5 billion adjusted prescriptionsannually
to members of pharmacy plans managed by our Express Scripts PBM. The service offers free standard shipping of
maintenance medications nationwide, usually in a 90-day supply, directly to the customer's home. The service allows for
automatic refills on eligible medications and unrestricted telephone access to specially trained pharmacists who can help
answer customer questions. The front-end of our pharmacy is organized in Therapeutic Resource Centers, where specialized
pharmacists focus their practice of pharmacy by condition, which offers customers a more personalized experience, while
providing enhanced clinical care. Our differentiated practice of pharmacy, coupled with our advanced automated dispensing
technology, results in safer and more accurate pharmacy operations when compared to retail pharmacies, convenient access
to maintenance medications and better management of our clients' drug costs through operating efficiencies and generic
substitutions. Our research shows that Express Scripts Pharmacy achieves a higher level of therapeutic interventions, better
adherence and cost savings than is achieved through retail pharmacy networks.
◦Specialty Pharmacy Services: Specialty medications are primarily characterized as high-cost medications for the treatment
of complex and rare diseases. These medications broadly include those with frequent dosing adjustments, intensive clinical
monitoring, the need for customer training, specialized product administration requirements or medications limited to
certain
 Non-specialty network scripts filled through 90-day programs and home delivery scripts are multiplied by three. All other network and specialty scripts are counted
as one script.®
®,®
®
®
SM
SM
®
SM
SM
SM
®
SM
SM SM
SM
® ®
®
®
SM
®
(1) 
(1)
4
specialty pharmacy networks by manufacturers. Through a combination of assets and capabilities, we provide an enhanced
level of predictable care and therapy management for customers taking specialty medications, increased visibility and
improved outcomes for payors, and custom programs for biopharmaceutical manufacturers. Accredo is focused on
dispensing injectable, infused, oral and inhaled drugs that require a higher level of clinical service and support than
traditional pharmacies typically offer. Accredo supports successful outcomes for customers and reduces waste for clients
through specialty trained clinicians, a nationwide footprint and a network of in-home nursing services, reimbursement and
customer assistance programs and biopharmaceutical services. Drug manufacturers occasionally select Accredo for
exclusive dispensing of a highly specialized therapy. Freedom Fertility Pharmacy is dedicated exclusively to supporting
patients undergoing fertility treatment. Accredo and Freedom Fertility Pharmacy serve customers within a pharmacy benefit
plan administered by Express Scripts PBM, as well as customers in a plan administered by other PBMs and health plans.
•Benefits Management Solutions: We drive high-quality, cost-effective care through prescription drug utilization and cost
management services. We support our clients' plan design selections to deliver balanced affordability, choice, simplicity and
convenience. We focus our solutions to align with our clients' service, care and cost management needs. As a result, we believe
we deliver better outcomes, higher customer satisfaction and a more affordable prescription drug benefit. We process drug
claims via Express Scripts Pharmacy, Accredo and our retail networks by integrating retail network pharmacy administration,
benefit design consultation, drug utilization review, drug formulary management and pharmacy fulfillment services. We
administer payments to retail networks and bill benefits costs to our clients through our end-to-end adjudication services.
◦Drug Utilization Review program: When pharmacies submit claims for prescription drugs to us, we review them
electronically in real time for health and safety. We then alert the dispensing pharmacy of any detected issues. Clients may
also choose to enroll in programs that result in communications about potential therapy concerns being sent to prescribers
after the initial claim submission.
◦Benefits Design Consultation: We consult with our clients on how best to structure and leverage the pharmacy benefit to
meet plan objectives for affordable access to the prescription medications customers need to stay healthy, and ensure the
safe and effective use of those medications.
◦myMatrixx: myMatrixx is a unique PBM with an exclusive focus on workers' compensation. We combine high touch
customer service with clinical expertise and state-of-the-art business intelligence systems to deliver simplified solutions and
positive outcomes. myMatrixx leverages Express Scripts' robust pharmacy network and provides a smooth and personalized
experience for clients and injured workers.
◦eviCore Medical Benefits Management: eviCore healthcare is a leading provider of integrated health benefit management
solutions that focus on driving adherence to evidence-based clinical guidelines, improving the quality of patient outcomes
and reducing the cost of care. eviCore provides technology-enabled managed solutions in clinical diagnostic areas such as
advanced imaging, cardiology and gastroenterology, as well as in whole person (longitudinal) areas such as
musculoskeletal, oncology, fertility and post-acute care. eviCore contracts with health plans and other commercial and
government payors to promote the appropriate use of health care services by the customers they serve. In certain instances,
this occurs through capitated risk arrangements, when we assume the financial obligation for the cost of health care services
provided to eligible customers covered by eviCore health care management programs.
◦Medical Drug Management: We offer a comprehensive range of services and guaranteed savings for managing medically
billed specialty drugs. Our solutions apply utilization management, site of care management and claims prepayment review
to effectively reduce wasteful spend, while providing services tailored to customers ensuring safety and healthier outcomes.
We also offer MedRx, a suite of solutions and consultative services for medical rebates contracting, and medically-billed
drug preferencing and value-based contracting.
•Supply Chain Administration and Network Management:
◦Retail Network Pharmacy Administration: We contract with retail pharmacies to provide prescription drugs to customers of
the pharmacy benefit plans we manage. We negotiate with pharmacies throughout the United States to discount drug prices
provided to customers and manage national and regional networks responsive to client preferences related to cost
containment, convenience of access for customers and network performance. We also manage networks of pharmacies
customized for or under direct contract with specific clients and have contracted with pharmacy provider networks to
comply with the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services (“CMS”) access requirements for the federal Medicare Part D
prescription drug program (“Medicare Part D”). All retail pharmacies in our network communicate with us online and in
real-time to process prescription drug claims. When a plan customer presents their identification card at a network
pharmacy, the pharmacy sends specific customer, prescriber and prescription information in an industry-standard format
through our systems, which process the claim and respond to the pharmacy with relevant information to process the
prescription.
◦Drug Formulary Management: Formularies are lists of drugs with designations that may be used to determine drug
coverage, customer out-of-pocket costs and communicate plan preferences in competitive drug categories. Our formulary
management services support clients in establishing formularies that assist customers and physicians in choosing clinically-(SM)
5
appropriate, cost-effective drugs and prioritize access, safety and affordability. We administer specific formularies on behalf
of our clients, including standard formularies developed and offered by Express Scripts and custom formularies in which we
play a more limited role. Most of our clients select standard formularies, governed by our National Pharmacy &
Therapeutics Committee, which is comprised of a panel of independent physicians and pharmacists in active clinical
practice representing a variety of specialties and practice settings, typically with major academic affiliations. In making
formulary recommendations, this committee considers only the drug’s safety and efficacy and not the cost of the drug,
including any negotiated manufacturer discount or rebate arrangement. This process is designed to ensure the clinical
recommendation is not affected by our financial arrangements. We fully comply with this committee’s clinical
recommendations regarding drugs that must be included or excluded from the formulary based on their assessment of safety
and efficacy.
◦Administration of Group Purchasing Organizations: Express Scripts operates various group purchasing organizations that
negotiate pricing for the purchase of pharmaceuticals, fees and formulary rebates with pharmaceutical manufacturers on
behalf of their participants. They also provide various administrative services to their participants including management
and reporting.
◦Copay Solutions: Our first-to-market innovative copay solutions helps patients afford their medications, protect plan design
preferences and achieve lower trend. In partnership with SaveOnSP on the first non-essential health benefits copay
assistance solution, we've driven significant savings by targeting high-cost, high-volume drugs. SaveOnSP recommends
plan-design and coverage changes for certain drugs, enabling maximum savings and reducing plan and client costs. As
manufacturer programs and regulations change, this aggressive solution adapts, delivering lower specialty plan cost and
enhanced customer support.
◦Inside Rx: Inside Rx is a prescription medication savings program that offers eligible customers with discounts on many
brand and generic medications for self-paying customers. This program is not insurance but offers savings at more than
60,000 participating retail pharmacies (including all major chains) in the United States and Puerto Rico. The program also
offers discounts on prescription medications for pets. Inside Rx earns a small fee from our supply chain partners every time
a customer fills a prescription via the program. This lets us provide access to our savings card at no cost to the customer.
◦Express Scripts Parachute Rx: Express Scripts Parachute Rx is a prescription discount program administered by Inside Rx
to assist Americans who are newly uninsured as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic by providing access to affordable and
predictable prices on select generic and brand-name medications. The program is not insurance but offers discounts on
certain prescription medications for uninsured customers. Express Scripts created this limited-time program through its
close partnerships with manufacturers and retail pharmacies across the country.
◦Value-Based Programs:
▪Express Scripts SafeGuardRx: We offer a solution platform aimed at therapy classes that pose budgetary threats
and clinical challenges to customers. Our solutions are designed to keep our clients ahead of the drug cost curve
while providing customers the personalized care and access they need. These solutions are offered throughout our
pharmacy benefit management services and include, but are not limited to care for: cardiovascular, diabetes,
hepatitis, inflammatory conditions, neurological, multiple sclerosis, oncology, pulmonary and rare conditions.
Innovative programs, such as SafeGuardRx, combine utilization management, formulary management, specialized
care from our Therapeutic Resource Centers and financial savings, to help us to change the market in key
categories. These services optimize the safe and appropriate dispensing of therapeutic agents, minimize waste and
improve clinical and financial outcomes. Through these services, specialist pharmacists provide the expert,
personalized care that customers increasingly demand.
▪Patient Assurance Program: This program addresses the need for greater affordability and access to medications
by providing a fixed out-of-pocket cost to customers in non-government funded benefit plans.
•Care Solutions: We offer clinical programs to help our clients drive better whole-person health outcomes at a lower cost by
identifying and addressing potentially unsafe or wasteful prescribing, dispensing and use of prescription drugs and
communicating with, or supporting communications with, physicians, pharmacies and customers.
◦Through our Healthy Ways to Work initiative, we're helping our partners and their employees navigate COVID-19 with a
suite of agile solutions focused on helping people return to a healthy, safe and productive workplace, including digital and
onsite support, population health and clinical care and resiliency development to help people cope with change.
◦Our inMynd mental health solution provides access to expert guidance and support for anxiety, depression and insomnia,
including access to individualized support and resources, condition-specific care through our Neuroscience Therapeutic
Resource Centers and a new digital Cognitive Behavioral Therapy program.
◦Health Connect 360 is a transformational, outcomes based, clinical management model that bridges pharmacy, medical, lab
and customer engagement data to develop insights and deliver personalized health care clinical support. Clinical outcomes
and quality metrics are tailored to meet client needs.
6
◦Through the Evernorth Digital Health Formulary, we evaluate, procure, implement and manage digital health solutions on
behalf of clients, alleviating administrative burden and ensuring clinical effectiveness, data security, user-friendly
experiences and financial value.
◦Advanced Utilization Management programs are the number-one tool for decreasing client spend on pharmacy. These
include prior authorization, drug quantity management and step therapy.
◦Enhanced Fraud, Waste & Abuse helps plan sponsors identify potential problem customers and prescribers with unusual or
excessive utilization patterns. The program is designed to help identify outliers and situations of abnormal use or
prescribing patterns by analyzing types of prescriptions, refill patterns and pharmacy utilization.
◦Embarc Benefit Protection shields members from the high costs of life-saving gene therapies, so that customers who need
treatment can get it, through financial protection for high-cost therapies, access to quality, cost-effective in-network
providers and support from a dedicated gene therapy case management team.
◦FamilyPath is raising the bar for fertility health by providing more comprehensive, more flexible coverage and proactive
care for growing families, including expanded medical and pharmacy benefit management; access to vetted provider and lab
networks; and dedicated Fertility Advisors to proactively support and guide patients.
•Evernorth Intelligence Solutions: By bringing together world-class talent, multi-disciplinary expertise and advanced data and
analytics, we unlock actionable insights to help drive greater predictability, affordability and simplicity. We work together with
our clients and partners to create dynamic solutions, services and platforms that guide better decisions and improved
performance (see "Business - Data, Analytics, and Technology" section of this Form 10-K for further information).
◦Evernorth Labs: We accelerate innovation through increased collaboration with clients, customers and partners to develop
solutions for launch in their businesses. With our Labs, which are state-of-the-art research facilities and shared spaces for
collaboration, ideation and innovation, we gather with our clients and industry leaders to solve the toughest challenges in
the health care system, including: better managing the most complex and expensive disease states, such as oncology;
improving care access and delivery, such as worksite, home and virtual care; and planning for emerging trends, such as
artificial intelligence, and industry disruptors, such as COVID-19.
◦Data, advanced analytics and platforms: We use advanced predictive modeling to shape solutions that help decrease
healthcare fragmentation, drive optimized care coordination, reduce key cost drivers and improve health outcomes. In-depth
trend analysis helps us to identify and effectively address challenges like opioid abuse, COVID-19 and other emerging
health crises. We use market surveillance and forecasting to pinpoint and proactively address cost drivers. Our platform
strategy as a service gives clients the tools to build successful businesses in a flexible, customizable way: Trend Central
provides access to key performance indicators to help plan sponsors reduce costs and work towards healthier outcomes;
HealthPredict produces high patient-level risk scores, to show the highest value opportunities for proactive intervention;
MediCUBE gives our academic detailing pharmacists the analytical power to identify ways to save plans from significant
unnecessary spend and improve quality metrics; RationalMed improves patient health and safety by integrating medical,
pharmacy and laboratory claims data to initiate changes and correct errors in care, lowering both medical and prescription
drug costs; and ScriptVision provides a suite of real-time, data-driven capabilities that empower physicians to make the best
prescribing choices, including ePrescribing (including controlled substances), real-time prescription benefit information,
electronic prior authorizations, clinical care messages such as drug interactions and high-risk medication alerts and data on
and patient adherence rates.
•Provider Services: CuraScript SD is a specialty distributor of pharmaceuticals and medical supplies (including injectable and
infusible pharmaceuticals and medications to treat specialty and rare or orphan diseases) directly to health care providers, clinics
and hospitals in the United States for office or clinic administration. Through this business, we provide distribution services
primarily to office and clinic-based physicians who treat customers with chronic diseases and regularly order costly specialty
pharmaceuticals. This business provides competitive pricing on pharmaceuticals and medical supplies, operates three
distribution centers and ships most products overnight within the United States; it also provides distribution capabilities to
Puerto Rico and Guam. It is a contracted supplier with most major group purchasing organizations and leverages our distribution
platform to operate as a third-party logistics provider for several pharmaceutical companies.
Customers
Our customers in the Evernorth segment include clients and patients, as described below, along with a description of our current and
former significant clients:
•Clients: We provide services to managed care organizations, health insurers, third-party administrators, employers, union-
sponsored benefit plans, workers’ compensation plans, government health programs, providers, clinics, hospitals and others. We
provide services to a majority of customers in our U.S. Medical segment.®
SM
7
•Patients: Prescription drugs are dispensed to patients connected to the service offerings we provide to clients. Prescription drugs
are dispensed primarily through networks of retail pharmacies under non-exclusive contracts with us and via home delivery
from Express Scripts Pharmacy and specialty drug fulfillment pharmacies.
The Department of Defense TRICARE Pharmacy Program is the military health care program serving active-duty service
customers, National Guard and Reserve customers and retirees, as well as their dependents. Under this contract, we provide online
claims adjudication, home delivery services, specialty pharmacy clinical services, claims processing and contact center support and
other services critical to managing pharmacy trend. In 2020 and 2019, revenues from this contract were significant to the segment.
In 2019, Express Scripts and Prime Therapeutics LLC (“Prime”) entered into an agreement effective on April 1, 2020 which is
delivering improved choice and affordability for Prime’s clients and their patients by enhancing retail pharmacy networks and
pharmaceutical manufacturer value. In 2021, the relationship with Prime was expanded to include the option for Prime’s plans to
access the Accredo specialty pharmacy and Express Scripts home delivery in-network pharmacies.
On January 30, 2019, Anthem, Inc. (“Anthem”), a former customer, exercised its right to early termination of its pharmacy benefit
management services agreement, effective March 1, 2019. As of December 31, 2019, the transition of customers was substantially
complete. For further discussion of our Anthem relationship, see the “Executive Summary – Key Transactions and Business
Developments” section of our MD&A located in Part II, Item 7 of this Form 10-K.
Competition
The health care industry has undergone periods of substantial consolidation and may continue to consolidate in the future. We
believe the primary competitive factors in the industry include the ability to: negotiate with retail pharmacies to ensure our retail
pharmacy networks meet the needs of our clients and customers; provide home delivery and specialty pharmacy services; negotiate
discounts and rebates on prescription drugs with drug manufacturers; navigate the complexities of government-reimbursed business
including Medicare, Medicaid and the public exchanges; manage cost and quality of specialty drugs; use the information we obtain
about drug utilization patterns and consumer behavior to reduce costs for our clients and customers and the level of service we
provide.
•Managed Care PBMs: CVS Caremark (owned by CVS Health Corporation), Humana, IngenioRx (owned by Anthem),
OptumRx (owned by UnitedHealth Group Inc.) and Prime Therapeutics (owned by a collection of Blue Cross / Blue Shield
Plans) compete with us on a variety of products and in various regions throughout the United States.
•Independent PBMs: MedImpact, Navitus Health Solutions, Elixir (owned by Rite Aid Corporation) and many other regional
PBMs compete with us on a variety of products across the United States.
•Pharmacies: CVS, Walgreens Boots Alliance, Inc., WalMart, Inc., Rite Aid, Kroger and other independent pharmacies compete
with us for the delivery of prescription drug needs to our customers. In addition, many PBMs own and operate home delivery
and specialty pharmacies including CVS, OptumRx, Walgreens, Humana and Elixir. New entrants continue to emerge including
Amazon Pharmacy, Capsule and Hims.
•Third-Party Benefits Administrators: Third parties that specialize in claim adjudication and benefit administration, such as
SS&C Health, are direct competitors. With the emergence of alternative benefit models through Private Exchanges, the
competitive landscape also includes brokers, health plans and consultants. Some of these competitors may deploy greater
financial, marketing and technological resources than we do and new market entrants, including strategic alliances aimed at
modifying the current health care delivery models or entering the prescription drug sector from another sector of the health care
industry, may increase competition as barriers to entry are relatively low. For example, GoodRx is a new entrant focused on
serving the uninsured and underinsured in the cash pay pharmacy administration space.
•Clinical Solutions and Health Care Data Analytics Companies: Optum (owned by UnitedHealth Group Inc.), Anthem, Magellan
Health, HealthHelp, Cotiviti and Inovalon are among the companies that compete with us in this market.
Operations
•Sales and Account Management: Our sales and account management teams market and sell pharmacy benefit management
solutions and are supported by client service representatives, clinical pharmacy managers and benefit analysis consultants. These
teams work with clients to develop innovative strategies that put medicine within reach of customers while helping health
benefit providers improve access to and affordability of prescription drugs.
•Supply Chain: Our supply chain contracting and strategy teams negotiate and manage pharmacy retail network contracts,
pharmaceutical and wholesaler purchasing contracts and manufacturer rebate contracts. As our clients continue to experience
increased cost trends, our supply chain teams develop innovative solutions such as our SafeGuardRx platform and preferred
pharmacy networks to combat these cost increases. In addition, our Formulary Consulting team, consisting of pharmacists and®
8
financial analysts, provides services to our clients to support formulary decisions, benefit design consultation and utilization
management programs.
•Clinical Support: Our staff of highly trained health care professionals provides clinical support for our medical, behavioral and
pharmacy customers. Our services include:
◦Case management support for our customers through the continuum of health care – from inpatient hospitalization to at
home care – as well as health coaching and on-site coaching
◦Condition-specific specialized customer care through our Therapeutic Resource Center facilities staffed with specialist
pharmacists, nurses and other clinicians
◦Clinical development and operational support for our pharmacy benefit management services by our clinical solutions
staff of pharmacists and physicians who conduct a wide range of activities including: identifying emerging medication-
related safety issues and alerting physicians, clients and customers (as appropriate); providing drug information
services; managing formulary; and developing utilization management, safety (drug utilization review) and other
clinical interventions
Suppliers
We maintain an inventory of brand-name and generic pharmaceuticals in our home delivery and specialty pharmacies. Our specialty
pharmacies also carry biopharmaceutical products to meet the needs of our customers, including pharmaceuticals for the treatment of
rare or chronic diseases; if a drug is not in our inventory, we can generally obtain it from a supplier within a reasonable amount of
time.
We purchase pharmaceuticals either directly from manufacturers or through authorized wholesalers. Evernorth uses one wholesaler
more than others in the industry, but holds contracts with other wholesalers if needs for an alternate source arise. Generic
pharmaceuticals are generally purchased directly from manufacturers.
Industry Developments
See the “Industry Developments” section of the MD&A located in Part II, Item 7 of this Form 10-K for discussion of key industry
developments impacting this segment.
Intellectual Property Rights
The trademarks and service marks covering products, services and businesses provided under the Evernorth segment include, but are
not limited to, the following: EXPRESS SCRIPTS, EVERNORTH, EVERNORTH HEALTH, MEDCO, ACCREDO,
CURASCRIPTSD, MYMATRIXX, EVICORE HEALTHCARE, FREEDOM FERTILITY PHARMACY, CARE
CONTINUUM, RATIONALMED, SCREENRX, EXPRESSALLIANCE, EVERNORTH DIGITAL HEALTH
FORMULARY, THERAPEUTIC RESOURCE CENTER, ADVANCED OPIOID MANAGEMENT, SAFEGUARDRX, HIV
CARE VALUE, RARE CONDITIONS CARE VALUE, NEUROLOGICAL CARE VALUE, CARDIOVASCULAR CARE
VALUE, HEPATITIS CURE VALUE, MARKET EVENTS PROTECTION, ONCOLOGY CARE VALUE, DIABETES
CARE VALUE, INFLAMMATORY CONDITIONS CARE VALUE, INFLATION PROTECTION, PULMONARY CARE
VALUE, MULTIPLE SCLEROSIS CARE VALUE, MIGRAINE CARE VALUE, CHOLESTEROL CARE VALUE,
HEALTH CONNECT 360, EMBARC BENEFIT PROTECTION, INMYND, EXPRESS SCRIPTS PATIENT
ASSURANCE, MEDICUBE, EXPRESS SCRIPTS PHARMACY, FAMILYPATH, SCRIPTVISION, HEALTHY WAYS
TO WORK and INSIDE RX. We, or our affiliated companies, own trademarks and trademark registrations for these and other
company marks.
We also hold a portfolio of patents and pending patent applications. We are not substantially dependent on any single patent or group
of related patents.® SM SM ® ®
® ® ® ®
® ® ® ®
SM ® ® ®
SM ® SM
SM ® SM SM
SM SM SM
® SM SM SM
SM SM SM
SM ® ® SM SM
SM ®
9
U.S. MEDICAL
U.S. Medical includes Cigna’s U.S. Commercial and U.S. Government businesses that provide comprehensive medical and
coordinated solutions to clients and customers. U.S. Commercial products and services include medical, pharmacy, behavioral
health, dental, vision, health advocacy programs and other products and services for insured and self-insured customers. U.S.
Government solutions include Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and Medicare Part D plans for seniors, Medicaid plans,
and individual health insurance plans both on and off the public exchanges. In 2020, U.S. Medical reported adjusted revenues of
$38.5 billion and pre-tax adjusted income from operations of $3.8 billion.
HOW WE WIN
·Broad and deep portfolio of solutions across U.S. Commercial and U.S. Government segments
·Commitment to highest-quality health outcomes and customer experiences
·Collaborative physician engagement models emphasizing value over volume of services
·Integrated and coordinated benefit solutions that deliver value for our customers, clients and partners
·Technology and data analytics powering actionable insights and affordable, predictable solutions
·Talented and caring people embracing change and putting customers at the center of all we do
We differentiate ourselves by providing innovative, personalized and affordable health care benefit solutions based on the unique
needs of the individuals and clients we serve. We increase value through our integrated approach and use of technology and data
analytics to enhance patient engagement and health care outcomes, underscoring our strategic focus on delivering an industry-
leading customer experience. We continue to strengthen our collaborative relationships with providers as we accelerate our transition
to a value-based reimbursement system.
We offer a mix of core health insurance products and services to employers, other groups and individuals along with specialty
products and services designed to improve the quality of care, lower cost and help customers achieve better health outcomes. Many
of these products are available on a standalone basis, but we believe they create additional value when integrated with a Cigna-
administered health plan. Our products are available through several distribution channels including brokers, direct sales and public
and private exchanges. Our three funding solutions (i.e., administrative services only (“ASO”), insured – guaranteed cost (“GC”) and
insured – experience-rated (“ER”) arrangements) enable us to customize the amount of risk taken by, and lower costs for, our clients.
10
The following chart depicts a high-level summary of our principal products and services in this segment, with definitions on
subsequent pages.
Principal Products &
ServicesMajor
Brand(s)GeographyFunding
Solution(s)Market
Segment(s)Primary
Distribution
Channel(s)Primary Competitors
U.S. Commercial Medical
Managed CareCigna
HealthCareNationwide
GC, ER, ASOU.S.
CommercialBrokers, Private
Exchanges, DirectNational Insurers, Local
Healthplans, Third-Party
Administrators (“TP As”)
Preferred Provider
Organization
(“PPO”)Cigna Nationwide National Insurers, TPAs
Consumer-Driven Cigna NationwideNational Insurers, Local
Health Maintenance
Organizations (“HMOs”)
U.S. Government Medical
Individual and
Family PlansCigna 11 states GC IndividualPublic Exchanges,
Brokers, DirectLocal Healthplans, Start-
ups, National Insurers
Medicare Advantage Cigna18 states  &
District of
ColumbiaGCU.S.
GovernmentDirect, BrokersNational Insurers, Local
Healthplans
Medicare Stand –
Alone Prescription
Drug PlansCigna, Express
Scripts Nationwide GC, ASOU.S.
GovernmentDirect, Brokers National Insurers
Medicare
SupplementCigna48 states  &
District of
ColumbiaGCU.S.
GovernmentBrokers, Direct,
Private ExchangesNational Insurers
Medicaid Cigna Texas GCU.S.
GovernmentDirect, Brokers National Insurers
Specialty Products and Services
Stop-Loss Cigna Nationwide GCU.S.
CommercialBrokers, DirectNational Insurers,
Specialty Companies
Cost Containment Cigna Nationwide GC, ER, ASOU.S.
CommercialDirectNational Insurers,
Specialty Companies
Consumer Health
EngagementCigna Nationwide GC, ER, ASOU.S.
Commercial,
U.S.
GovernmentBrokers, DirectNational Insurers,
Specialty Companies
Pharmacy
ManagementCigna Nationwide GC, ER, ASOU.S.
Commercial,
U.S.
GovernmentBrokers, Direct National PBMs
Behavioral HealthCigna
Behavioral
HealthNationwide GC, ER, ASOU.S.
CommercialBrokers, DirectNational Insurers,
Specialty Companies
Dental & VisionCigna Dental
HealthCareNationwideGC, ER, ASOU.S.
Commercial,
U.S.
GovernmentBrokers, DirectDental Insurers, National
Insurers
(1)AZ, CO, FL, IL, KS, MO, NC, TN, TX, UT, VA
(2)AL, AZ, AR, CO, DE, FL, GA, IL, KS, MD, MS, MO, NC, NJ, PA, SC, TN, TX
(3)All states except MA and NY(1)
(2)
(3)
11
Principal Pr oducts & Services
U.S. Commercial Medical
•Managed Care Plans are offered through our insurance companies, HMOs and TPA companies. HMO, Surefit, LocalPlus®,
Network and Open Access Plus plans use meaningful cost-sharing incentives to encourage the use of “in-network” versus
“out-of-network” health care providers. The national provider network for Managed Care Plans is somewhat smaller than
the national network used with the PPO plan product line.
•PPO Plans feature a network with broader provider access than the Managed Care Plans.
•Consumer-Driven Products are typically paired with a high-deductible medical plan and offer customers a tax-advantaged
way to pay for eligible health care expenses. These products, consisting of health savings accounts, health reimbursement
accounts and flexible spending accounts, encourage customers to play an active role in managing their health and health
care costs.
U.S. Government Medical
•Individual and Family Plans are primarily Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (“ACA”) compliant exclusive
provider organization ("EPO") or HMO plans marketed to individuals under age 65 who do not have access to health care
coverage through an employer or government program such as Medicare or Medicaid. Customers receive comprehensive
health care benefits and have access to a local network of health care providers who have been selected with cost and
quality in mind.
•Medicare Advantage Plans allow Medicare-eligible beneficiaries to receive health care benefits, including prescription
drugs, through a managed care health plan such as our coordinated care plans. Our Medicare Advantage Plans include HMO
and PPO plans marketed to individuals. A significant portion of our Medicare Advantage customers receive medical care
from our value-based models that focus on developing highly engaged physician networks, aligning payment incentives to
improved health outcomes and using timely and transparent data sharing.
•Medicare Stand-Alone Prescription Drug Products provide a number of prescription drug plan options, as well as service
and information support, to Medicare eligible and dually eligible Medicaid customers, either directly to individuals or
through a qualified employer group. Our stand-alone plans offer the coverage of Medicare combined with the flexibility to
select a product that provides enhanced benefits and a formulary that meets an individual’s specific needs. Eligible
beneficiaries benefit from broad network access and enhanced service intended to promote adherence, wellness and
affordability for our eligible beneficiaries.
•Medicare Supplement Plans provide Medicare-eligible beneficiaries with federally standardized Medigap-style plans.
Beneficiaries may select among the various plans with specific plan options to meet their unique needs and may visit,
without the need for a referral, any health care provider or facility that accepts Medicare throughout the United States.
•Medicaid Managed Care provides both acute care and Long-Term Services and Supports ("LTSS") by integrating primary
care, behavioral health care, pharmacy services and LTSS for individuals who are age 65 or older or adults who have a
disability. LTSS includes services such as attendant care and day activity and health services. Members have access to a
service coordinator who is responsible for coordinating acute care and LTSS for members.
Specialty Products and Services
•Pharmacy Management services and benefits can be combined with our medical offerings. The comprehensive suite of
pharmacy management services available to clients and customers, utilizing Evernorth's capabilities, includes benefits
management, specialty pharmacy services, clinical solutions, home delivery and certain health management services.
•Behavioral Health services consist of a broad national network of behavioral health providers which includes one of the
largest virtual networks in the United States, behavioral health specialty case and utilization management, a crisis
intervention line accessible anytime, employee assistance programs and work/life programs. We focus on integrating our
programs and services with medical, pharmacy and disability programs to facilitate customized, holistic care as well as to
provide resources that increase resiliency and address non-medical factors that affect overall well-being.
•Cost Containment Programs are designed to contain the cost of covered health care services and supplies. These programs
reduce out-of-network utilization and costs, protect customers from balance billing and educate customers regarding the
availability of lower cost in-network services. In addition, under these programs we negotiate discounts with out-of-network
providers, review provider bills and recover overpayments. We charge fees for providing or arranging for these services.
These programs may be administered by third-party vendors that have contracted with Cigna.
•Stop-Loss insurance coverage is offered to self-insured clients whose group health plans are administered by Cigna. Stop-
loss insurance provides reimbursement for claims in excess of a predetermined amount for individuals, the entire group, or
both.
12
•Consumer Health Engagement services are offered to customers covered under plans administered by Cigna or by third-
party administrators. These services consist of an array of health management, disease management and wellness services.
Our Medical Management programs include case, specialty and utilization management and a 24/7 Health Information line
which ensures around the clock access to a medical professional. Our Health Advocacy program services include early
intervention in the treatment of chronic conditions and an array of health and wellness coaching. We administer incentives
programs designed to encourage customers to engage in health improvement activities.
•Dental & Vision solutions include dental HMO plans, dental PPO plans, exclusive dental provider organization plans,
traditional dental indemnity plans and a dental discount program. Employers and other groups can purchase our products on
either an insured or self-insured basis as standalone products or in conjunction with medical products. Additionally,
individual customers can purchase insured dental PPO plans as standalone products or in conjunction with individual
medical policies.
Revenues: Fees and Premiums
•ASO. Plan sponsors (i.e., employers, unions and other groups) self-fund all claims, but may purchase stop-loss insurance to
limit exposure. We collect fees from plan sponsors for providing access to our participating provider network and for other
services and programs including: claims administration; behavioral health services; disease management; utilization
management; cost containment; dental and pharmacy benefit management. Approximately 84% of our U.S. Commercial
medical customers are in ASO arrangements.
•Insured. In most states, individual and group insurance premium rates must be approved by the applicable state regulatory
agency (typically department of insurance) and state or federal laws may restrict or limit the use of rating methods.
Premium rates for groups and individuals are subject to state review to determine whether they are adequate, not excessive
and not unfairly discriminatory. In addition, the ACA subjects individual and small group policy rate increases above an
identified threshold to review by the United States Department of Health and Human Services (“HHS”) and requires
payment of premium refunds on individual and group medical insurance products if minimum medical loss ratio (“MLR”)
requirements are not met. The MLR represents the percentage of premiums used to pay claims and expenses for activities
that improve the quality of care. In our individual business, premiums may also be adjusted as a result of the government
risk adjustment program that accounts for the relative health status of our customers.
◦Guaranteed Cost Insurance. Premium rates are established at the beginning of a policy period and, depending on
group size, may be based in whole or in part on prior experience of the policyholder or on a pool of similar
policyholders. We generally cannot subsequently adjust premiums to reflect actual claim experience until the next
annual renewal. The policyholder does not participate, or share in, actual claim experience. We keep any
experience surplus or margin if costs are less than the premium charged (subject to minimum medical loss ratio
rebate requirements discussed above) and bear the risk for actual costs in excess of the premium charged.
Approximately 10% of U.S. Commercial medical customers are in guaranteed cost arrangements.
◦Experience-rated Insurance. Premium rates are established at the beginning of a policy period and are typically
based on prior claim experience of the policyholder. When claims and expenses are less than the premium charged
(an “experience surplus” or “margin”), the policyholder may be credited for a portion of this experience surplus or
margin. If claims and expenses exceed the premium charged (an “experience deficit”), we bear these costs. In
certain cases, experience deficits incurred while the policy is in effect are accumulated and may be recovered
through future policy year experience surpluses or margins. Approximately 5% of U.S. Commercial medical
customers are in experience-rated arrangements.
◦Medicare Advantage. Premium rates are established at the beginning of a policy period based upon prior claim
experience. We cannot subsequently adjust premiums to reflect actual claim experience until the next policy
period. We receive fixed monthly payments from CMS for each plan customer based on customer demographic
data and actual customer health risk factors compared to the broader Medicare population. We also may earn
additional revenue from CMS related to quality performance measures (known as ‘‘Star Ratings’’). See the
‘‘Executive Overview’’ section of our MD&A of this Form 10-K for additional discussion of our Star Ratings.
Premiums may be received from customers when our plan premium exceeds the revenue received from CMS. The
ACA requires Medicare Advantage plans to meet a minimum MLR of 85%. If the MLR for a CMS contract is less
than 85%, we are required to pay a rebate to CMS and could be required to make additional payments if the MLR
continues to be less than 85% for successive years.
See the “Business - Regulation” section of this Form 10-K for additional information about premiums, commercial MLR
requirements and risk mitigation programs of the ACA.
13
Market Segments
•U.S. Commercial comprises employers from the following market segments:
◦National. Multistate employers with 5,000 or more U.S.-based, full-time employees. We offer primarily ASO funding
solutions in this market segment.
◦Middle Market. Employers generally with 500 to 4,999 U.S.-based, full-time employees. This segment also includes
single-site employers with more than 5,000 employees and Taft-Hartley plans and other groups. We offer ASO,
experience-rated and guaranteed cost insured funding solutions in this market segment.
◦Select. Employers generally with 51-499 eligible employees. We usually offer ASO with stop-loss insurance coverage
and guaranteed cost insured funding solutions in this market segment.
◦Small Group. Employers generally with 2-50 eligible employees. We offer guaranteed cost insured funding solutions in
select geographies with a strategic partner, Oscar Health, in this market segment.
•U.S. Government comprises the following market segments:
◦Individual. Includes individuals under age 65 who do not have access to health care coverage through an employer or
government program such as Medicare or Medicaid. We offer guaranteed cost, medical ACA-compliant and dental
plans in this segment.
◦Medicare. Includes individuals who are Medicare-eligible beneficiaries, as well as employer group sponsored pre- and
post-65 retirees. We also have dual-eligible customers who receive both Medicare and Medicaid benefits. We receive
revenue from CMS based on customer demographic data and health risk factors. In 2020, revenues from CMS were
significant to the segment.
Primary Distribution Channels
•Brokers. Sales representatives distribute our products and services to a broad group of insurance brokers and consultants
across the United States.
•Direct. Cigna sales representatives distribute our products and services directly to employers, unions and other groups or
individuals across the United States. Various products may also be sold directly to insurance companies, HMOs and third-
party administrators. This may take the form of in-person contact, telephone or group selling venues. Cigna also offers an
online direct to consumer enrollment platform for our individual market segment.
•Private Exchanges. We partner with select companies that have created private exchanges where individuals and
organizations can acquire health insurance. We actively evaluate private exchange participation opportunities as they
emerge in the market and target our participation to those models that best align with our mission and value proposition.
•Public Exchanges. Cigna offers individual ACA-compliant policies through public health insurance exchanges in select
geographies.
Competition
The primary competitive factors affecting our business are quality and cost effectiveness of service and provider networks;
effectiveness of medical care management; products that meet the needs of employers and their employees; total cost management;
technology; and effectiveness of marketing and sales. Financial strength, as indicated by ratings issued by nationally recognized
rating agencies, is also a competitive factor. Our health advocacy capabilities, holistic approach to consumer engagement, breadth of
product offerings, clinical care and health management capabilities and array of product funding options are competitive advantages.
We believe our focus on improving the health, well-being and peace of mind of those we serve, and how we deliver better
affordability, predictability, and simplicity in health care will allow us to further differentiate ourselves.
•National Insurers. United HealthGroup Inc., Aetna Inc. (owned by CVS Health Corporation), Anthem, Humana and Blue
Cross Blue Shield plans compete with us in a variety of products and regions throughout the United States.
•Local Healthplans. Blue Cross Blue Shield plans, local affiliates of major insurance companies and hospitals and regional
stand-alone managed care and specialty companies compete with us in the states in which we offer managed care products.
Additionally, plan sponsors may contract directly with providers.
•TPAs. Third-party administrators compete with us for ASO business.
•Start-ups. Emerging participants including alternative health service models, consortiums and other health plans seeking to
disrupt, often through competitive technology.
•Dental Insurers. Various companies offering primarily dental insurance compete with us on these products.
•Specialty Companies. Specialty insurance or service companies that offer niche products and services compete with us.
14
Partnering to Deliver on the Promise of More Affordable, Predictable, Simple Health Care
Cigna’s strategy engages customers in their health, collaborates with providers to help them improve their performance and connects
customers and providers through aligned health goals, incentives and actionable information to enable better decisions and outcomes.
Our delivery strategy is designed to ensure our customers have access to the right care, in the preferred and appropriate setting at the
right time. Fueled by advanced insights and predictive analytics, Cigna is committed to developing innovative solutions that span the
health care delivery system and can be applied to different types of providers. Currently we have numerous collaborative
arrangements with our participating health care providers that reach over 2.9 million customers and are actively developing new
arrangements to support our strategy.
•Accountable Care Program. We have approximately 240 collaborative care arrangements with primary care groups built on
the patient-centered medical home and accountable care organization (“ACO”) models. Our arrangements span 34 states
and reach over 2.9 million customers. We have made adjustments to the program to deepen our partnerships in responding
to the challenges and needs arising from the COVID-19 pandemic.
•Hospital Quality Program. We have contracts with 175 hospital systems, involving over 540 hospitals, with reimbursements
tied to quality metrics.
•Specialist Programs. We have over 300 arrangements with specialist groups in value-based reimbursement arrangements.
These arrangements include specialties in orthopedics, obstetrics and gynecology, cardiology, gastroenterology, oncology,
nephrology and neurology. Arrangements include incentives for enhanced care coordination and episodes of care
reimbursements for meeting cost and quality goals. We are expanding these programs to include bundled payment
arrangements beginning with orthopedics.
•Independent Practice Associations. We have value-based physician engagement models in our Medicare Advantage
business that allow physician groups to share financial outcomes with us. This clinical model also includes outreach to new
and at-risk patients to ensure they are accessing their primary care physician.
•Participating Provider Network. We provide our customers with an extensive network of participating health care providers,
hospitals and other facilities, pharmacies and providers of health care services and supplies. In most instances, we contract
with them directly; however, in some instances, we contract with third parties for access to their provider networks and care
management services. In addition, we have entered into strategic alliances with several regional managed care organizations
to gain access to their provider networks and discounts.
•Virtual Care. We encourage access for customers through telehealth services as a way to support the patient/doctor
relationship. Our telehealth coverage provides the flexibility for the customer to access their own medical and behavioral
providers, as well as a network of telehealth providers for urgent care needs.
Industry Developments
See the “Industry Developments” section of the MD&A in this Form 10-K for discussion of key industry developments impacting
this segment.
INTERNA TIONAL  MARKETS
Cigna’s International Markets segment has operations in over 30 countries or jurisdictions providing a full range of comprehensive
medical and supplemental health, life and accident benefits to individuals and employers. Products and services include
comprehensive health coverage, hospitalization, dental, critical illness, personal accident, term life, medical cost containment and
variable universal life. In 2020, International Markets reported adjusted revenues of $5.9 billion and pre-tax adjusted income from
operations of $900 million.
South Korea represents our single largest geographic market for International Markets. For information on this concentration of risk
for the International Markets segment's business in South Korea, see "Other Items Affecting Results of International Markets" in the
International Markets section of the MD&A located in Part II, Item 7 of this Form 10-K.
15
HOW WE WIN
 
·Offering a broad range of health and protection-related solutions to meet the needs of the growing
 middle class and globally mobile
·Leveraging deep consumer insights to drive product and service innovation
·Maintaining leading innovative, direct-to-consumer distribution capabilities
·Providing access to quality, affordable care through one of the largest global provider networks
·Implementing locally-licensed and compliant solutions managed by strong, locally-developed talent
 
Demand for our products and services is driven by the growing global middle class, aging populations, increasing prevalence of
chronic conditions and rising global health care costs. Our focus on product and service innovation means we continue to deliver
solutions that meet the evolving needs of individual and group customers. Our products, distribution channels and funding sources
range by customer and geography.
International Markets is well positioned to address the growing demand for access to quality, affordable care and supplemental health
and life protection that fill gaps in public and private care. We distinguish ourselves through differentiated direct-to-consumer
distribution, customer insights, product innovation, a leading provider network and compliant solutions. We identify and pursue
attractive market opportunities to bring health and protection solutions and tailor those solutions to the market and customer needs.
Over the past several years, we have extended our product offerings and geographic reach. The chart below provides a high-level
summary of our principal products and services in this segment with definitions on subsequent pages.
Principal
Products &
ServicesMajor Brand(s) GeographyFunding
Solution(s)Key RelationshipsPrimary
Distribution
Channel(s)Primary
Competitors
Global Health
CareCigna Global
Health Benefits,
Cigna Global
Individual HealthWorldwide (except
as limited by
applicable law)ER, GC, ASOMultinational
Companies, Inter -
governmental and
Non-governmental
Organizations
Globally mobile
individualsBrokers, Agents,
Direct-to-
ConsumerGlobal insurers
Local Health
CareCigna,
ManipalCigna,
 CignaCMBUnited Kingdom,
Spain, Hong Kong,
India, China,
Singapore, Middle
East, ThailandER, GC, ASOEmployer Groups
 
IndividualsBrokers, Agents,
Direct-to-
ConsumerGlobal insurers and
local non-U.S.
insurers
Supplemental
Health, Life, &
AccidentCigna
LINA  Korea,
CignaCMB,
 ManipalCigna,
 CignaFinansAsia Pacific, India,
TurkeyGC IndividualsAffinity ,
Bancassurance,
Brokers, Agents,
Direct-to-
ConsumerGlobal insurers and
local non-U.S.
insurers
Principal Pr oducts & Services
Global Health Care products and services include insurance and administrative services for medical, dental, pharmacy, vision and
life, accidental death and dismemberment and disability risks. We are leading providers of products and services that meet the needs
of multinational employers, intergovernmental and nongovernmental organizations and globally mobile individuals with a focus on
keeping employees healthy and productive. The employer benefits products and services are offered through guaranteed cost,
experience-rated and administrative services only funding solutions, while individuals purchase guaranteed cost coverage. For
definitions of funding solutions, see “Revenues: Fees and Premiums” section in the “Business - U.S. Medical” section of this Form
10-K.
Local Health Care products and services include medical, dental, pharmacy and vision as well as life coverage. The customers of
local health care businesses are employers and individuals located in specific countries where the products and services are
purchased. These employer services can similarly be funded through a range of options; individuals purchase on a guaranteed cost
basis.
16
Supplemental Health, Life and Accident Insurance products and services generally provide simple, affordable coverage of risks for
the health and financial security of individuals. Supplemental health products provide stated benefit payments for certain specified
health risks and include personal accident, accidental death, critical illness, hospitalization, travel, dental, dementia, cancer and other
specified condition coverages. We also offer customers term and variable universal life insurance and certain savings products in
select markets.
Competition
We anticipate that the competitive environment will continue to intensify as insurance and financial services providers more
aggressively pursue expansion opportunities across geographies, particularly Asia. We believe competitive factors will include
speed-to-market, customer insights, branding, product, distribution and service innovation, underwriting and pricing, efficient
management of marketing and operating processes, commission levels paid to distribution partners, the quality of compliance
functions, claims, network coverage and medical cost management and talent acquisition and retention. Additionally, in most
overseas markets, perception of commitment to the market and financial strength will likely be an important competitive factor.
Pricing and Reinsurance
Premium rates and fees for our global and local health care products reflect assumptions about future claims, expenses, customer
demographics, investment returns and profit margins. For products using networks of contracted health care providers and facilities,
premiums reflect assumptions about the impact of these contracts and utilization management on future claims. Most contracts
permit rate changes at least annually.
The profitability of health care products is dependent upon the accuracy of projections for health care inflation (unit cost, location of
delivery of care, currency of incurral and utilization), customer demographics, the adequacy of fees charged for administration and
effective medical cost management.
Premium rates for our supplemental benefits products are based on assumptions about mortality, morbidity, customer acquisition and
retention, customer demographics, expenses and capital requirements, as well as interest rates. Variable universal life insurance
products fees consist of mortality, administrative, asset management and surrender charges assessed against the contractholder’s fund
balance. Mortality charges on variable universal life may be adjusted prospectively to reflect expected mortality experience. Most
contracts permit premium rate changes at least annually.
A global approach to underwriting risk management allows each local business to underwrite and accept risk within specified limits.
Retentions are centrally managed through cost-effective use of external reinsurance to limit our liability on a per event (catastrophe)
basis.
Industry Developments and Other Items Affecting International Markets
Pressure on social health care systems, a rapidly aging population and increased wealth and education in developing insurance
markets are leading to higher demand for health insurance and financial security products. In the supplemental health, life and
accident business, direct marketing channels continue to grow and attract new competitors with industry consolidation among
financial institutions and other affinity partners.
Data privacy regulation has tightened in all markets in the wake of high-profile data privacy incidents, impacting affinity partner and
customer attitudes toward direct marketing of insurance and other financial services. It has also placed an added emphasis on the
importance of operational compliance. In addition to data privacy, consumer protection, specifically market conduct and culture,
continues to be a focus for regulators in many markets.
Capital requirement standards continue to evolve with several markets implementing new capital regimes over the next few years.
GROUP  DISABILITY  AND OTHER
Group Disability and Other includes Cigna’s Group Disability and Life business which offers group long-term and short-term
disability, and group life, accident, voluntary and specialty insurance products and services. Additionally, this segment includes
COLI and the Company’s run-off operations. In 2020, Group Disability and Other reported adjusted revenues of $5.3 billion and pre-
tax adjusted income from operations of $290 million.
17
On December 31, 2020, Cigna completed the sale of the Group Disability and Life business to New York Life Insurance Company
for $6.2 billion. In connection with the sale, the substantial majority of our Group Disability and Life operating segment was sold to
New York Life Insurance Company, and our continuing operations in voluntary products and services will be reported in the U.S.
Medical segment following the sale.
Group Disability and Life
In 2020, our Group Disability and Life operating segment included our commercial long- and short-term disability products and our
term life group insurance products. We also offered personal accident insurance and will continue to offer voluntary products and
services.
Principal Products & Services
•Group Long-term and Short-term Disability insurance products generally provide a fixed level of income to replace a
portion of wages lost due to disability. As part of our group disability insurance products, we also assisted employees in
returning to work and employers with resources to manage the cost of employee disability.
•Leave Administration solutions help customers effectively manage workforce absence and provide coverage for paid leave.
•Group Term Life insurance may be employer-paid basic life insurance, employee-paid supplemental life insurance or a
combination thereof.
•Personal Accident Insurance coverage consists primarily of accidental death and dismemberment and travel accident
insurance to employers.
•Voluntary Products and Services include plans that provide employers with administrative solutions designed to provide a
complete and simple way to manage their benefits program. These voluntary offerings include accidental injury insurance,
critical illness coverage and hospital care coverage, and provide additional dollar payouts to employees for unexpected
accidents, hospitalization or more serious illnesses. Group voluntary products and services are not included in the sale of the
Group Disability and Life business to New York Life and results of these products and services will be reported in the U.S.
Medical segment starting with the first quarter of 2021.
Premiums charged for disability and term life insurance products are usually established in advance of the policy period and are
generally guaranteed for one to three years, but selectively guaranteed for up to five years. Policies are generally subject to
termination by the policyholder or by the insurance company annually. Premium rates reflect assumptions about future claims,
expenses, credit risk, investment returns and profit margins. These assumptions may be based in whole or in part on prior experience
of the account or on a pool of accounts, depending on the group size and the statistical credibility of the experience that varies by
product.
These products and services are distributed through brokers and direct sales and are available in guaranteed cost, experience-rated
and ASO arrangements.
Other  Operations
Other Operations includes the following:
Corporate-Owned Life Insurance
The principal products of the COLI business are permanent insurance contracts sold to corporations to provide coverage on the lives
of certain employees for financing employer-paid future benefit obligations. Permanent life insurance provides coverage that, when
adequately funded, does not expire after a term of years. The contracts are primarily non-participating universal life policies. Fees for
universal life insurance products consist primarily of mortality and administrative charges assessed against the policyholder’s fund
balance. Interest credited and mortality charges for universal life and mortality charges on variable universal life may be adjusted
prospectively to reflect expected interest and mortality experience. To reduce our exposure to large individual losses, we purchase
reinsurance from unaffiliated reinsurers.
Run-off Settlement Annuity Business
Our settlement annuity business is a closed, run-off block of single premium annuity contracts. These contracts are primarily liability
settlements with approximately 20% of the liabilities associated with guaranteed payments not contingent on survivorship. Non-
guaranteed payments are contingent on the survival of one or more parties involved in the settlement.
18
Run-off Reinsurance
Our reinsurance operations are an inactive business in run-off.
In February 2013, we effectively exited the GMDB and GMIB business by reinsuring 100% of our future exposures, net of
retrocessional arrangements in place at that time, up to a specified limit. For additional information regarding this reinsurance
transaction and the arrangements that secure our reinsurance recoverables, see Note 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Individual Life Insurance and Annuity and Retirement Benefits Businesses
This business includes deferred gains recognized from the 1998 sale of the individual life insurance and annuity business and the
2004 sale of the retirement benefits business. For more information regarding the arrangements that secure our reinsurance
recoverables for the retirement benefits business, see Note 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
DATA, ANAL YTICS AND TECHNOLOGY
Cigna’s investments in data, analytics and technology remain outcome-driven with a focus on driving affordability, simplicity,
predictability and growth across all of our business platforms. We deliver value for our clients, customers and stakeholders by
creating better health outcomes, improving customer experience and lowering total cost of care.
Data and Analytics. We conduct timely, rigorous and objective research and analysis that informs evidence-based medical and
pharmacy benefit management and evaluates the clinical, economic and individual impact of enhanced benefit designs and programs.
The combination of our predictive analytics, machine and deep learning capabilities create augmented intelligence that inform
decision-making of our health care professionals. We anticipate needs and meet customers where they are, from predicting chronic
diseases, to using data to reduce payment and claims fraud, optimizing whole person health and optimizing networks to improve
provider access and assist members with care navigation.
We are uniquely positioned to create actionable intelligence by leveraging our rich, integrated data sets and providing differentiating
outcomes. During 2020, we were able to leverage both internal and external data related to COVID-19 in order to enhance our ability
to predict infections and hospitalizations, inform our operational preparedness and optimize care management to improve health
outcomes for our customers, across each of our businesses.
Innovation remains at the forefront of our data, analytic and technology solutions. The advancement of our internal capabilities and
strategic partnerships continues to produce new and more effective ways to close gaps in care, optimize treatment and improve
outcomes. During 2020, significant continued technology integration delivered cost synergies and drove differentiated innovation in
areas such as pharmacy supply chain, specialty pharmacy and retail networks. In the future, we expect continued value realization
with focus on customer-facing systems and opportunities for enhanced value in specialty, claims and retail. (See Evernorth
Intelligence Solutions section of the "Business - Evernorth" discussion of this Form 10-K for additional information on our
intelligent solutions and capabilities).
Our data and analytics talent powers these differentiated capabilities through deep expertise in data management, business analytics,
intelligence and data science, with ongoing investments in talent development, analytic and big data technologies enabled by Cigna
Technology Services (see below), as well as innovative third party partnerships while ensuring controls are designed to protect
sensitive client and customer information.
Technology. Cigna Technology Services enables the strategy by focusing on strong foundational technology services, delivery of a
business-aligned technology project portfolio and creating technology solutions to differentiate us in the market. Our innovation
continues to support three strategic areas: customer benefit administration and health journey; digital health; and care delivery and
management. Our technology drives improved customer experience, increases engagement and advances population health through
provider collaboration tools and enables delivery of advanced analytics and predictive intelligence to provide key areas of
competitive advantage.
19
We continue to bring new technology-enabled products and services to the market, including biometric stress prediction and focused
insights in spaces such as women’s health and opioid addiction. Our digital health focus has shown value across the enterprise by
creating engaging experiences that give customers the right information at the right time. This includes an enhanced MyCigna.com
experience with new features, including refill and payment options, without leaving the mobile application. Cybersecurity
protections, such as multi-factor authentication, have been launched across Cigna’s digital offerings providing better peace of mind
and a stronger sense of security.
Our technology team, powered by approximately 7,000 employees and several thousand external resources working with our
partners, supports the various information systems essential to our operations including the health benefit claims processing systems
and specialty and home delivery pharmacy systems. Uninterrupted point-of-sale electronic retail pharmacy claims processing is a
significant operational requirement for our business. We believe we have substantial capacity for growth in our United States
pharmacy claims processing facilities. Our pharmacy technology platform allows us to safely, rapidly and accurately adjudicate over
one billion adjusted prescriptions annually. Our technology helps retail pharmacies focus on patient care and our real-time safety
checks help avoid hundreds of thousands of medication errors annually. The Cigna companies hold over 230 United States patents.
We use these patents to protect our proprietary technological advances and to differentiate ourselves in the market.
INVESTMENT  MANAGEMENT
Our investment operations provide investment management and related services for our various businesses, including the insurance-
related invested assets in our General Account (“General Account Invested Assets”). We acquire or originate, directly or through
intermediaries, a broad range of investments including private placement and public securities, commercial mortgage loans, real
estate, mezzanine, private equity partnerships and short-term investments. Invested assets also include policy loans that are fully
collateralized by insurance policy cash values. We also enter into derivative financial instruments, primarily to minimize the risk of
changes in foreign currency exchange rates on our investments. Invested assets are managed primarily by our subsidiaries and, to a
lesser extent, external managers with whom our subsidiaries contract. Net investment income is included as a component of adjusted
income from operations for each of our segments and Corporate. Realized investment gains (losses) are reported by segment but
excluded from adjusted income from operations. For additional information about invested assets, see the “Investment Assets”
section of the MD&A and Notes 11 and 12 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
We manage our investment portfolios to reflect the underlying characteristics of related insurance and contractholder liabilities and
capital requirements, as well as regulatory and tax considerations pertaining to those liabilities and state investment laws. Insurance
and contractholder liabilities range from short duration health care products to longer-term obligations associated with life insurance
products and the run-off settlement annuity business. Assets supporting these liabilities are managed in segregated investment
portfolios to facilitate matching of asset durations and cash flows to those of corresponding liabilities. Investment results are affected
by the amount and timing of cash available for investment, economic and market conditions and asset allocation decisions. We
routinely monitor and evaluate the status of our investments, obtaining and analyzing relevant investment-specific information and
assessing current economic conditions, trends in capital markets and other factors such as industry sector, geographic and property-
specific information.
Separate Accounts
Our subsidiaries or external advisors manage invested assets of Separate Accounts on behalf of contractholders, including the Cigna
Pension Plan, variable universal life products sold through our corporate-owned life insurance business and other life insurance
products. These assets are legally segregated from our other businesses and are not included in General Account Invested Assets.
Income, gains and losses generally accrue directly to the contractholders.
Investing in Innovation
In addition to the portfolio investments in our general and separate accounts discussed above that support our insurance operations,
we do targeted investing within the health care industry specifically. In 2018, Cigna committed $250 million to Cigna Ventures, our
strategic corporate venture fund to invest in promising startups and growth-stage companies who, like us, are unlocking new growth
possibilities in health care. Specifically, we invest in companies making groundbreaking progress in three strategic areas: insights /
analytics, digital health / experience, care delivery / enablement. To date, Cigna Ventures has six venture capital partners and 14
direct investments. Through these deep partnerships we collaborate, innovate and develop new solutions that address critical market
challenges of affordability, predictability and simplicity impacting the people we serve.
20
HUMAN CAPIT AL MANAGEMENT
Cigna’s mission is to improve the health, well-being and peace of mind of those we serve by enabling affordable, predictable and
simple health care. A global healthy and diverse workforce is essential to achieving our mission and our business growth strategies.
We are continually investing in our global workforce to support our employees’ health and well-being, further drive diversity and
inclusion, provide fair and market-competitive pay and foster their growth and development. As of the end of the 2020 fiscal year,
we had approximately 73,700 employees, with 89% of our employees based in the United States. Almost all of our employees are
full-time, with less than 2% of employees regularly working fewer than 30 hours per week.
Health, Well-Being and Other Benefits
Tending to our employees’ health, well-being and peace of mind is more than just our mission – it is a critical business imperative for
our company. At Cigna, we believe that the provision of health and well-being benefits for our employees is our responsibility as an
employer, and should not be outsourced to the government or other third parties. Ensuring that our employees have comprehensive
health and well-being benefits is not only the right thing to do from a societal perspective – it is also one of the most important
investments in our enterprise that we make each year. That is because we strongly believe that a healthy workforce is more
productive, has fewer absences and is a critical enabler for us to drive our business and our strategy forward, thereby creating
significant shareholder value. In 2020, Cigna invested approximately 17% of total payroll in health, well-being and other benefits,
including life and disability programs, 401(k) contributions and retirement-related benefits for its employees in the United States.
In addition to traditional medical and pharmacy benefits, we provide mental health support to employees, including: employee
assistance program (EAP) benefits that are free to all employees and to any member of their household, digital tools that provide
access to education and therapy to help individuals build greater resilience and cope with stress, anxiety and depression.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion
At Cigna, we take an expansive view of diversity including race, ethnicity, nationality, gender, veteran status, ability, sexual
orientation and gender identity. As of the end of the 2020 fiscal year, 70% of our employees were women, and 37% of our employees
in the United States were from underrepresented groups (which includes Black/African American, Hispanic or Latinx, Asian, Pacific
Islander, American Indian/Alaskan and employees who identified as two races or more).
We are committed to fairness in pay and opportunity for all of our employees. Our compensation practices, which include
benchmarking compensation by role, eliminating inquiries regarding applicants’ compensation history from the hiring process and
monitoring for potential disparities, promote equity in pay. Our most recent pay equity analysis, conducted in 2020, showed that in
the United States female employees at Cigna earn 99.9 cents for every dollar earned by similarly-situated male employees, and
employees from underrepresented groups earn 99.7 cents for every dollar earned by similarly-situated white employees.
We are committed to attracting and recruiting key diverse talent across various leadership development programs and other entry
level positions with the business. This success is rooted in strategic relationships with diverse student groups at our partner colleges
and universities as well as our commitment to multiple national, regional and local organizations, which provide us focused
recruiting opportunities with women, the LGBTQA+ community, military veterans and underrepresented minority groups.
Talent Acquisition, Development and Retention
Our talent acquisition and rewards strategies are designed to ensure we attract and retain skilled employees who are engaged in our
mission. Our compensation program is rooted in market competitive base salaries and incentives that reward contributions that
advance the Company’s strategy and mission. Our online learning platform and career development tools and events offer a broad
range of training, education and development resources to all employees. In 2020, U.S. employees on average engaged in 53 hours of
learning through these resources. Enterprise leadership development programs include New Leader Experience, Leading with
Excellence, Transformative Leadership, Inclusive Leadership and Leaders in Transition. Cigna also offers an education
reimbursement program for both full and part-time employees who meet the continuing education criteria. We believe these
strategies and programs contribute to employee engagement and retention. In 2020, the voluntary turnover rate was 3.9% for exempt
employees in the United States.
21
MISCELLANEOUS
•Revenues from U.S. Federal Government agencies, under a number of contracts, represent 15% of our consolidated revenues in
2020.
•The Company is not dependent on business from one or a few brokers or agents. In addition, our insurance businesses are
generally not committed to accept a fixed portion of the business submitted by independent brokers and agents and generally all
such business is subject to approval and acceptance.
REGULA TION
The laws and regulations governing our business continue to increase each year and are subject to frequent change. We are regulated
by federal, state and international legislative bodies and agencies, which generally have discretion to issue regulations and interpret
and enforce laws and rules. These regulations can vary significantly from jurisdiction to jurisdiction, and the interpretation of
existing laws and rules also may change periodically. Domestic and international governments continue to enact and consider various
legislative and regulatory proposals, which could materially impact the health care system. We expect continued legislative and
regulatory debate of issues related to our businesses. As has become increasingly common with public policy reforms in the health
services industry, executive, judicial or legislative intervention could alter, slow or eliminate the impact of any proposal following
the related regulation’s promulgation, including, for example, the executive order issued in January 2021 regarding a regulatory
freeze pending review which may delay or ultimately result in revision or repeal of various regulatory actions taken in 2020.
Many aspects of our business are directly regulated by federal and state laws and administrative agencies, such as the Department of
Health and Human Services (“HHS”), Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (“CMS”), the Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”),
the U.S. Departments of Labor (“DOL”), Treasury and Justice (“DOJ”), the Office of Personnel Management (“OPM”), the Federal
Trade Commission (“FTC”), the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”), the Office of the National Coordinator for
Health Information Technology (“ONC”), state departments of insurance and state boards of pharmacy. Our business practices may
also be shaped by judicial decisions.
In addition, aspects of our business are subject to indirect regulation. The self-funded benefit plans sponsored by our U.S. employer
clients are regulated under federal law. These self-funded clients expect us to ensure that our administration of their plans complies
with the regulatory requirements applicable to them.
Our business operations and the books and records of our regulated businesses are routinely subject to examination and audit at
regular intervals by state insurance and HMO regulatory agencies, state boards of pharmacy, CMS, DOL, IRS, OPM and comparable
international regulators to assess compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Our operations are also subject to nonroutine
examinations, audits and investigations by various state and federal regulatory agencies, generally as the result of a complaint. In
addition, we may be implicated in investigations of our clients whose group benefit plans we administer on their behalf. As a result,
we routinely receive subpoenas and other demands or requests for information from various state insurance and HMO regulatory
agencies, state attorneys general, the HHS Office of Inspector General (“HHS-OIG”), the DOJ, the DOL and other state, federal and
international authorities. We may also be called upon by members of the U.S. Congress to provide information, including testifying
before Congressional committees and subcommittees, regarding certain of our business practices. If Cigna is determined to have
failed to comply with applicable laws or regulations, these examinations, audits, investigations, reviews, subpoenas and demands
may:
•result in fines, penalties, injunctions, consent orders or loss of licensure;
•suspend or exclude from participation in government programs or limit our ability to sell or market our products;
•require changes in business practices;
•damage relationships with the agencies that regulate us and affect our ability to secure regulatory approvals necessary for the
operation of our business; or
•damage our brand and reputation.
Our international subsidiaries are subject to regulations in international jurisdictions, including in certain cases many regulations
similar to the federal and state regulations described below, which are complex and where foreign insurers may face more rigorous
regulations than their domestic competitors and may also be affected by geopolitical developments or tensions.
The laws and regulations governing our business, as well as the related interpretations, are subject to frequent change and can be
inconsistent or in conflict with each other. Changes in our business environment are likely to continue as elected and appointed
officials at the national and state levels continue to propose and enact significant modifications to existing laws and regulations. Even
22
where we believe that we are in compliance with the various laws and regulations, any enforcement actions by federal, state or
international government officials alleging non-compliance with these rules and regulations could subject us to penalties or
restructuring or reorganization of our business. For a discussion of the risks related to our compliance with these laws and
regulations see the Risk Factors section located in Part I, Item 1A of this Form 10-K. Management continues to be actively engaged
with regulators and policymakers with respect to legislation and rulemaking.
COVID-19-related Regulatory Actions
In response to COVID-19 which was declared a pandemic by the World Health Organization in early 2020, U.S. federal and state
governments have increasingly enacted new legislative and regulatory requirements, as well as provided flexibility to industry
participants within existing legal requirements. These regulatory actions primarily provide for:
•client and customer premium relief to avoid the cancellation or non-renewal of policies;
•mandating or requesting waiver of customer cost-sharing and other related costs such as COVID-19 testing or treatment, as
well as establishing provider reimbursement and vaccine immunizations coverage requirements;
•extending claims filing deadlines for providers, customers and facilities;
•mandating or encouraging waiver of customer cost-share related to telemedicine services, as well as requiring certain
reimbursement levels for telemedicine providers to encourage its utilization;
•increasing the Medicare fee-for-service reimbursement for certain items and services;
•enacting coverage and reimbursement requirements at in-network levels for certain services received from out-of-network
providers;
•clarification regarding permissible sharing of information and coordination among health care providers;
•revising or suspending the use of certain medical management procedures; and
•mandating prescription drug benefit administration requirements primarily related to formulary exceptions and restrictions,
and prior authorization and prescription drug refill limits.
These actions are in effect for various durations, but generally track the different states of emergency that have been declared at the
state and federal level. Of particular significance is the Public Health Emergency declared by the Secretary of HHS on January 31,
2020, which sets the effective period for certain of the requirements established through federal COVID-19 legislation, such as
covering testing without cost sharing.
Patient Protection and the Affordable Care Act
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (“ACA”) mandated broad changes to the U.S. health care system, including insured
and self-insured health benefit plans and pharmacy benefit managers. Our business model is impacted by the ACA, including our
relationships with current and future producers and health care providers, products, service providers and technologies. The
provisions of the ACA imposed, among other things, certain assessments on health insurers, created health insurance exchanges for
individuals and small group employers to purchase insurance coverage and implemented minimum medical loss ratios (“MLRs”) for
our Medicare and commercial businesses. Certain states have adopted MLR requirements applicable to our commercial businesses
that are more stringent than those established by the ACA. Other provisions of the ACA in effect include reduced Medicare
Advantage payment rates, the requirement to cover preventive services with no enrollee cost-sharing, banning the use of lifetime and
annual limits on the dollar amount of essential health benefits, increasing restrictions on rescinding coverage, extending coverage of
dependents up to age 26, restrictions on differential pricing, enforcement mechanisms and rules related to health care fraud and abuse
enforcement activities and certain pharmacy benefit transparency requirements. The employer mandate requires employers with 50
or more full-time employees to offer affordable health insurance that provides minimum value (each as defined under the ACA) to
full-time employees and their dependents, including children up to age 26, or be subject to penalties based on employer size. The
ACA also changed certain tax laws to effectively limit tax deductions for certain employee compensation paid by health insurers. In
December 2019, the federal government repealed the non-deductible health insurance industry fee effective for 2021, as well as
repealing the enacted but never implemented 40% excise tax on certain employer-sponsored coverage (known as the “Cadillac Tax”)
and the medical device tax.
In 2018, the DOL issued final rules that revised the definition of “employer” under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974, as amended (“ERISA”) to make it easier for employers, including self-employed individuals, to form bona fide employer
groups, all of whose employees would be counted in determining whether they were small or large groups for purposes of the ACA.
While the regulation of these groupings by state insurance departments is not affected by the DOL’s final association health plan
rules, the final rules have resulted in an increase in interest among employers, associations, producers and benefit consultants in
forming new groupings for purposes of offering insured or self-funded group health plans.
23
Since its adoption, there have been several attempts to repeal or limit the utility of the ACA. Certain insurers, including Cigna, have
sued the federal government for failure to pay cost-sharing subsidies (“CSR”) under the ACA. In the first set of consolidated appeals,
the Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit issued a decision on August 14, 2020, finding that (i) the CSR reimbursement provision
of the ACA imposes an obligation on the government to pay, but (ii) the insurers’ damages must be reduced by the amount of
additional premium tax credit payments that each insurer received as a result of the government’s termination of CSR payments. Our
premium rates for the 2018, 2019 and 2020 plan years reflected a lack of government funding for cost-sharing reduction subsidies.
The insurers filed petitions for rehearing en banc in the Federal Circuit and the court denied those petitions. On February 19, 2021,
two insurers filed a petition seeking U.S. Supreme Court review. The matter remains unresolved and our case is stayed pending final
resolution of the consolidated appeals, including the petition for writ of certiorari in the U. S. Supreme Court. In December 2017,
U.S. tax reform legislation was signed into law that, among other things, reduced the “individual mandate” penalty for individuals
without health insurance to zero dollars, effective January 1, 2019. As a result of this change, a federal district court has ruled that the
“individual mandate” is unconstitutional and that the entire law must be struck down. On appeal, the Court of Appeals for the Fifth
Circuit agreed that the “individual mandate” is unconstitutional but ordered the district court to reexamine whether the other
provisions of the ACA can remain in effect. The California-led states and the U.S. House of Representatives filed petitions seeking to
appeal the Fifth Circuit's ruling to the U.S. Supreme Court. The U.S. Supreme Court heard oral arguments on the appeals on
November 10, 2020 and a decision is expected by the end of June 2021.
See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information regarding accounting policies around the risk mitigation
programs under the ACA.
Medicare and Medicaid Regulations
Through our subsidiaries, we offer individual and group Medicare Advantage, Medicare Prescription Drug (“Part D”) and Medicare
Supplement products. We also provide Medicare Part D-related products and services to other Medicare Part D sponsors, Medicare
Advantage Prescription Drug Plans and employers and clients offering Medicare Part D benefits to Medicare Part D eligible
beneficiaries. As part of our Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D business, we contract with CMS to provide services to
Medicare beneficiaries. As a result, our ability to obtain payment (and the determination of the amount of such payments), market to,
enroll and retain customers and expand into new service areas is subject to compliance with CMS’ numerous and complex
regulations and requirements that are frequently modified and subject to administrative discretion, review and enforcement. We offer
Medicaid and dual-eligible products and participate in state Medicaid programs directly or indirectly through our clients who are
Medicaid managed care contractors. We also perform certain Medicaid subrogation services and certain delegated services, including
utilization management, for clients, which are regulated by federal and state laws. Our Medicaid and dual-eligible products are
regulated by CMS and state Medicaid agencies audit our performance to determine compliance with contracts and regulations.
CMS evaluates Medicare Advantage plans and Part D plans under its “Star Rating” system. The Star Rating system considers various
measures adopted by CMS, including, for example, quality of care, preventive services, chronic illness management, coverage
determinations and appeals and customer satisfaction. A plan’s Star Rating affects its image in the market and plans that perform
very well are able to offer enhanced benefits and market more effectively and for longer periods of time than other plans. Medicare
Advantage plans’ quality-bonus payments are determined by the Star Rating, with plans receiving a rating of four or more stars
eligible for such payments. The Star Rating system is subject to change annually by CMS, which may make it more difficult to
achieve and maintain four stars or greater. For example, beginning with Star Ratings for payment year 2024, CMS will place more
emphasis on patient experience survey-based measures which could reduce Star Ratings predictability year over year. Additionally,
as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic’s impact on 2020 care patterns and utilization, CMS finalized rules applying relief to
Medicare Advantage and Part D Plan Star Ratings for payment year 2023 by utilizing the higher of the payment year 2023 or 2022
measure level Star Ratings.
CMS uses a risk-adjustment model which adjusts premiums paid to Medicare Advantage plans according to customers’ health status.
The risk-adjustment model generally pays more where a plan's membership is expected to have increased costs because of the health
status of its members. Under this model, rates paid to Medicare Advantage plans are based on actuarially determined bids, which
include a process whereby our prospective payments are based on our estimated cost of providing standard Medicare-covered
benefits to an enrollee with a “national average risk profile.” That baseline payment amount is adjusted to reflect the health status of
our enrolled membership. Under the risk-adjustment methodology, Medicare Advantage plans must collect and submit the necessary
diagnosis code information from hospital inpatient, hospital outpatient and physician providers to CMS within prescribed deadlines.
We generally rely on providers, including certain providers who are employees, to appropriately document their claims and other
submissions with appropriate diagnoses from which we extract hierarchical condition codes to submit to CMS as the basis for our
payments received under the actuarial risk-adjustment model. The CMS risk-adjustment model uses the diagnosis data to calculate
the risk-adjusted premium payment to the plans, which CMS adjusts for coding pattern differences between the health plans and the
government fee-for-service program. In 2012, CMS released a payment methodology that provided for sample audit error rates to be
24
extrapolated to the entire Medicare Advantage contract after comparing audit results with a similar audit of Medicare Fee for Service
(the “FFS Adjuster”) and applying an FFS Adjuster to establish actuarial equivalency in payment rates as required by the Medicare
statute. However, a methodology to calculate the FFS Adjuster was not finalized and CMS has, to date, not completed any Risk
Adjustment Data Validation (“RADV”) audits using extrapolation.
On November 1, 2018, CMS released a proposed rule titled “Proposed Rule on Changes to MA and Part D Programs for CY 2020
and 2021” that would revise its RADV methodology for RADV audits of contract year 2011 and all subsequent years by, among
other things, extrapolating the error rate related to RADV audit findings without applying the FFS Adjuster. If the proposed rule is
adopted in its current form, it could result in some combination of degraded plan benefits, higher monthly premiums and reduced
choice for the population served by all MA insurers. The Company, along with other Medicare Advantage organizations and
additional interested parties, submitted comments to CMS on the proposed rule as part of the notice-and-comment rulemaking
process. The comment period concluded on August 28, 2019 and CMS is expected to act by November 2021. RADV audits for our
contract years 2011 through 2015 are currently in process. It is uncertain whether CMS will finalize the rule as proposed. See below
under “Federal and State Oversight of Government-Sponsored Health Care Programs” for a discussion of RADV audits.
Coverage of prescription drugs under Medicare Part D is also regulated by CMS and our contracts with CMS contain provisions for
risk sharing and certain payments for prescription drug costs for which we are not at risk. These provisions affect our ultimate
payments from CMS. For example, premiums from CMS are subject to risk corridor payments which compare costs targeted in our
annual bids with actual prescription costs, limited to actual costs that would have been incurred under the standard coverage as
defined by CMS. Variances exceeding certain thresholds may result in CMS making additional payments to us or require us to refund
to CMS a portion of the payments we received (known as a risk corridor).
We expect CMS, HHS-OIG, DOJ and other federal agencies to continue to closely scrutinize each component of the Medicare
Advantage program and modify the terms and requirements of the program. Noncompliance with these laws and regulations may
result in significant consequences, including fines and penalties, enrollment sanctions, exclusion from the Medicare and Medicaid
programs, limitations on expansion and criminal penalties.
False Claims Act and Anti-Kickback Laws
Our products and services are also subject to the federal False Claims Act (the “False Claims Act”) and federal and state anti-
kickback laws. Additionally, the federal government has made investigating and prosecuting health care fraud, waste and abuse a
priority. Fraud, waste and abuse prohibitions encompass a wide range of activities, including kickbacks in return for customer
referrals, billing for unnecessary medical services, upcoding and improper marketing. The regulations and contractual requirements
in this area are complex, frequently modified and subject to administrative discretion and judicial interpretation.
False Claims Act and Related Criminal Provisions. The False Claims Act imposes civil penalties on any person who makes or causes
to be made claims or records or statements that he or she knows or should know are false with respect to governmental programs,
such as Medicare and Medicaid, to obtain reimbursement or for failure to return overpayments. Private individuals may bring qui
tam or “whistleblower” suits against providers under the False Claims Act, which authorizes the payment of a portion of any
recovery to the individual bringing suit. The ACA amended the federal anti-kickback laws to state any claim submitted to a federal or
state health care program that violates the anti-kickback laws is also a false claim under the False Claims Act. The False Claims Act
generally provides for the imposition of civil penalties and for treble damages, creating the possibility of substantial financial
liabilities. Criminal statutes similar to the False Claims Act provide that if a corporation is convicted of presenting a claim or making
a statement it knows to be false, fictitious or fraudulent to any federal agency, the corporation may be fined. Conviction under these
statutes may also result in exclusion from participation in federal and state health care programs. Many states have also enacted laws
similar to the False Claims Act, some of which may include criminal penalties, substantial fines and treble damages.
Anti-Kickback and Referral Laws. Subject to certain exceptions and “safe harbors,” the federal anti-kickback statute generally
prohibits, among other things, knowingly and willfully paying, receiving or offering any payment or other remuneration to induce a
person to purchase, lease, order or arrange for items (including prescription drugs) or services reimbursable in whole or in part under
Medicare, Medicaid or another federal health care program. Many states have similar laws, some of which are not limited to items or
services paid for with government funds. Sanctions for violating these federal and state anti-kickback laws may include criminal and
civil fines and exclusion from participation in federal and state health care programs.
Anti-kickback laws have been cited as a partial basis, along with state consumer protection laws described below, for investigations
and multistate settlements relating to financial incentives provided by drug manufacturers to pharmacies or payors in connection with
“product conversion” or promotion programs. Other anti-kickback and referral laws may also be applicable including criminal and
25
civil laws restricting illegal kickbacks and conflicts of interest in connection with an ERISA plan, the federal “Stark Law,” and
various state anti-kickback restrictions.
In November 2020, HHS and HHS-OIG released a final rule which eliminates an anti-kickback regulatory safe harbor protection for
price concessions, including rebates, that are offered by pharmaceutical manufacturers to plan sponsors or pharmacy benefit
managers under the Medicare Part D program. The final rule creates two new safe harbors: (i) for price reductions by manufacturers
to plan sponsors under Medicare Part D and Medicaid managed care organizations that are reflected at the time of dispense and (ii)
for fixed-fee service arrangements between manufacturers and pharmacy benefit managers. HHS-OIG has temporarily postponed the
effective date of the new safe harbors to March 22, 2021. Additionally, HHS recently agreed to postpone the elimination of the
aforementioned regulatory safe harbor to January 1, 2023.
Federal Civil Monetary Penalties Law. The federal civil monetary penalty statute provides for civil monetary penalties against any
person who gives something of value to a Medicare or Medicaid program beneficiary that the person knows or should know is likely
to influence the beneficiary’s selection of a particular provider for Medicare or Medicaid items or services. Under this law, our
wholly-owned home delivery pharmacies, specialty pharmacies and home health providers are restricted from offering certain items
of value to influence a Medicare or Medicaid patient’s use of services. The ACA also includes several civil monetary provisions,
such as penalties for the failure to report and return a known overpayment and failure to grant timely access to the HHS-OIG under
certain circumstances.
Federal and State Oversight of Government-Sponsored Health Care Programs
Participation in government-sponsored health care programs subjects us to a variety of federal and state laws and regulations and
risks associated with audits conducted under these programs. These audits may occur years after the provision of services. Risks
include potential fines and penalties, restrictions on our ability to participate or expand our presence in certain programs and
restrictions on marketing our plans. For example, with respect to our Medicare Advantage business, CMS and the HHS-OIG perform
audits to determine a health plan’s compliance with federal regulations and contractual obligations, including program audits and
Risk Adjustment Data Validation Audits, which focus on compliance with proper coding practices. Certain of our contracts are
currently subject to RADV audits by CMS and the HHS-OIG. CMS has announced that its goal is to subject all Medicare Advantage
contracts to either a comprehensive or a targeted RADV audit for each contract year. The DOJ is also currently conducting an
industry-wide investigation of the risk adjustment data submission practices and business processes, including medical chart reviews
and health exams, of Cigna and a number of other Medicare Advantage organizations under Medicare Parts C and D. See Note 21 to
the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information.
For our Medicare Part D business, compliance with certain contractual provisions and regulatory requirements is subject to review
by Recovery Audit Contractor audits in which third-party contractors conduct post-payment reviews on a contingency fee basis to
detect and correct improper payments.
Government Procurement Regulations
We have a contract with the U.S. Department of Defense (“DoD”), which subjects us to applicable Federal Acquisition Regulations
(“FAR”) and the DoD FAR Supplement, which govern federal government contracts. Further, there are other federal and state laws
applicable to our DoD arrangement and our arrangements with other clients that may be subject to government procurement
regulations. In addition, certain of our clients participate as contracting carriers in the Federal Employees Health Benefits Program
administered by the OPM, which includes various pharmacy benefit management standards.
Employee Retirement Income Security Act
Our domestic subsidiaries sell most of their products and services to sponsors of employee benefit plans that are governed by
ERISA. ERISA is a complex set of federal laws and regulations enforced by the IRS and the DOL, as well as the courts. ERISA
regulates certain aspects of the relationship between us, the employers that maintain employee welfare benefit plans subject to
ERISA and participants in such plans. Certain of our domestic subsidiaries are also subject to requirements imposed by ERISA
affecting claim payment and appeals procedures for individual health insurance and insured and self-insured group health plans and
for the insured dental, disability, life and accident plans we administer. Certain of our domestic subsidiaries also may contractually
agree to comply with these requirements on behalf of the self-insured dental, disability, life and accident plans they administer. We
believe the conduct of our pharmacy benefit management business is not generally subject to the fiduciary obligations of ERISA.
However, there can be no assurances that the DOL may not assert that pharmacy benefit managers are fiduciaries. From time to time,
states have considered legislation to declare a pharmacy benefit manager or health benefit manager a fiduciary with respect to its
clients.
26
Plans subject to ERISA can also be subject to state laws and the legal question of whether and to what extent ERISA preempts a state
law will continue to be subject to court interpretation, including by the U.S. Supreme Court.
Privacy, Security and Data Standards Regulations
Many of our activities involve the receipt or use of confidential health and other personal information. In addition, we use aggregated
and de-identified data for our own research and analysis purposes and, in some cases, provide access to such de-identified data, or
analytics created from such data, to pharmaceutical manufacturers and third-party data aggregators. We may also use such
information to create analytic models designed to predict, and potentially improve, outcomes and patient care. There are also
industry standards for handling credit card data known as the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard, which are a set of
requirements designed to help ensure that entities that process, store or transmit credit card information maintain a secure
environment. Certain states have incorporated these requirements into state laws or enacted other requirements for using and
disclosing personal information.
The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and its implementing regulations (“HIPAA”) impose
minimum standards on health insurers, pharmacy benefit managers, HMOs, health plans, health care providers and clearinghouses
for the privacy and security of protected health information. HIPAA regulations may also hold us liable for violations by our business
associates (e.g., entities that provide services to health plans and providers). HIPAA also established rules that standardize the format
and content of certain electronic transactions, including, but not limited to, eligibility and claims. To the extent insurers offer plans
through a public exchange, participants and their downstream entities such as pharmacy benefit managers must adhere to privacy and
security standards for personally identifiable information and to impose standards that are at least as protective as those the exchange
has implemented for itself. These standards may differ from, and be more stringent than, HIPAA.
The Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (“HITECH”) imposes additional contracting requirements
for covered entities, the extension of privacy and security provisions to business associates, the requirement to provide notification to
various parties in the event of a data breach of protected health information and enhanced financial penalties for HIPAA violations,
including potential criminal penalties for individuals. In the conduct of our business, depending on the circumstances, we may act as
either a covered entity or a business associate.
The federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and its implementing regulations generally place restrictions on the disclosure of nonpublic
information to nonaffiliated third parties, and requires financial institutions, including insurers, to provide customers with notice
regarding how their nonpublic personal information is used, including an opportunity to “opt out” of certain disclosures. State
departments of insurance and certain federal agencies adopted implementing regulations as required by federal law.
State and local authorities are increasingly focused on protecting individuals from identity theft and a number of states have adopted
comprehensive data security laws and regulations requiring, among other things, certain minimum data security standards and
security breach notifications that may apply to us in certain circumstances, as well as certain limitations on access to and use of
personal information. Neither HIPAA nor the Gramm-Leach-Bliley privacy regulations preempt more stringent state laws and
regulations which may differ in approach and enforcement. The California Consumer Privacy Act, which went into effect in January
2020, provides additional privacy rights for California residents although it generally does not apply to certain regulated data such as
information covered by HIPAA. In November 2020, California further expanded privacy rights for California residents by enacting
the California Privacy Rights Act which includes additional protections on sensitive personal information, creates new individual
rights for residents and imposes additional requirements for those entities collecting personal information of California residents and
their service providers beginning in 2023. We anticipate federal and state regulators to continue to enact legislation related to privacy
and cybersecurity.
The Cybersecurity Information Sharing Act of 2015 (“CISA”) encourages organizations to share cyber threat indicators with the
federal government and, among other things, directs HHS to develop a set of voluntary cybersecurity best practices for organizations
in the health care industry. States have also begun to issue regulations specifically related to cybersecurity, which may differ or
conflict from state to state. In October 2017, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”), an organization of
state insurance regulators, adopted the Insurance Data Security Model Law that creates rules for insurers and other covered entities
addressing data security, investigation and notification of breaches. This includes maintaining an information security program based
on ongoing risk assessment, overseeing third-party service providers, investigating data breaches and notifying regulators of a
cybersecurity event. As the model law is intended to serve as model legislation only, states will need to enact legislation for the
model law to become mandatory and enforceable. We will continue to monitor states’ activity regarding cybersecurity regulation.
HHS, including the ONC, the Office for Civil Rights and CMS, has enacted regulations, and proposed additional regulations, to
support the seamless and secure access, exchange and use of electronic health information by or between patients, enrollees and
entities such as payers and health care providers. These regulations include, among others, proposed changes to HIPAA designed to
27
promote greater patient access and control over health information maintained by health plans and health care providers and improve
information sharing for case management and care coordination. Other interoperability regulations prohibit information blocking by
certain entities and require certain regulated plans to make specified patient, clinical and plan-related data available to enrollees via
interoperable technology and applications. These regulations apply to a variety of entities, including health plans like Medicare plans
and qualified health plans, as well as health care providers, certified health information technology developers and health
information networks and exchanges and generally require significant enhancements to information technology and data governance
practices. The regulations and proposals demonstrate an increased interest in information sharing and will impact how industry
participants, including us, comply with disclosure requirements and share information with individuals and other healthcare
organizations. We continue to monitor developments and to submit comments on proposed regulations where appropriate.
In addition, international laws, rules and regulations governing the use and disclosure of personal information can be more stringent
than in the United States, and they vary from jurisdiction to jurisdiction. The European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation
(“GDPR”), which became effective May 2018, enhanced or created obligations regarding the handling of personal data relating to
European residents, such as regarding notices, data protection impact assessments and individual rights, and provides for greater
penalties for noncompliance than the previous European Directive or laws. In addition, many countries outside of Europe where we
conduct business have implemented or may implement data protection laws and regulations, some of which include requirements
modeled after those in the GDPR. Some non-U.S. jurisdictions are also instituting data residency regulations requiring that data be
maintained within the respective jurisdiction or otherwise restricting transfer of personal data across borders unless specified
regulatory requirements are met.
See Part I. Item 1A, “Risk Factors” for a discussion of the risks related to compliance with privacy and security regulations.
Consumer Protection Laws
We engage in direct-to-consumer activities and are increasingly offering mobile and web-based solutions to our customers. We are
therefore subject to federal and state regulations applicable to electronic communications and other consumer protection laws and
regulations, such as the Telephone Consumer Protection Act and the CAN-SPAM Act. The FTC is also increasingly exercising its
enforcement authority in the areas of consumer privacy and data security, with a focus on web-based, mobile data and “big data.”
Federal consumer protection laws may also apply in some instances to privacy and security practices related to personally
identifiable information.
State and federal policymakers have taken actions intended to increase transparency and predictability of health care costs for
consumers. For example, in October 2020, the HHS, the DOL and the Department of the Treasury issued a final rule that requires
most group health plans and health insurance issuers in the individual and group markets to disclose price and cost-sharing
information for all items and services to participants and enrollees. The cost-sharing information requirements under the rule take
effect in a phased approach beginning January 1, 2023. In addition to providing personalized cost-sharing information, beginning
January 1, 2022, health plans and health insurers must also publicly disclose (i) in-network provider negotiated rates, (ii) historical
out-of-network allowed amounts and billed charges and (iii) in-network negotiated rates and historical net prices for all covered
prescription drugs. Beginning in 2021, insurers will be able to receive credit in their MLR calculations for certain savings they share
with enrollees. Separately, in December 2020, Congress passed the No Surprises Act which prohibits health care providers, in certain
situations, from balance billing the patient and requires that they work directly with insurers to agree on out-of-network
reimbursement, including utilizing an independent dispute resolution process outlined in the Act. The Act is effective January 1,
2022 and we expect regulations implementing the Act to be issued starting in 2021. Many states already have addressed balance
billing, or surprise medical bills. These laws and regulations vary in their approach, resulting in different impacts on the health care
system as a whole.
Additionally, most states have consumer protection laws that have been the basis for investigations and multistate settlements
relating to financial incentives provided by drug manufacturers to retail pharmacies in connection with product conversion programs.
Such statutes have also been cited as the basis for claims or investigations by state attorneys general relative to privacy and data
security.
Office of Foreign Assets Control Sanctions and Anti-Money Laundering
We are also subject to regulation by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Department of the Treasury that administers and
enforces economic and trade sanctions against targeted foreign countries and regimes based on U.S. foreign policy and national
security goals. Certain of our products are subject to the Department of the Treasury anti-money laundering regulations under the
Bank Secrecy Act. In addition, we are subject to similar regulations in non-U.S. jurisdictions in which we operate.
Corporate Practice of Medicine and Other Laws
Many states in which our subsidiaries operate limit the practice of medicine to licensed individuals or professional organizations
comprised of licensed individuals, and business corporations generally may not exercise control over the medical decisions of
28
physicians. Statutes and regulations relating to the practice of medicine, fee-splitting between physicians and referral sources and
similar issues vary widely from state to state. Under management agreements between certain of our subsidiaries and physician-
owned professional groups, these groups retain sole responsibility for all medical decisions, as well as for hiring and managing
physicians and other licensed health care providers, developing operating policies and procedures, implementing professional
standards and controls and maintaining malpractice insurance. We believe that our health services operations comply with applicable
state statutes regarding corporate practice of medicine, fee-splitting and similar issues. However, any enforcement actions by
governmental officials alleging noncompliance with these statutes could subject us to penalties or restructuring or reorganization of
our business.
Laws and Legislation Affecting Plan Design and Pharmacy Network Access
Some states have enacted laws that prohibit managed care plan sponsors from implementing certain restrictive benefit plan design
features, and many states have laws or have introduced legislation to regulate various aspects of managed care plans, including
provisions relating to the pharmacy benefit. For example, some states, under so-called “freedom of choice” legislation, provide
customers of the plan may not be required to use network providers, but must instead be provided with benefits even if they choose
to use non-network providers. Some states have also enacted legislation that can negatively impact the use of cost-saving network
configurations for plan sponsors. Other states have enacted legislation purporting to prohibit health plans from offering customers
financial incentives for use of home delivery pharmacies. Medicare and some states have issued guidance and regulations that limit
our ability to fill or refill prescriptions electronically submitted by a physician to our home delivery pharmacy without first obtaining
consent from the patient. Such restrictions generate additional costs and limit our ability to maximize efficiencies, which could
otherwise be gained through the electronic prescription and automatic refill processes. Legislation has been introduced in some states
to prohibit or restrict therapeutic intervention, or to require coverage of all Food and Drug Administration approved drugs. Other
states mandate coverage of certain benefits or conditions, and require health plan coverage of specific drugs if deemed medically
necessary by the prescribing physician. States are also standardizing the process for, and restricting the use of, utilization
management rules and shortening the time frames within which prescription drug prior authorization determinations must be made.
Even where states do not regulate pharmacy benefit or utilization management companies directly, these laws will apply to many of
our clients, including managed care organizations and health insurers.
Additionally, Medicare Part D and a majority of states now have laws, regulations or some form of legislation affecting our ability, or
our clients’ ability, to limit access to a pharmacy provider network or remove a provider from a network. Such laws, regulations or
legislation may require us or our clients to admit any retail pharmacy or provider willing to meet the plan’s terms and conditions for
network participation (“any willing provider”) or may direct that a provider may not be removed from a network except in
compliance with certain procedures (“due process”).
Certain states have laws prohibiting certain pharmacy benefit management clients from imposing additional co-payments,
deductibles, limitations on benefits, or other conditions on covered individuals utilizing a retail pharmacy when the same conditions
are not otherwise imposed on covered individuals utilizing home delivery pharmacies. However, the laws require the retail pharmacy
to agree to the same reimbursement amounts and terms and conditions as are imposed on the home delivery pharmacies. An increase
in the number of prescriptions filled at retail pharmacies may have a negative impact on the number of prescriptions filled through
home delivery.
Pharmacy Benefit Management and Drug Pricing Regulation
Our pharmacy benefit management services are subject to numerous laws and regulations. These laws and regulations govern, and
proposed legislation and regulations may govern, critical practices, including disclosure, receipt and retention of rebates and other
payments received from pharmaceutical manufacturers; certain pharmacy contracting practices including disclosure of cost
information to customers; the receipt and retention of transmission fees from contracted pharmacies; use of, administration of, or
changes to drug formularies, the use and disclosure of maximum allowable cost ("MAC") pricing, or clinical programs; “most
favored nation” pricing, which provides that a pharmacy participating in a specific government program must give the program the
best price the pharmacy makes available to any third-party plan; disclosure of data to third parties; drug utilization management
practices; the level of duty a pharmacy benefit manager owes its clients or customers; configuration of pharmacy networks; the
operations of our subsidiary pharmacies; disclosure of negotiated provider reimbursement rates; disclosure of negotiated drug
rebates, calculation of certain customer cost-share for prescription drug claims; pricing that includes differential or spread (i.e., a
difference between the drug price charged to the plan sponsor by a pharmacy benefit manager and the price paid by the manager to
the dispensing provider); disclosure of fees associated with administrative service agreements and patient care programs that are
attributable to customers’ drug utilization; and registration or licensing of pharmacy benefit managers.
We expect federal and state governments to continue to prioritize means of addressing out-of-pocket costs for consumers,
particularly related to prescription drug costs. Policy proposals, issued via regulation or legislation, vary broadly in their approaches
to achieve that
29
goal. At the federal level, several executive orders were issued in 2020. Although the orders did not contain any policy changes that
take effect immediately, they directed agencies to pursue regulations intended to expand access to affordable prescription drug
medication through various methods. Resulting regulations from HHS and its agencies: outlined paths for certain prescription drugs
to be imported from Canada under the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, effective November 30, 2020; amended the anti-
kickback safe harbors to eliminate the regulatory safe harbor protection for price concessions, including rebates, that are offered by
pharmaceutical manufacturers to plan sponsors or pharmacy benefit managers under the Medicare Part D program effective January
2023 and created new safe harbors related to point-of-sale price reductions and fixed-fee service arrangements, as described above
under the heading “Anti-Kickback and Referral Laws;” issued rules intended to implement a program to make insulin and
epinephrine available at participating federally qualified health centers at pricing under the Public Health Service Act Section 340B
program effective March 22, 2021; and established a demonstration of the most favored nation international pricing model, an
approach to international reference pricing, for Medicare Part B drugs which was subsequently halted by court intervention. As
noted earlier, the executive order issued in January 2021 regarding a regulatory freeze pending review may delay or ultimately result
in revision or repeal of various actions taken in response to the 2020 executive orders.
Additionally, proposals at the federal and state levels consider increased regulation of pharmacy benefit managers and health plans as
a means to limit consumer out of pocket costs, including proposing to limit the use of various pharmacy benefit management tools;
mandating the treatment of fees, discounts or financing mechanisms that otherwise are set in private contractual terms; increasing
supply chain transparency; expanding regulatory requirements or definitions of fiduciaries; or mandating plan benefit designs that
cap consumer out-of-pocket expense.
Some states have enacted statutes regulating the use of MAC pricing. These statutes, referred to as “MAC Transparency Laws,”
generally require pharmacy benefit managers to disclose specific information related to MAC pricing to pharmacies and provide
certain appeal rights for pharmacies. MAC Transparency Laws also restrict the application of MAC and may require operational
changes to maintain compliance with the law. Some states have also enacted laws regulating pharmacy pricing and protecting the
profitability of pharmacies for dispensing certain MAC-priced drugs. Some states have enacted laws requiring that the customer
cost-share for a prescription drug claim not exceed certain price points, such as the pharmacy’s usual and customary charge or its
contracted reimbursement for the drug. In a recent Supreme Court decision, the Court found that certain MAC Transparency Laws
may be applied by states to ERISA plans in addition to health plans regulated by the applicable state. We continue to assess the
impact of the decision on other state laws seeking to regulate pharmacy benefit management services.
In March 2018, the NAIC adopted changes to the Health Carrier Prescription Drug Benefit Management Model Act. The changes
address issues relating to (i) transparency, accuracy and disclosure regarding prescription drug formularies and formulary changes
during a policy year; (ii) accessibility of prescription drug benefits using a variety of pharmacy options; and (iii) tiered prescription
drug formularies and discriminatory benefit design. While the actions of the NAIC do not have the force of law, they are used as a
template to influence states to adopt laws based on the model legislation. An enhanced NAIC model act on pharmacy benefit
manager licensure and regulation was adopted by a subgroup of the NAIC subject to a thirty day comment period with further
consideration expected to occur in 2021.
The federal Medicaid Drug Rebate Program requires participating drug manufacturers to provide rebates on all drugs reimbursed
through state Medicaid programs, including through Medicaid managed care organizations. Manufacturers of brand-name products
must provide a rebate equivalent to the greater of (a) 23.1% of the average manufacturer price (“AMP”) paid by retail community
pharmacies or by wholesalers for certain drugs distributed to retail community pharmacies, or (b) the difference between AMP and
the “best price” available to essentially any customer other than the Medicaid program and certain other government programs, with
certain exceptions. We negotiate rebates with drug manufacturers and, in certain circumstances, sell services to drug manufacturers.
Investigations are being and have been conducted by certain government entities which call into question whether a drug’s “best
price” was properly calculated and reported with respect to rebates paid by the manufacturers to the Medicaid programs. We are not
responsible for such calculations, reports or payments.
Pharmacy Regulation
Our home delivery and specialty pharmacies also subject us to extensive federal, state and local regulation. The practice of pharmacy
is generally regulated at the state level by state boards of pharmacy. We are licensed to do business as a pharmacy in the states in
which our pharmacies are located. Most of the states into which we deliver pharmaceuticals have laws that require out-of-state home
delivery pharmacies to register with, or be licensed by, the board of pharmacy or a similar regulatory body in the state. These states
generally permit the pharmacy to follow the laws of the state where the pharmacy is located, although some states require
compliance with certain laws in that state as it impacts or relates to drugs distributed or dispensed into that state.
30
Our various pharmacy facilities also provide services under certain Medicare and state Medicaid programs. Participation in these
programs requires our pharmacies to comply with the applicable Medicare and Medicaid provider rules and regulations, and exposes
the pharmacies to various changes the federal and state governments may impose regarding reimbursement methodologies and
amounts to be paid to participating providers under these programs. In addition, several of our pharmacy facilities are participating
providers under Medicare Part D and are required to adhere to certain requirements applicable to Medicare Part D. Additionally, we
are subject to CMS rules regarding the administration of our Medicare plans and pricing between our plans and related parties,
including our pharmacy business.
Other statutes and regulations affect our home delivery and specialty pharmacy operations, including the federal and state anti-
kickback laws and the federal civil monetary penalty law described above. Federal and state statutes and regulations govern the
labeling, packaging, advertising, adulteration and security of prescription drugs and the dispensing of controlled substances and
certain of our pharmacies must register with the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration and individual state controlled substance
authorities. The FTC requires mail order sellers of goods generally to engage in truthful advertising, to stock a reasonable supply of
the product to be sold, to fill mail orders within thirty days and to provide clients with refunds when appropriate. The United States
Postal Service also has significant statutory authority to restrict the delivery of drugs and medicines through the mail.
Financial Reporting, Internal Control and Corporate Governance
Regulators closely monitor the financial condition of licensed insurance companies and HMOs. States regulate the form and content
of statutory financial statements, the type and concentration of permitted investments and corporate governance over financial
reporting. Our insurance and HMO subsidiaries are required to file periodic financial reports and schedules with regulators in most
of the jurisdictions in which they do business as well as annual financial statements audited by independent registered public
accounting firms. Certain insurance and HMO subsidiaries are required to file an annual report of internal control over financial
reporting with most jurisdictions in which they do business. Insurance and HMO subsidiaries’ operations and financial statements are
subject to examination by such agencies. Many states have expanded regulations relating to corporate governance and internal
control activities of insurance and HMO subsidiaries as a result of model regulations adopted by the NAIC with elements similar to
corporate governance and risk oversight disclosure requirements under federal securities laws.
Guaranty Associations, Indemnity Funds, Risk Pools and Administrative Funds
Most states and certain non-U.S. jurisdictions require insurance companies to support guaranty associations or indemnity funds that
are established to pay claims on behalf of insolvent insurance companies. Some states have similar laws relating to HMOs and other
payors, such as consumer operated and oriented plans (co-ops) established under the ACA. In the United States, these associations
levy assessments on member insurers licensed in a particular state to pay such claims. Certain states require HMOs to participate in
guaranty funds, special risk pools and administrative funds. For additional information about guaranty funds and other assessments,
see Note 21 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Certain states continue to require health insurers and HMOs to participate in assigned risk plans, joint underwriting authorities, pools
or other residual market mechanisms to cover risks not acceptable under normal underwriting standards, although some states have
eliminated these requirements as a result of the ACA.
Solvency and Capital Requirements
Many states have adopted some form of the NAIC model solvency-related laws and risk-based capital (“RBC”) rules for life and
health insurance companies and HMOs. The RBC rules recommend a minimum level of capital depending on the types and quality
of investments held, the types of business written and the types of liabilities incurred. If the ratio of the insurer’s adjusted surplus to
its RBC falls below statutorily required minimums, the insurer could be subject to regulatory actions ranging from increased scrutiny
to conservatorship.
In addition, various non-U.S. jurisdictions prescribe minimum surplus requirements that are based upon solvency, liquidity and
reserve coverage measures. Our HMOs and life and health insurance subsidiaries, as well as non-U.S. insurance subsidiaries, are
compliant with applicable RBC and non-U.S. surplus rules.
The Risk Management and Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Model Act (“ORSA”), adopted by the NAIC, provides requirements
and principles for maintaining a group solvency assessment and a risk management framework and reflects a broader approach to
U.S. insurance regulation. ORSA includes a requirement to file an annual ORSA Summary Report in the lead state of domicile. To
date, an overwhelming majority of the states have adopted the same or similar versions of ORSA. We file our ORSA report annually
as required.
31
Holding Company Laws
Our domestic insurance companies and certain of our HMOs are subject to state laws regulating subsidiaries of insurance holding
companies. Under such laws, certain dividends, distributions and other transactions between an insurance company or an HMO
subsidiary and its affiliates may require notification to, or approval by, one or more state insurance commissioners. In addition, the
holding company acts of states in which our subsidiaries are domiciled restrict the ability of any person to obtain control of an
insurance company or HMO subsidiary without prior regulatory approval. State holding company laws and regulations also subject
our insurance companies and certain HMO subsidiaries to additional regulatory scrutiny related to their oversight of affiliates
performing regulated services on behalf of the insurance company or HMO and require the Company to file an annual Enterprise
Risk Report, which summarizes material risks that could pose enterprise risk to the insurance company subsidiaries.
Marketing, Advertising and Products
In most states, our insurance companies and HMO subsidiaries are required to certify compliance with applicable advertising
regulations on an annual basis. Our insurance companies and HMO subsidiaries are also required by most states to file and secure
regulatory approval of products prior to the marketing, advertising and sale of such products.
Licensing and Registration Requirements
Our insurance companies and HMO subsidiaries must be licensed by the jurisdictions in which they conduct business. Additionally,
certain subsidiaries contract to provide claim administration, utilization management and other related services for the administration
of self-insured benefit plans. These subsidiaries may be subject to state third-party administration and other licensing requirements
and regulation, as well as third-party accreditation requirements.
We have received full accreditation for Utilization Review Accreditation Commission Pharmacy Benefit Management version 2.2
Standards, which includes quality standards for drug utilization management, and select subsidiaries have received full accreditation
for Utilization Review Accreditation Commission for Health Utilization Management version 7.2, which includes quality standards
for medical utilization management.
Certain states have adopted pharmacy benefit management registration, licensure or disclosure laws. In addition to registration laws,
some states have adopted legislation mandating disclosure of various aspects of our financial practices, including those concerning
pharmaceutical company revenue, as well as prescribing processes for prescription switching programs and client and provider audit
terms.
Our international subsidiaries are often required to be licensed when entering new markets or starting new operations in certain
jurisdictions. The licensure requirements for these subsidiaries vary by country and are subject to change.
International Regulations
Our operations outside the United States expose us to laws of multiple jurisdictions and the rules and regulations of various
governing bodies and regulators, including those related to the provision of insurance, financial and other disclosures, the provision
of health care-related services, corporate governance, privacy, data protection, data mining, data transfer, intellectual property, labor
and employment, consumer protection, direct-to-consumer communications activities, tax, anti-corruption and anti-money
laundering. Foreign laws and rules may include requirements that are different from, or more stringent than, similar requirements in
the United States.
Our operations in countries outside the United States:
•are subject to local regulations of the jurisdictions where we operate;
•in some cases, are subject to regulations in the jurisdictions where customers reside; and
•in all cases, are subject to the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (“FCPA”).
In particular, in South Korea, regulators are focused on protecting the rights of individual customers by enforcing “Treating
Customers Fairly” concepts. This regulatory focus has resulted in rigorous data localization requirements, network separation
obligations and system monitoring restrictions, as well as obligations to closely monitor marketing communications and sales scripts.
Anti-money laundering requirements in South Korea and other countries where we do business also may impose obligations to
collect certain information about each customer at time of sale or to risk rank each customer to determine possible future money
laundering risk.
The FCPA prohibits offering, promising, providing or authorizing others to give anything of value to a foreign government official or
employee to obtain or retain business or otherwise secure a business advantage. Outside of the United States, we may interact with
32
government officials in several different capacities: as regulators of our insurance business; as clients or partners who are state-
owned or partially state-owned; as health care providers who are employed by the government; as hospitals that are state-owned; and
as officials issuing permits in connection with real estate transactions. Violations of the FCPA and other anti-corruption laws may
result in severe criminal and civil sanctions as well as other penalties, and the SEC and DOJ have increased their enforcement
activities with respect to FCPA. The UK Bribery Act of 2010 applies to all companies with a nexus to the United Kingdom. Under
this act, any voluntary disclosures of FCPA violations may be shared with United Kingdom authorities, thus potentially exposing
companies to liability and potential penalties in multiple jurisdictions. Other countries in which we do business also have anti-
corruption laws to which we are subject.
33
Item 1A. RISK FACTORS
As a large global health service company operating in a complex industry, we encounter a variety of risks and uncertainties, which
could have a material adverse effect on our business, liquidity, results of operations, financial condition or the trading price of our
securities. You should carefully consider each of the risks and uncertainties discussed below, together with other information
contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, including Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Results of Operations and
Financial Condition. These risks and uncertainties are not the only ones we face. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently
known to us or that we currently believe to be immaterial may also adversely affect us. The following risk factors have been
organized by category for ease of use; however many of the risks may have impacts in more than one category. These categories,
therefore, should be viewed as a starting point for understanding the significant risks facing us and not as a limitation on the
potential impact of the matters discussed. Risk factors are not necessarily listed in order of importance.
Strategic and Operational Risks
Future performance of our business will depend on our ability to execute our strategic and operational initiatives effectively.
The future performance of our business will depend in large part on our ability to effectively implement and execute our strategic and
operational initiatives. Successfully executing on these initiatives depends on a number of factors, including our ability to:
•differentiate our products, services and solutions from those of our competitors;
•develop, introduce and partner to bring forward new and innovative products, solutions or programs that focus on improving
patient outcomes and assist in controlling costs or are in response to government regulation and the increased focus on
consumer-directed products;
•develop and create data and analytic solutions to support and improve outcomes for our products, services and solutions,
including creating and developing solutions and services through partnerships with other industry participants;
•grow our product portfolio, expand our addressable markets and identify and introduce the proper mix, coordination or
integration of products that will be accepted by the marketplace;
•evaluate drugs for efficacy, value and price to assist clients in selecting a cost-effective formulary;
•offer cost-effective home delivery pharmacy and specialty services;
•access or continue accessing key drugs and successfully penetrate key treatment categories in our specialty pharmacy business;
•leverage purchase volume to deliver discounts to health benefit providers;
•attract and retain sufficient numbers of qualified employees;
•attract, develop and maintain collaborative relationships with a sufficient number of qualified partners;
•attract new and maintain existing customer and client relationships;
•transition health care providers from volume-based fee-for-service arrangements to a value-based system;
•improve medical cost competitiveness in our targeted markets;
•manage our medical, pharmacy, administrative and other operating costs effectively; and
•contract with health care providers, pharmacy providers and pharmaceutical manufacturers on favorable terms.
For our strategic initiatives to succeed, we must effectively collaborate across our operations, integrate our acquired businesses,
actively work to ensure consistency throughout the organization and promote a global mind-set along with a focus on individual
customers and clients. If we fail to do so, our business may be unable to grow as planned, or the result of expansion may be
unsatisfactory. We will be unable to rapidly respond to competitive, economic and regulatory changes if we do not make important
strategic and operational decisions quickly, define our appetite for risk, implement new governance, managerial and organizational
processes smoothly and communicate roles and responsibilities clearly. If these initiatives fail or are not executed effectively, our
consolidated financial position and results of operations could be negatively affected.
We operate in a highly competitive, evolving and rapidly changing industry and our failure to adapt could negatively impact our
business.
The health service industry continues to be dynamic and rapidly evolving. Any significant shifts in the structure of the industry could
alter industry dynamics and adversely affect our ability to attract or retain clients and customers. Industry shifts could result (and
have resulted) from, among other things:
•a large intra- or inter-industry merger or industry consolidation;
•strategic alliances;
•new or alternative business models or new government options or offerings;
•continuing consolidation among physicians, hospitals and other health care providers, as well as changes in the organizational
structures chosen by physicians, hospitals and health care providers;
34
•new market entrants, including those not traditionally in the health service industry;
•the ability of larger employers and clients to contract directly with providers;
•technological changes and rapid shifts in the use of technology, such as telehealth;
•the impact or consequences of legislation or regulatory changes;
•changes in the United States Postal Service or the consolidation of shipping carriers;
•increased drug acquisition cost or unexpected changes to drug pricing trend;
•changes in the generic drug market or the failure of new generic drugs to come to market; or
•changes in utilization of health care, prescription drugs or other covered services and items, including under risk-based contracts
in the health benefit management market and for those businesses that utilize risk adjustment methodology.
Our failure to anticipate or appropriately adapt to changes in the industry could negatively impact our competitive position and
adversely affect our business and results of operations.
The scale, scope and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic continues to be unknown and the overall impact on our business,
operating results, cash flows or financial condition has been and may continue to be material.
The COVID-19 pandemic has adversely affected global economies, financial markets and the overall environment for our business,
and the extent to which it may impact our future results of operations and overall financial performance remains uncertain.
The COVID-19 pandemic has in some instances, and may continue to, heighten the potential adverse effects on our business,
operating results, cash flows or financial condition as described below or in other risk factors within this section of the Form 10-K
including, but not limited to, the likelihood of and impact from:
•unfavorable economic conditions on our clients and customers (both employers and individuals), health care providers,
pharmaceutical manufacturers, pharmacy providers and third-party vendors, as well as federal and state entities and programs;
•changes in medical claims submission and processing patterns or procedures; changes in customer base and product mix;
changes in utilization of prescription drugs, medical or other covered items or services, including increased behavioral health
services utilization; changes in medical cost trends; changes in our health management practices; and the introduction of new
benefits and products causing actual claims to exceed our estimates;
•changes in health care utilization patterns, provider billing practices and other external events that we cannot forecast or project
and over which we have little or no control impacting our ability to accurately predict, price for and manage health care costs
and ultimately our profitability, including impacts from care deferral on, among other things, risk adjustment revenue and acuity
of future care;
•increased costs or reductions in revenue, including costs for COVID-19-related care, testing and treatment and related cost-share
waivers for our customers; vaccine and other coverage mandates; and support for employees, clients, customers and providers;
•significant disruptions in service within our operations or among our key suppliers or other third parties, including decreased
worker productivity and operational and sales disruptions, including as a result of remote working arrangements, increased
medical, emergency or other leave, quarantines, government actions or restrictions;
•compliance with substantial government regulation, including privacy and security requirements associated with providing
telehealth and remote care options for individuals and new laws or regulations or changes in existing laws or regulations, such as
vaccine and coverage mandates and premium deferrals, which laws or regulations may vary significantly by jurisdiction;
•prioritization of matters relating to COVID-19 resulting in delays in responsiveness by regulatory agencies and other third
parties in matters arising in the ordinary course of business;
•cyberattacks or other privacy or data security incidents, including as a result of the transition to a remote work environment by
substantially all of our workforce and the workforces of third parties with whom we contract;
•significant shifts in the structure of the industry which could alter dynamics and, if we fail to adapt, negatively impact our
business;
•risks inherent in foreign operations, including political, legal, operational, regulatory, economic and other risks;
•economic and market conditions affecting the value of our financial instruments and the value of particular assets and liabilities;
and
•fluctuations in equity market prices, interest rates and credit spreads limiting our ability to raise or deploy capital and affecting
our overall liquidity.
Additionally, if we do not respond appropriately to the pandemic, or if our clients or customers do not perceive our response to be
adequate, we could suffer damage to our reputation, which could adversely affect our business.
We believe COVID-19’s adverse impact on our business, operating results, cash flows or financial condition will be driven primarily
by the severity and duration of the pandemic, including the impact of the breadth and timing of implementation and the efficacy and
costs of vaccination programs, the pandemic’s impact on our employees, clients, customers, suppliers and partners, as well as the
U.S.
35
and global economies and the continued actions taken by governmental authorities and other third parties in response to the
pandemic. Those primary drivers are largely beyond our knowledge and control, and may be more adverse than our current
expectations. Given these uncertainties, we cannot estimate the full impact COVID-19 will have on our business, operating results,
cash flows or financial condition, but the adverse impact could be material.
Our failure to compete effectively, to differentiate our products and services from those of our competitors and maintain or
increase market share could materially adversely affect our results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
We operate in a highly competitive environment and an industry subject to significant market pressures brought about by customer
and client needs, legislative and regulatory developments and other market factors. In particular markets, our competitors may have
greater, better or more established capabilities, resources, market share, reputation or business relationships, or lower profit margin
or financial return expectations. Our clients are well informed and organized and can easily move between our competitors and us.
Our Express Scripts client contracts generally have three-year terms and may be subject to periodic renegotiation of pricing terms
based on market factors. As described in greater detail in the description of our business in Item 1 of this Form 10-K, one of our key
clients in the Evernorth segment is the United States Department of Defense. If one or more of our large clients terminates or does
not renew a contract for any reason, including as a result of being acquired, or if the provisions of a contract with a large client are
modified, renewed or otherwise changed with terms less favorable to us, our results of operations could be adversely affected and we
could experience a negative reaction in the investment community resulting in decreases in the trading price of our securities or other
adverse effects.
Our success depends, in part, on our ability to compete effectively in our markets, set prices appropriately in highly competitive
markets to keep or increase our market share, increase customers as planned, differentiate our business offerings by innovating and
delivering products and services that provide enhanced value to our customers, provide quality and satisfactory levels of service and
retain accounts with favorable medical cost experience or more profitable products versus retaining or increasing our customer base
in accounts with unfavorable medical cost experience or less profitable products.
We must remain competitive to attract new customers, retain existing customers and further integrate additional product and service
offerings. To succeed in this highly competitive marketplace, it is imperative that we maintain a strong reputation. The negative
reputational impact of a significant event, including a failure to execute on customer or client contracts or strategic or operational
initiatives, failure to comply with applicable laws or regulations, or failure to innovate and deliver products and services that
demonstrate greater value to our customers, could affect our ability to grow and retain profitable arrangements, which could have a
material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
We face price competition and other pressures that could compress our margins or result in premiums that are insufficient to
cover the cost of services delivered to our customers.
While we compete on the basis of many service and quality-related factors, we expect that price will continue to be a significant
basis of competition. Our client contracts are subject to negotiation as clients seek to contain their costs, including by reducing
benefits offered. Increasingly, our clients seek to negotiate performance guarantees that require us to pay penalties if the guaranteed
performance standard is not met. Clients can easily move between our competitors and us. Our clients are well informed and
typically have knowledgeable consultants that seek competing bids from our competitors before contract renewal. In addition, as
brokers and benefit consultants seek to enhance their revenue streams, they look to take on services that we typically provide. Each
of these events could negatively impact our financial results.
Federal and state regulatory agencies may restrict or prevent entirely our ability to implement changes in premium rates. Fiscal or
other concerns related to the government-sponsored programs in which we participate, such as Medicare Advantage plans and
Medicare Part D plans, may cause decreasing reimbursement rates, delays in premium payments, restrictions on implementing
changes in premium rates or insufficient increases in reimbursement rates. Any limitation on our ability to maintain or increase our
premium or reimbursement levels, or a significant loss of customers or clients resulting from our need to increase or maintain
premium or reimbursement levels, could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Premiums in the U.S. Medical segment are generally set for one-year periods and are priced well in advance of the date on which the
contract commences or renews. Our revenue on Medicare Advantage plans, Individual and Family Plans (“IFP”) and Medicare Part
D plans is based on rates and bids submitted midyear in the year before the contract year. Although we base the premiums we charge
and our Medicare Advantage, IFP and Medicare Part D rates and bids on our estimate of future health care costs over the contract
period, actual costs may exceed what we estimate in setting premiums. Our health care costs also are affected by external events that
we cannot forecast or project and over which we have little or no control, including changes in regulations, as well as provider
billing practices and changes in customers’ health care utilization patterns, which may, among other things, impact our ability to
appropriately document their health conditions. Our participation in health insurance exchanges through our IFP offerings involves
36
uncertainties associated with mix and volume of business and could adversely affect our results of operations, financial position and
cash flows. Our profitability depends, in part, on our ability to accurately predict, price for and effectively manage future health care
costs. Relatively small differences between predicted and actual medical costs or utilization rates as a percentage of revenue can
result in significant changes in our financial results.
Strong competition within the pharmacy benefit business has also generated greater demand for lower product and service pricing,
increased revenue sharing and enhanced product and service offerings. These competitive factors have historically applied pressure
on our operating margins and caused many companies, including us, to reduce the prices charged for products and services while
sharing with clients a greater portion of the formulary fees and related rebates received from pharmaceutical manufacturers. Our
inability to maintain positive trends, or failure to identify and implement new ways to mitigate pricing pressures, could negatively
impact our ability to attract or retain clients or sell additional services, which could negatively impact our margins and have a
material adverse effect on our business and results of operations.
The reserves we hold for expected medical claims are based on estimates that involve an extensive degree of judgment and are
inherently variable. If actual claims exceed our estimates, our operating results could be materially adversely affected, and our
ability to take timely corrective actions to contain future costs may be limited.
We maintain and record medical claims reserves on our balance sheet for estimated future payments. Our estimates of health care
costs payable are based on a number of factors, including historical claim experience, but this estimation process requires extensive
judgment. Considerable variability is inherent in such estimates, and the accuracy of the estimates is highly sensitive to changes in
medical claims submission and processing patterns or procedures, changes in customer base and product mix, changes in the
utilization of prescription drugs, medical or other covered items or services, changes in medical cost trends, changes in our health
management practices, changes in regulations and the introduction of new benefits and products. If we are not able to accurately and
promptly anticipate and detect medical cost trends, our ability to take timely corrective actions to limit future costs and reflect our
current benefit cost experience in our pricing process may be limited. Additionally, we must estimate the amount of rebates payable
by us under the ACA’s and CMS’ minimum loss ratio rules and the amounts payable by us to, and receivable by us from, the United
States federal government under the ACA’s remaining premium stabilization program. Because establishing reserves is an inherently
uncertain process involving estimates of future losses, there can be no certainty that ultimate losses will not exceed existing reserves
which may adversely affect our results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
If we fail to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with physicians, hospitals and other health service providers and with
producers and consultants, our business and results of operations may be adversely affected.
We contract with or employ physicians, hospitals and other health service providers and facilities to provide health services to our
customers. Our results of operations are substantially dependent on our ability to contract for these services at competitive prices. In
any particular market, physicians, hospitals and health service providers may enter into exclusive arrangements with competitors or
simply refuse to contract with us, demand higher payments or take other actions that could result in higher medical costs or less
desirable products or services for our customers. In some markets, certain providers, particularly hospitals, physician/hospital
organizations and multispecialty physician groups, may have significant or controlling market positions that could result in a
diminished bargaining position for us. If providers refuse to contract with us, use their market position to negotiate more favorable
contracts or place us at a competitive disadvantage, our ability to market products or to be profitable in those areas could be
materially adversely affected. Additionally, certain regulations may impact our ability to obtain competitive prices. Establishing
collaborative arrangements with physician groups, specialist groups, independent practice associations, hospitals and health care
delivery systems is key to our strategic focus to transition from volume-based fee-for-service arrangements to a value-based health
care system. If such collaborative arrangements do not result in the lower medical costs that we project or if we fail to attract health
care providers to such arrangements, or are less successful at implementing such arrangements than our competitors, our
attractiveness to customers may be reduced and our ability to profitably grow our business may be adversely affected.
Our ability to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with providers may also be negatively impacted by other factors not
associated with us, such as changes in Medicare or Medicaid reimbursement levels, increasing pressure on revenue and other
pressures on health care providers and increasing consolidation activity among hospitals, physician groups and providers. Continuing
consolidation among physicians, hospitals and other providers, the emergence of accountable care organizations, vertical integration
of providers and other entities, changes in the organizational structures chosen by physicians, hospitals and providers and new
market entrants, including those not traditionally in the health care industry, may affect the way providers interact with us and may
change the competitive landscape in which we operate. In some instances, these organizations may compete directly with us,
potentially affecting the way we price our products and services or causing us to incur increased costs if we change our operations to
be more competitive.
37
Out-of-network providers are not limited by any agreement with us in the amounts they bill. While benefit plans place limits on the
amount of charges that will be considered for reimbursement and regulations seek to prescribe payment levels, establish
methodologies and dispute resolution processes, out-of-network providers are increasingly sophisticated and aggressive. As a result,
the outcome of disputes where we do not have a provider contract may cause us to pay higher medical or other benefit costs than we
projected.
Additionally, certain of our products and services are sold in part through nonexclusive producers and consultants for whose services
and allegiance we compete. Our sales could be materially adversely affected if we are unable to attract, retain and support such
independent producers and consultants or if our sales strategy is not appropriately aligned across distribution channels.
If we lose our relationship with one or more key pharmaceutical manufacturers, or if the payments made or discounts provided
by pharmaceutical manufacturers decline, our business and results of operations could be adversely affected.
We maintain contractual relationships with numerous pharmaceutical manufacturers, which provide us with, among other things:
•discounts for drugs we purchase to be dispensed from our home delivery and specialty pharmacies;
•discounts, in the form of rebates, for drug utilization;
•fees for administering rebate programs, including invoicing, allocating and collecting rebates;
•fees for services provided to pharmaceutical manufacturers by our specialty pharmacies; and
•access to limited distribution specialty pharmaceuticals by our specialty pharmacies.
Our contracts with pharmaceutical manufacturers are typically nonexclusive and terminable on relatively short notice by either party.
The consolidation of pharmaceutical manufacturers, the termination or material alteration of our contractual relationships, or our
failure to renew such contracts on favorable terms could have a material adverse effect on our business and results of operations. In
addition, arrangements between payors and pharmaceutical manufacturers have been the subject of debate in federal and state
legislatures and various other public and governmental forums. Adoption of new laws, rules or regulations or changes in, or new
interpretations of, existing laws, rules or regulations, relating to any of these programs could materially adversely affect our business
and results of operations.
If significant changes occur within the pharmacy provider marketplace, or if other issues arise with respect to our pharmacy
networks, including the loss of or adverse change in our relationship with one or more key pharmacy providers, our business and
financial results could be adversely affected.
More than 67,700 pharmacies participated in one or more of our networks as of December 31, 2020. The ten largest retail pharmacy
chains represent approximately 64% of the total number of stores in our largest network. In certain geographic areas of the United
States, our networks may be comprised of higher concentrations of one or more large pharmacy chains. Contracts with retail
pharmacies are generally nonexclusive and are terminable on relatively short notice by either party. If one or more of the larger
pharmacy chains terminates its relationship with us, or is able to renegotiate terms substantially less favorable to us, our customers’
access to retail pharmacies or our business could be materially adversely affected. The entry of one or more additional large
pharmacy chains into the pharmacy benefit management business, the consolidation of existing pharmacy chains or increased
leverage or market share by the largest pharmacy providers could increase the likelihood of negative changes in our relationship with
such pharmacies. Changes in the overall composition of our pharmacy networks, or reduced pharmacy access under our networks,
could have a negative impact on our claims volume or our competitiveness in the marketplace, which could cause us to fall short of
certain guarantees in our contracts with clients or otherwise impair our business or results of operations.
Changes in drug pricing or industry pricing benchmarks could materially impact our financial performance.
Contracts in the prescription drug industry, including our contracts with retail pharmacy networks and our pharmacy and specialty
pharmacy clients, generally use pricing metrics published by third parties as benchmarks to establish pricing for prescription drugs.
If these benchmarks are no longer published by third parties, we, or our contractual partners, adopt other pricing benchmarks for
establishing prices within the industry, legislation or regulation requires the use of other pricing benchmarks, or future changes in
drug prices substantially deviate from our expectations, the short- or long-term impacts may have a material adverse effect on our
business and results of operations.
As a global company, we face political, legal, operational, regulatory, economic and other risks that present challenges and could
negatively affect our multinational operations or our long-term growth.
As a global company, our business is increasingly exposed to risks inherent in foreign operations. These risks can vary substantially
by market, and include political, legal, operational, regulatory, economic and other risks, including government intervention that we
38
do not face in our U.S. operations. The global nature of our business and operations may present challenges including, but not
limited to, those arising from:
•geopolitical business conditions and demands, including the United Kingdom’s withdrawal from the European Union;
•regulation that may discriminate against U.S. companies, favor nationalization or expropriate assets;
•price controls or other pricing issues and exchange controls; restrictions that prevent us from transferring funds out of the
countries in which we operate; foreign currency exchange rates and fluctuations and restrictions on converting currencies from
foreign operations into other currencies; uncertainty with respect to the interpretation of tax positions;
•reliance on local employees and interpretations of labor laws in foreign jurisdictions;
•managing our partner relationships in countries outside of the United States;
•providing data protection on a global basis and sufficient levels of technical support in different locations;
•the global trend for companies to enact local data residency requirements;
•acts of civil unrest, war and terrorism, as well as other political and economic conflicts such as through imposition of economic
or political sanctions;
•man-made disasters, natural disasters and pandemics, such as the COVID-19 pandemic, in locations where we operate; and
•general economic and political conditions.
These factors may increase in significance as we continue to expand globally and operating in new foreign markets may require
considerable management time before operations generate any significant revenues and earnings. Any one of these challenges could
negatively affect our operations or long term growth. For example, due to the concentration of our international business in South
Korea, the International Markets segment is exposed to potential losses resulting from economic and regulatory changes in that
country and the geopolitical climate in the Korean Peninsula, as well as foreign currency movements affecting the South Korean
currency, that could have a significant impact on the segment’s results and our consolidated financial results.
International operations also require us to devote significant resources to implement controls and systems in new markets to comply
with, and to ensure that our vendors and partners comply with, U.S. and foreign laws prohibiting bribery, corruption and money
laundering, in addition to other regulations regarding, among other things, our products, direct-to-consumer communications,
customer privacy, data protection and data residency. Violations of these laws and regulations could result in fines, criminal sanctions
against us, our officers or employees, restrictions or outright prohibitions on the conduct of our business and significant reputational
harm. Our success depends, in part, on our ability to anticipate these risks and manage these challenges. Our failure to comply with
laws and regulations governing our conduct outside the United States or to establish constructive relations with non-U.S. regulators
could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and long-term growth.
Strategic transactions involve risks and we may not realize the expected benefits because of integration difficulties,
underperformance relative to our expectations and other challenges.
As part of our strategy, we regularly consider and enter into strategic transactions, including mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures,
licensing arrangements, divestitures and other relationships (collectively referred to as “strategic transactions”). There is significant
competition for attractive targets and opportunities and we may be unable to identify and successfully complete strategic transactions
in the future. In addition, from time to time, we evaluate alternatives for our businesses that do not meet our strategic, growth or
profitability objectives, and we may divest or wind down such businesses. We may be unable to complete any such divestiture on
terms favorable to us, within the expected timeframes, or at all. We may have continued financial exposure to divested businesses
following the completion of any such transaction, including increased costs due to potential litigation, contingent liabilities and
indemnification of the buyer related to, among other things, lawsuits, regulatory matters or tax liabilities.
Our ability to achieve the anticipated benefits of strategic transactions, including synergies, cost savings, innovation and operational
efficiencies, is subject to numerous uncertainties and risks, including our ability to successfully combine or separate business
operations, resources and systems, including data security systems and internal financial control standards, in an efficient and
effective manner. Integration and separation activities may result in additional and unforeseen expenses, and the anticipated benefits
may not be fully realized or may take longer to realize than expected. These activities are complex, costly and time-consuming and
may divert management’s attention from ongoing business concerns. Delays or issues encountered in these activities could have a
material adverse effect on the revenues, expenses, operating results and financial condition of the company.
Strategic transactions could result in increased costs, including facilities and systems consolidation or separation costs and costs to
retain key employees, decreases in expected revenues, earnings or cash flows and goodwill or other intangible asset impairment
charges. As of December 31, 2020, our goodwill and other intangible assets had a carrying value of approximately $80 billion,
representing 51% of our total consolidated assets. The value of our goodwill may be materially and adversely impacted if the
businesses we acquire do not perform in a manner consistent with our assumptions. Future evaluations requiring an impairment to
39
goodwill and other intangible assets could materially affect our results of operations and shareholders’ equity in the period in which
the impairment occurs. A material decrease in shareholders’ equity could negatively impact our debt ratings or potentially impact our
compliance with existing debt covenants. In addition, the trading price of our securities may decline if, among other things, we are
unable to achieve our estimates of earnings growth and operational cost savings, or the transaction costs related to acquisitions,
integrations or divestitures are greater than expected. The trading price also may decline if we do not achieve the perceived benefits
of a transaction as rapidly or to the extent anticipated by financial or industry analysts.
Additionally, joint ventures and equity investments present risks that are different from acquisitions, including risks related to:
specific operations and finances of the businesses we invest in, selection of appropriate parties, differing objectives of the various
parties, competition between and among parties, compliance activities (including compliance with applicable CMS requirements),
growing the business in a manner acceptable to all the parties, maintaining positive relationships among the parties, clients and
customers, initial and ongoing governance of joint ventures and customer and business disruption that may occur upon a joint
venture termination.
Further, we may finance strategic transactions by issuing common stock for some or all of the purchase price that could dilute the
ownership interests of our shareholders, or by incurring additional debt that could increase costs and impact our ability to access
capital in the future.
In addition, effective internal controls are necessary to provide reliable and accurate financial reports and to mitigate the risk of
fraud. The integration of businesses is likely to cause increasing complexity in our systems and internal controls and make them
more difficult to manage. Any difficulties in assimilating businesses into our control system could cause us to fail to meet our
financial reporting obligations. We also rely on the internal controls and financial reporting controls of joint venture entities and
other entities in which we invest and their failure to maintain effectiveness or comply with applicable standards may materially and
adversely affect us. Ineffective internal controls could also cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial information
that could negatively impact the trading price of our securities and our access to capital.
We are dependent on the success of our relationships with third parties for various services and functions.
To improve operating costs, productivity and efficiencies, we contract with third parties for the provision of specific services. Our
operations may be adversely affected if a third party fails to satisfy its obligations to us, if the arrangement is terminated in whole or
in part or if there is a contractual dispute between us and the third party. Even though contracts are intended to provide certain
protections, we have limited control over the actions of third parties. For example, noncompliance with any privacy or security laws
and regulations, any security breach involving one of our third-party vendors or a dispute between us and a third-party vendor related
to our arrangement could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and
reputation.
Outsourcing also may require us to change our existing operations, adopt new processes for managing these service providers or
redistribute responsibilities to realize the potential productivity and operational efficiencies. If there are delays or difficulties in
changing business processes or our third-party vendors do not perform as expected, we may not realize, or not realize on a timely
basis, the anticipated economic and other benefits of these relationships. This could result in additional costs or regulatory
compliance issues or create other operational or financial problems for us. Terminating or transitioning, in whole or in part,
arrangements with key vendors could result in additional costs or penalties, risks of operational delays or potential errors and control
issues during the termination or transition phase. We may not be able to find an alternative vendor in a timely manner or on
acceptable terms. If there is an interruption in business or loss of access to data resulting from a security breach, termination or
transition in services, we may not be able to meet the demands of our customers and, in turn, our business and results of operations
could be adversely impacted.
A significant disruption in service within our operations or among our key suppliers or other third parties could materially
adversely affect our business and results of operations.
Our business is highly dependent upon our ability to perform, in an efficient and uninterrupted fashion, necessary business functions,
such as claims processing and payment, internet support and customer call centers, data centers and corporate facilities, processing
new and renewal business, maintaining appropriate shipment and storage conditions for prescriptions (such as temperature and
protection from contamination) and home delivery processing. In some instances, our ability to provide services or products
(including processing and dispensing prescriptions) depends on the availability of services and products provided by suppliers,
providers, pharmaceutical manufacturers, vendors or shipping carriers. A disruption, or threat of disruption, in our supply chain,
including as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, or inability to access or deliver products that meet requisite quality safety standards
in a timely and efficient manner could adversely impact our business. Additionally, any failure or disruption of our performance of,
or our ability to perform, key business functions, including through unavailability or cyberattack of our information technology
systems or those of third parties, could cause slower response times, decreased levels of service satisfaction and harm to our
reputation. Our information
40
technology and other systems interface with and depend on third-party systems and we could experience service denials if demand
for such service exceeds capacity or a third-party system fails or experiences an interruption. Our failure to implement adequate
business continuity and disaster recovery strategies could significantly reduce our ability to provide products and services to our
customers and clients, which could have material adverse effects on our business and results of operations.
Our business depends on our ability to effectively invest in, implement improvements to and properly maintain the uninterrupted
operation and data integrity of our information technology and other business systems.
Our business is highly dependent on maintaining effective information systems as well as the integrity and timeliness of the data we
use to serve our customers and health care providers and to operate our business. If our data were found to be inaccurate or
unreliable due to fraud or other error, or if we, or any of the third-party service providers we engage, were to fail to maintain
information systems and data integrity effectively, we could experience operational disruptions that may impact our clients,
customers and health care providers and hinder our ability to provide services and products, establish appropriate pricing for
products and services, retain and attract clients and customers, establish reserves and report financial results timely and accurately
and maintain regulatory compliance, among other things.
Our information technology strategy and execution are critical to our continued success. We must continue to invest in long-term
solutions that will enable us to anticipate customer needs and expectations, enhance the customer experience, act as a differentiator
in the market and protect against cybersecurity risks and threats. Our success is dependent, in large part, on maintaining the
effectiveness of existing technology systems and continuing to deliver and enhance technology systems that support our business
processes in a cost-efficient and resource-efficient manner. Increasing regulatory and legislative changes will place additional
demands on our information technology infrastructure that could have a direct impact on resources available for other projects tied to
our strategic initiatives. In addition, recent trends toward greater consumer engagement in health care require new and enhanced
technologies, including more sophisticated applications for mobile devices. Connectivity among technologies is becoming
increasingly important. We must also develop new systems to meet current market standards and keep pace with continuing changes
in information processing technology, evolving industry and regulatory standards and customer needs. Failure to do so may present
compliance challenges and impede our ability to deliver services in a competitive manner. Further, because system development
projects are long-term in nature, they may be more costly than expected to complete and may not deliver the expected benefits upon
completion. Our failure to effectively invest in, implement improvements to and properly maintain the uninterrupted operation and
data integrity of our information technology and other business systems could adversely affect our results of operations, financial
position and cash flow.
As a large health service company, we are subject to cyberattacks or other privacy or data security incidents. If we are unable to
prevent or contain the effects of any such attacks, we may suffer exposure to substantial liability, reputational harm, loss of
revenue or other damages.
Our business depends on our clients’ and customers’ willingness to entrust us with their health-related and other sensitive personal
information. Computer systems may be vulnerable to physical break-ins, computer viruses or malware, programming errors, attacks
by third parties or similar disruptive problems. We have been, and will likely continue to be, the target of computer viruses or other
malicious codes, unauthorized access, cyberattacks or other computer-related penetrations. There have been, and will likely continue
to be, large scale cyberattacks within the health service industry. Additionally, hardware, software or applications we develop or
procure from third parties may contain defects in design, manufacturer defects or other problems that could unexpectedly
compromise information technology. Human or technological error has and could in the future result in, for example, unauthorized
access to, disclosure, modification, misuse, loss, or destruction of company, customer, or other third-party data or systems; theft of
sensitive, regulated, or confidential data including personal information and intellectual property; the loss of access to critical data or
systems through ransomware, destructive attacks or other means; and business delays, service or system disruptions or denials of
service.
As we increase the amount of personal information that we store and share digitally, our exposure to unintended disclosures, data
security and related cybersecurity risks increases, including the risk of undetected attacks, damage, loss or unauthorized access or
misappropriation of proprietary or personal information, and the cost of attempting to protect against these risks also increases. If
disruptions, disclosures or breaches are not detected quickly, their effect could be compounded. We have implemented security
technologies, processes and procedures to protect consumer identity and provide employee awareness training around phishing,
malware and other cyber risks; however, there are no assurances that such measures will be effective against all types of breaches.
Cybersecurity threats are rapidly evolving and those threats and the means for obtaining access to our proprietary systems are
becoming increasingly sophisticated. Cyberattacks can originate from a wide variety of sources including third parties, such as
external service providers, and the techniques used change frequently or are often not recognized until after they have been launched.
Those parties may also attempt to fraudulently induce employees, customers or other users of our systems to disclose sensitive
information in order to gain access to our data or that of our customers. In addition, while we have certain standards for all vendors
41
that provide us services, our vendors, and in turn, their own service providers, may become subject to the same types of security
breaches. Finally, our offices may be vulnerable to security incidents or security attacks, acts of vandalism or theft, misplaced or lost
data, human error or similar events that could negatively affect our systems and our customers’ and clients’ data.
The costs to eliminate or address security threats and vulnerabilities before or after a cyber-incident could be significant. Our
remediation efforts may not be successful and could result in interruptions, delays, or cessation of service and loss of existing or
potential customers.
In addition, breaches of our security measures and the unauthorized dissemination of sensitive personal information, proprietary
information or confidential information about us, our customers or other third parties could expose our customers' private
information and our customers to the risk of financial or medical identity theft. Unauthorized dissemination of confidential and
proprietary information about our business and strategy could also negatively affect the achievement of our strategic initiatives. Such
events could cause us to breach our contractual obligations and violate applicable laws. These events would negatively affect our
ability to compete, others’ trust in us, our reputation, customer base and revenues and expose us to mandatory disclosure
requirements, litigation and other enforcement proceedings, material fines, penalties or remediation costs and compensatory, special,
punitive and statutory damages, consent orders and other adverse actions, any of which could adversely affect our business, results of
operations, financial condition or liquidity.
In managing medical practices and operating pharmacies, onsite clinics and other types of medical facilities, we may be subject to
additional liability that could result in significant time and expense.
In addition to contracting with physicians and other health care providers for services, we employ physicians, pharmacists, nurses
and other health care providers at our home delivery and specialty pharmacies, onsite low acuity and primary care practices and
infusion clinics that we manage and operate for our customers, as well as certain clinics for our employees. We also provide in-home
care through health care providers that we employ, as well as, through third-party contractors. As such, we may be subject to liability
for certain acts, omissions, or injuries caused by our employees or agents, or occurring at one of these practices, pharmacies or
clinics. The defense of any actions may require the diversion of personnel and other resources and the incurrence of significant costs
that could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and reputation.
Legal and Compliance Risks
Our business is subject to substantial government regulation, as well as new laws or regulations or changes in existing laws or
regulations that could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
Our business is regulated at the federal, state, local and international levels. The laws and rules governing our business and related
interpretations are increasing in number and complexity, are subject to frequent change and can be inconsistent or in conflict with
each other. Noncompliance with applicable regulations by us or our third-party vendors could have material adverse effects on our
business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and reputation.
We must identify, assess and respond to new trends in the legislative and regulatory environment, as well as comply with the various
existing regulations applicable to our business. There are currently pending, and in the future there will likely be, legislative or
regulatory proposals which seek to manage the health services industry, including managing prescription drug costs and health
records, as well as regulating drug distribution. We expect federal and state governments to continue to enact and seriously consider
many broad-based legislative and regulatory proposals that will or could materially impact various aspects of the health care and
related benefits system. In addition, changes to government policies not specifically targeted to the health services industry, such as a
change in tax laws and the corporate tax rate or government spending cuts, could have significant impacts on our business, results of
operations, financial condition and liquidity. The trading price of our securities may react to the announcement of such proposals. We
are unable to predict whether any such proposals will be enacted, or the specific terms thereof, including their effect on our
operations; however, certain of these proposals could, if enacted, adversely impact our business and results of operations.
Existing or future laws, rules, regulatory interpretations or judgments could force us to change how we conduct our business, affect
the products and services we offer and where we offer them, restrict revenue and enrollment growth, increase our costs, including
medical, operating, health care technology and administrative costs, and require enhancements to our compliance infrastructure and
internal controls environment. For example, a decision invalidating the ACA or portions thereof could result in material changes to
the way we conduct our business, as well as the loss of subsidies related to our IFP offerings. We are required to obtain and maintain
insurance and other regulatory approvals to, among other things, market many of our products, expand into additional geographic or
product markets, increase prices for certain regulated products and consummate some of our acquisitions and dispositions. Delays in
obtaining or failure to obtain or maintain these approvals could reduce our revenue or increase our costs. Existing or future laws and
rules could also require or lead us to take other actions such as changing our business practices, and could increase our liability.
42
Further, failure to effectively implement or adjust our strategic and operational initiatives, such as by reducing operating costs,
adjusting premium pricing or benefit design or transforming our business model in response to regulatory changes may have a
material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows.
For more information on regulations affecting our business, see “Business – Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 of this Form 10-K.
There are various risks associated with participating in government-sponsored programs, such as Medicare, including
dependence upon government funding, compliance with government contracts and increased regulatory oversight and
enforcement.
Through our U.S. Government business, we contract with CMS and various state governmental agencies to provide managed health
care services including Medicare Advantage plans and Medicare Part D plans. Additionally, our Evernorth business provides services
to government entities and payers participating in government health care programs.
Our revenues from government funded programs, including our Medicare programs and our government clients, are dependent, in
whole or in part, upon annual funding from the federal government or applicable state or local governments. Funding for these
programs is dependent on many factors outside our control, including general economic conditions, continuing government efforts to
contain health care costs and budgetary constraints at the federal or applicable state or local level and general political issues and
priorities. These entities generally have the right to not renew or cancel their contracts with us on short notice without cause or if
funds are not available. Unanticipated changes in funding, such as the application of sequestration by the federal or state
governments or the failure to provide for continued appropriations or regular ongoing scheduled payments to us, could substantially
reduce our revenues and profitability.
The Medicare program has been the subject of regulatory reform initiatives. The premium rates paid to Medicare Advantage plans
and Medicare Part D plans are established by contract, although the rates differ depending on a combination of factors, some of
which are outside our control. For example, the base premium rate paid differs depending upon a combination of various factors such
as defined upper payment limits, a member's health status, age, gender, county or region, benefit mix, member eligibility category
and risk scores. Additionally, a portion of each Medicare Advantage plan’s reimbursement is tied to the plan’s Star Rating, with those
plans receiving a rating of four or more stars eligible for quality-based bonus payments. A plan’s Star Rating affects its image in the
market and plans that perform well are able to offer enhanced benefits, market more effectively and for longer periods of time than
other plans. The Star Rating system is subject to change annually by CMS, which may make it more difficult to achieve four stars or
greater. Our Medicare Advantage plans’ and Medicare Part D plans’ operating results, premium revenue and benefit offerings are
likely to continue to be significantly determined by their Star Ratings. There can be no assurances that we will be successful in
maintaining or improving our Star Ratings in future years. In addition, audits of our performance for past or future periods may result
in downgrades to our Star Ratings. Accordingly, our plans may not be eligible for full level quality bonuses, which could adversely
affect the benefits such plans can offer, reduce membership or impact our financial performance. See Part II, Item 7 – Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Information – Industry Developments and Other Matters Affecting
our Evernorth and U.S. Medical Segments for additional information on our Star Ratings.
Additionally, if we fail to comply with CMS’ contractual requirements, including data submission, enrollment and marketing,
provider network adequacy, provider directory accuracy, quality measures, claims payment, continuity of care, timely and accurate
processing of appeals and grievances, oversight of first tier downstream and related entities and call center performance, we may be
subject to administrative actions, including enrollment sanctions or contract termination, fines or other penalties that could impact
our profitability. As described under “Business – Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 of this Form 10-K, on November 1, 2018, CMS
released a proposed rule that would revise its RADV methodology and, if adopted in its current form, could result in some
combination of degraded plan benefits, higher monthly premiums or reduced choice for the population served by all Medicare
Advantage insurers. While it is uncertain whether CMS will finalize the rule as proposed, if adopted, it could have a material impact
on the Company’s future results of operations.
Any failure to comply with various state and federal health care laws and regulations, including those directed at preventing fraud
and abuse in government funded programs, could result in investigations or litigation, such as actions under the federal False Claims
Act and similar whistleblower statutes under state laws. This could subject us to damage awards, including treble damages, fines,
penalties or other enforcement actions, restrictions on our ability to market or enroll new customers, limits on expansion, restrictions
or exclusions from programs or other agreements with federal or state governmental agencies, which could adversely impact our
business, cash flows, financial condition, results of operations and reputation.
43
We face risks related to litigation, regulatory audits and investigations.
We are routinely involved in numerous claims, lawsuits, regulatory audits, investigations and other legal matters arising, for the most
part, in the ordinary course of business. These legal matters could include benefit claims, breach of contract actions, tort claims,
claims arising from consumer protection laws, false claims act laws, claims disputes under federal or state laws and disputes
regarding reinsurance arrangements, employment and employment discrimination-related suits, antitrust claims, employee benefit
claims, wage and hour claims, tax, privacy, intellectual property and whistleblower claims, shareholder suits and other securities law
claims, real estate disputes, claims related to disclosure of certain business practices and claims arising from customer audits and
contract performance, including government contracts. In addition, we have incurred and likely will continue to incur liability for
practices and claims related to our health care business, such as marketing misconduct, failure to timely or appropriately pay for or
provide health care, provider network structure, poor outcomes for care delivered or arranged, provider disputes including disputes
over compensation or contractual provisions, ERISA claims, allegations related to calculations of cost sharing and claims related to
our administration of self-funded business. We are also routinely involved in legal matters arising from our health services business,
including without limitation claims related to the dispensing of pharmaceutical products by our home delivery and specialty
pharmacies, pharmacy benefit management services, such as formulary management services, health benefit management services
and provider services. There are currently, and may be in the future, attempts to bring class action lawsuits against the Company and
other companies in our industry; individual plaintiffs also may bring multiple claims regarding the same subject matter against us
and other companies in our industry.
Court decisions and legislative activity may increase our exposure for any of these types of claims. In some cases, substantial
noneconomic or punitive damages may be sought. We procure insurance coverage to cover some of these potential liabilities,
however we also self-insure a significant portion of our litigation risks. While we maintain some third-party insurance coverage,
including excess liability insurance with third-party insurance carriers, certain liabilities or types of damages, such as punitive
damages, may not be covered by insurance, insurers may dispute coverage or the amount of insurance may be insufficient to cover
the entire damages awarded. Resolving disputes is often expensive and disruptive, regardless of the outcome. Additionally, it is
possible that the resolution of current or future legal matters and claims could result in changes to our industry and business
practices, losses material to our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity or damage to our reputation.
We are frequently the subject of regulatory market conduct and other reviews, audits and investigations by state insurance and health
and welfare and pharmacy departments, attorneys general, DOJ, CMS, DOL and the OIG and comparable authorities in foreign
jurisdictions. Additionally, we are, and may in the future be, subject to qui tam actions in which the government may or may not
intervene. With respect to our Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D businesses, CMS and OIG perform audits to determine a
health plan's compliance with federal regulations and contractual obligations, including compliance with proper coding practices and
fraud and abuse enforcement practices through audits designed to detect and correct improper payments. Certain of our contracts are
currently subject to RADV audits by CMS and the OIG. The DOJ is conducting an industry-wide investigation of the risk adjustment
data submission practices and business processes, including review of medical charts and health exams, of Cigna and a number of
other Medicare Advantage organizations under Medicare Parts C and D. There also continues to be heightened review by federal and
state regulators of business and reporting practices within the health services industry, including with respect to claims payment and
related escheat practices, and increased scrutiny by other federal and state governmental agencies (such as state attorneys general)
empowered to bring criminal actions in circumstances that could have previously given rise only to civil or administrative
proceedings.
In addition, various government agencies have conducted investigations and audits into certain pharmacy benefit management
practices. Many of these investigations and audits have resulted in other companies being subject to civil penalties, including the
payment of money and entry into corporate integrity agreements. We cannot predict what effect, if any, such government
investigations and audits may ultimately have on us or on the industry in general. However, we will likely continue to experience
government scrutiny and audit activity, which has and may in the future result in civil penalties.
Regulatory audits, investigations or reviews or actions by other government agencies could result in changes to our business
practices, retroactive adjustments to certain premiums, significant fines, penalties, civil liabilities, criminal liabilities or other
sanctions, including corporate integrity agreements, restrictions on our ability to participate in government programs, market certain
products or engage in business-related activities, that could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation,
financial condition and liquidity. In addition, disclosure of an adverse investigation or audit or the imposition of fines or other
sanctions could negatively affect our reputation in certain markets and make it more difficult for us to sell our products and services.
A description of material pending legal actions and other legal and regulatory matters is included in Note 21 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements included in this Form 10-K. The outcome of litigation and other legal or regulatory matters is always uncertain.
44
If we fail to comply with applicable privacy, security and data laws, regulations and standards, our business and reputation could
be materially adversely affected.
Most of our activities involve the receipt, use, storage or transmission of a substantial amount of individuals’ protected health
information and personally identifiable information. We also use aggregated and anonymized data for research and analysis
purposes, and in some cases, provide access to such de-identified data, or analytics created from such data, to pharmaceutical
manufacturers and third-party data aggregators and analysts. We may also use such information to create analytic models designed to
predict, and potentially improve, outcomes and patient care. The collection, maintenance, protection, use, transmission, disclosure
and disposal of sensitive personal information are regulated at the federal, state, international and industry levels and requirements
are imposed on us by contracts with clients. In some cases, such laws, rules, regulations and contractual requirements also apply to
our vendors and require us to obtain written assurances of their compliance with such requirements. We are also subject to various
other consumer protection laws that regulate our communications with customers. Certain of our businesses are also subject to the
Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard, which is designed to protect credit card account data as mandated by payment card
industry entities. International laws, rules and regulations governing the use and disclosure of such information, such as the GDPR,
can be more stringent than in the United States, and they vary across jurisdictions. In addition, more jurisdictions are regulating the
transfer of data across borders and domestic privacy and data protection laws are generally becoming more onerous.
These laws, rules and contractual requirements are subject to change and the regulatory environment surrounding data security and
privacy is increasingly demanding. Compliance with existing or new privacy, security and data laws, regulations and requirements
may result in increased operating costs, and may constrain or require us to alter our business model or operations. For more
information on privacy regulations to which we are subject, see “Business – Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 of this Form 10-K.
HIPAA requires covered entities to comply with the HIPAA privacy, security and breach rules. In addition, business associates must
comply with the HIPAA security and breach requirements. While we endeavor to provide appropriate protections through our
contracts with our third-party service providers and in certain cases assess their security controls, we have limited oversight or
control over their actions and practices. Several of our businesses act as business associates to their covered entity customers and, as
a result, collect, use, disclose and maintain sensitive personal information in order to provide services to these customers. HHS
administers an audit program to assess HIPAA compliance efforts by covered entities and business associates. In addition, HHS
continues to exercise its enforcement authority, such as enforcement actions resulting from investigations brought on by notification
to HHS of a breach. An audit resulting in findings or allegations of noncompliance or the implementation of an enforcement action
could have an adverse effect on our results of operations, financial position, cash flows and reputation.
Noncompliance or findings of noncompliance with applicable laws, regulations or requirements, or the occurrence of any privacy or
security breach involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized disclosure of protected personal information, whether by
us or by one of our third-party service providers, could materially adversely affect our business and reputation, including our results
of operations, financial position and cash flows.
Effective prevention, detection and control systems are critical to maintain regulatory compliance and prevent fraud and failure
of these systems could adversely affect us.
Federal and state governments have made investigating and prosecuting health care and other insurance fraud and abuse a priority.
Fraud and abuse prohibitions encompass a wide range of activities including kickbacks for referral of customers, billing for
unnecessary medical services, improper marketing and violations of patient privacy rights. The regulations and contractual
requirements applicable to us are complex and subject to change. In addition, ongoing vigorous law enforcement, a highly technical
regulatory scheme and the Dodd-Frank Act and related regulations enhance regulators’ enforcement powers and whistleblower
incentives and protections. Our compliance efforts in this area will continue to require significant resources. Failure of our
prevention, detection or control systems related to regulatory compliance or the failure of employees to comply with our internal
policies including data systems security or unethical conduct by managers and employees, could adversely affect our reputation and
also expose us to litigation and other proceedings, fines and penalties.
In addition, provider or customer fraud that is not prevented or detected could impact our medical costs or those of our self-insured
clients. Further, during an economic downturn, we may experience increased fraudulent claims volume that may lead to additional
costs due to an increase in disputed claims and litigation.
45
Economic Risks
Economic and market conditions affect the value of our financial instruments and the value of particular assets and liabilities,
investment income and interest expense.
As an insurer, we have substantial investment assets that support insurance and contractholder deposit liabilities and surplus
requirements in our regulated companies. The market values of our investments vary depending on economic and market conditions
with no offsetting change in the value of a majority of our liabilities. A substantial portion of our investment assets are in fixed
interest-yielding debt securities of varying maturities and commercial mortgage loans. The value of these investment assets can
fluctuate significantly with changes in market conditions. A rise in interest rates would likely reduce the value of our investment
portfolio, increase interest expense on our indebtedness and increase investment income as investment assets mature and are
replaced. In addition, an economic contraction could result in delay in payment of principal or interest by issuers, or defaults by
issuers, reducing our investment income and requiring us to write down the value of our investments.
Significant stock market or interest rate declines could result in additional unfunded pension obligations resulting in the need for
additional plan funding by us and increased pension expenses.
We currently have unfunded obligations in our frozen pension plans. A significant decline in the value of the plans’ equity and fixed
income investments or unfavorable changes in applicable laws or regulations could materially increase our expenses and change the
timing and amount of required plan funding. This could reduce the cash available to us, including our subsidiaries. We are also
exposed to interest rate and equity risk associated with our pension obligations. Sustained declines in interest rates could have an
adverse impact on the funded status of our pension plans and our reinvestment yield on new investments. See Note 15 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for more information on our obligations under the pension plans.
A downgrade in the financial strength ratings of our insurance subsidiaries could adversely affect new sales and retention of
current business, and a downgrade in our debt ratings would increase the cost of borrowed funds and could negatively affect our
ability to access capital.
Financial strength, claims paying ability and debt ratings by recognized rating organizations are each important factors in
establishing the competitive position of insurance and health benefits companies. Ratings information by nationally recognized
ratings agencies is broadly disseminated and generally used throughout the industry. We believe that the claims paying ability and
financial strength ratings of our principal insurance subsidiaries are important factors in marketing our products to certain customers.
Our debt ratings impact both the cost and availability of future borrowings and, accordingly, our cost of capital. Each of the rating
agencies reviews ratings periodically and there can be no assurance that current ratings will be maintained in the future. A downgrade
of any of these ratings in the future could make it more difficult to either market our products successfully or raise capital to support
business growth.
We maintain significant indebtedness in the ordinary course of business and may incur further indebtedness in the future. Our
indebtedness could adversely affect our financial condition, our ability to react to changes in the economy or our industry and
could divert our cash flow from operations for debt service costs, leaving us with less cash flow from operations available to fund
growth, stock repurchases, dividends and other corporate purposes.
The total indebtedness of Cigna was approximately $32.9 billion as of December 31, 2020. Carrying indebtedness:
•requires us to dedicate a portion of our cash flow from operations to debt payments, thereby reducing the availability of cash
flow to fund our operations and growth strategy, including investments, acquisitions and capital expenditures, make stock
repurchases, pay dividends and for general corporate purposes;
•increases our vulnerability to general adverse economic and industry conditions, which may require us to dedicate an even
greater percentage of our cash flow from operations to the payment of principal and interest on our debt and limit our access to
capital markets such that additional capital may not be available or may be available only on unfavorable terms;
•exposes us to increases in interest rates to the extent increased interest expense is not offset by increased income from our
investment assets; and
•limits our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes in or challenges relating to our business and industry.
The covenants in our debt instruments may have the effect, among other things, of restricting our financial and operating flexibility
to respond to significant changes in business and economic conditions. We may incur or assume significantly more debt in the future
which may subject us to additional restrictive covenants and increase the risks described above. If our cash flow and capital
resources are insufficient to service our debt obligations, we may be forced to seek additional dividends from our subsidiaries, sell
assets, seek additional equity or debt capital or restructure our debt.
46
Unfavorable developments in economic conditions may adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial
condition.
Many factors, including geopolitical issues, future economic downturns, natural disasters and pandemics, availability and cost of
credit and other capital and consumer spending can negatively impact the U.S. and global economies. Our results of operations could
be materially adversely affected by the impact of unfavorable economic conditions on our clients and customers (both employers and
individuals), health care providers, pharmacy manufacturers, pharmacy providers and third-party vendors. For example:
•Employers may take action to reduce their operating costs by modifying, delaying or canceling plans to purchase our products or
making changes in the mix of products purchased that are unfavorable to us.
•Higher unemployment rates and workforce reductions could result in lower enrollment in our employer-based plans (including
an increase in the number of employees who opt out of employer-based plans) or our individual plans.
•Because of unfavorable economic conditions or the ACA, employers may stop offering health care coverage to employees or
elect to offer this coverage on a voluntary, employee-funded basis as a means to reduce their operating costs.
•If clients are not successful in generating sufficient funds or are precluded from securing financing, they may not be able to pay,
or may delay payment of, accounts receivable that are owed to us.
•Our clients or potential clients may force us to compete more vigorously on factors such as price and service to retain or obtain
their business.
•Our clients may be acquired, consolidated, or otherwise fail to successfully maintain or grow their business or workforce, which
could reduce the number of customers we serve or otherwise result in lower than anticipated utilization of our services.
•A prolonged unfavorable economic environment could adversely impact the financial position of hospitals and other health care
providers, potentially increasing our medical costs.
•Our third-party vendors could significantly and quickly increase their prices or reduce their output to reduce their operating
costs. Our business depends on our ability to perform necessary business functions in an efficient and uninterrupted fashion.
•Other insurers' financial condition may be weakened, increasing the risk that we will receive significant assessments for
obligations of insolvent insurers pursuant to guaranty associations, indemnity funds or other similar laws and regulations.
These factors could lead to a decrease in our customer base, revenues or margins or an increase in our operating costs.
In addition, during and following a prolonged unfavorable economic environment, federal and state budgets could be materially
adversely affected, resulting in reduced or delayed reimbursements or payments in federal and state government programs such as
Medicare and Social Security or under contracts with government entities. These federal and state budgetary pressures also could
cause the government to impose new or a higher level of taxes or assessments on us, such as premium taxes on insurance companies
and HMOs and surcharges or fees on select fee-for-service and capitated medical claims. Although we could attempt to mitigate or
cover our exposure from such increased costs through, among other things, increases in premiums, there can be no assurance that we
will be able to mitigate or cover all of such costs, which may have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations,
financial condition and liquidity.
We are subject to the credit risk of our reinsurers.
We enter into reinsurance arrangements with other insurance companies, primarily in connection with acquisition or divestiture
transactions when the underwriting company is not being acquired or sold.
Under all reinsurance arrangements, reinsurers assume insured losses, subject to certain limitations or exceptions that may include a
loss limit. These arrangements also subject us to various obligations, representations and warranties with the reinsurers. Reinsurance
does not relieve us of liability as the originating insurer. We remain liable to the underlying policyholders if a reinsurer defaults on
obligations under the reinsurance arrangement. Although we regularly evaluate the financial condition of reinsurers to minimize
exposure to significant losses from reinsurer insolvencies, reinsurers may become financially unsound. If a reinsurer fails to meet its
obligations under the reinsurance contract or if the liabilities exceed any applicable loss limit, we will be forced to cover the claims
on the reinsured policies.
The collectability of amounts due from reinsurers is subject to uncertainty arising from a number of factors, including whether the
insured losses meet the qualifying conditions of the reinsurance contract, whether reinsurers or their affiliates have the financial
capacity and willingness to make payments under the terms of the reinsurance contract and the magnitude and type of collateral
supporting our reinsurance recoverable, such as holding sufficient qualifying assets in trusts or letters of credit issued. Although a
portion of our reinsurance exposures are secured, the inability to collect a material recovery from a reinsurer could have a material
adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
47
Item 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
Item 2. PROPERTIES
As of the end of fiscal year 2020, our global real estate portfolio consisted of approximately 12.4 million square feet of owned and
leased properties. Our domestic portfolio had approximately 10.5 million square feet in 42 states, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. Our international properties contain approximately 2.1 million square feet located throughout the
following countries: Australia, Bahrain, Belgium, Canada, China, France, Germany, Hong Kong, India, Indonesia, Kenya, Kuwait,
Lebanon, Malaysia, Netherlands, New Zealand, Oman, Singapore, South Korea, Spain, Switzerland, Taiwan, Thailand, Turkey,
United Arab Emirates and the United Kingdom.
Our principal domestic office locations include the Wilde Building located at 900 Cottage Grove Road in Bloomfield, Connecticut
(our corporate headquarters), Two Liberty Place located at 1601 Chestnut Street in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, and Evernorth's
corporate offices located at and around One Express Way in St. Louis, Missouri. The Wilde Building measures approximately
893,000 square feet and is owned. Express Scripts’ campus measures approximately 1.2 million square feet of leased space and Two
Liberty Place measures approximately 322,000 square feet and is leased space.
The pharmacy operations consist of ten order processing pharmacies, five patient contact centers, 26 specialty branch pharmacies
and 11 high-volume automated home delivery and specialty dispensing pharmacies located throughout the United States. Dispensing
pharmacies are located in Arizona, Delaware, Florida, Indiana, Massachusetts, Missouri, New Jersey, Pennsylvania and Tennessee.
We believe our properties are adequate and suitable for our business as presently conducted. The foregoing does not include
information on investment properties.
Item 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
The information contained under Litigation Matters and Regulatory Matters in Note 21 to the Consolidated Financial Statements of
this Form 10-K is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not Applicable.
48
Information about our Executive Officers
The principal occupations and employment histories of our executive officers are listed below.
DAVID M. CORDANI, 55, Chief Executive Officer of Cigna beginning December 2009; Director since October 2009; President
beginning June 2008; and Chief Operating Officer from June 2008 until December 2009.
NOELLE K. EDER, 51, Executive Vice President, Chief Information Officer beginning September 2020; Executive Vice President,
Chief Information and Digital Officer at Hilton Worldwide Holdings from March 2018 until August 2020; Executive Vice President,
Chief Card Customer Experience Officer at Capital One Financial Corporation from November 2016 until 2018; and Executive Vice
President, Customer Experience and Operations at Capital One Financial Corporation from September 2014 until November 2016.
BRIAN C. EVANKO, 44, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer beginning January 2021; President, Government
Business from November 2017 to January 2021; President, U.S. Individual Business from August 2013 to November 2017; Business
Financial Officer, Cigna Global Individual, Health, Life and Accident from August 2011 to August 2013.
NICOLE S. JONES, 50, Executive Vice President and General Counsel of Cigna beginning June 2011; Senior Vice President and
General Counsel of Lincoln Financial Group from May 2010 until June 2011; Vice President and Deputy General Counsel of Cigna
from April 2008 until May 2010; and Corporate Secretary of Cigna from September 2006 until April 2010.
KRISTEN LAURIA, 52, Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer beginning March 2020; General Manager, Watson
Media and Weather at IBM from February 2017 until March 2020; Vice President, Strategy and Business Development, IBM
Analytics Group at IBM from April 2016 until February 2017; and Chief Marketing Officer, IBM Global Business Services at IBM
from August 2014 to August 2016.
MATTHEW G. MANDERS, 59, President, Government and Solutions beginning January 2021; President, Strategy and Solutions
from November 2018 until January 2021; President, Government & Individual Programs and Group Insurance from February 2017
through November 2017; President, U.S. Markets from June 2014 until February 2017; President, Regional and Operations from
November 2011 until June 2014; President, U.S. Service, Clinical and Specialty from January 2010 until November 2011; and
President, Cigna HealthCare, Total Health, Productivity, Network & Middle Market from June 2009 until January 2010.
STEVEN B. MILLER, MD, 63, Executive Vice President and Chief Clinical Officer beginning December 2018; Senior Vice
President and Chief Medical Officer, of Express Scripts from October 2007 through December 2018.
JOHN M. MURABITO, 62, Executive Vice President, Human Resources and Services of Cigna beginning August 2003.
EVERETT NEVILLE, 56, Executive Vice President, Strategy and Business Development beginning January 2021; Senior Vice
President, Value Creation and Solutions from January 2020 until January 2021; Chief Value Officer from December 2018 until
January 2020; Executive Vice President, Strategy, Supply Chain & Specialty, Express Scripts from January 2018 until December
2018; Senior Vice President, Strategy, Supply Chain & Specialty from November 2016 until January 2018; Senior Vice President,
Supply Chain from March 2015 until November 2016; Vice President, Pharma Strategy and Contracting from March 2009 until
March 2015.
ERIC P. PALMER, 44, President and Chief Operating Officer, Evernorth beginning January 2021; Executive Vice President and
Chief Financial Officer from June 2017 to January 2021; Deputy Chief Financial Officer from February 2017 until June 2017; Senior
Vice President, Chief Business Financial Officer from November 2015 to February 2017; Vice President, Business Financial Officer,
Health Care from April 2012 to November 2015; and Vice President, Business Financial Officer, U.S. Commercial Markets from
June 2010 to April 2012.
JASON D. SADLER, 52, President, International Markets beginning June 2014; President, Global Individual Health, Life and
Accident from July 2010 until June 2014; and Managing Director Insurance Business Hong Kong, HSBC Insurance Asia Limited
from January 2007 until July 2010.
MICHAEL W. TRIPLETT, 59, President, U.S. Commercial beginning February 2017; Regional Segment Lead from June 2009 to
February 2017.
TIMOTHY C. WENTWORTH, 60, Chief Executive Officer, Evernorth beginning September 2020; President, Health Services from
February 2020 until September 2020; President, Express Scripts and Cigna Services from December 2018 until February 2020; Chief
Executive Officer of Express Scripts from May 2016 until December 2018; President from February 2014 through December 2018;
and Senior Vice President and President, Sales and Account Management from April 2012 until February 2014.
49
PART II
Item 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
As of December 31, 2020, the number of shareholders of record was 33,418. Cigna’s common stock is listed with, and trades on, the
New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “CI”.
On January 6, 2021 Cigna initiated a quarterly cash dividend and declared the first quarterly cash dividend of $1.00 per share of
Cigna common stock to be paid on March 25, 2021 to shareholders of record as of March 10, 2021. Cigna currently intends to pay
regular quarterly dividends, with future declarations subject to approval by its Board of Directors and the Board's determination that
the declaration of dividends remains in the best interests of Cigna and its shareholders. The decision of whether to pay future
dividends and the amount of any such dividends will be based on the Company's financial position, results of operations, cash flows,
capital requirements, the requirements of applicable law and any other factors the Board of Directors may deem relevant.
For the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 Cigna paid a yearly cash dividend of $0.04 per share of Cigna common stock.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table provides information about Cigna’s share repurchase activity for the quarter ended December 31, 2020:
PeriodTotal # of shares
purchased Average price paid per
shareTotal # of shares purchased as part of
publicly announced program Approximate dollar value of shares
that may yet be purchased as part
of publicly announced program 
October 1-31, 2020 2,513,269 $ 174.20 2,511,898 $ 3,154,849,988 
November 1-30, 2020 2,264,316 $ 208.21 2,263,127 $ 2,683,607,700 
December 1-31, 2020 3,933,971 $ 206.97 3,915,223 $ 3,873,160,092 
Total 8,711,556 $ 197.84 8,690,248 N/A
(1)Includes shares tendered by employees under the Company’s equity compensation plans as follows: 1) payment of taxes on vesting of restricted stock (grants and
units) and strategic performance shares and 2) payment of the exercise price and taxes for certain stock options exercised. Employees tendered 1,371 shares in
October, 1,189 shares in November and 18,748 shares in December 2020.
(2)Additionally, the Company maintains a share repurchase program authorized by the Board of Directors. Under this program, the Company may repurchase shares
from time to time, depending on market conditions and alternate uses of capital. The timing and actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of
factors, including price, general business and market conditions and alternate uses of capital. The share repurchase program may be effected through Rule 10b5-
1 plans, open market purchases, each in compliance with Rule 10b-18 under the Exchange Act, or privately negotiated transactions. The program may be
suspended or discontinued at any time and does not have an expiration date. In December 2020, the Board increased repurchase authority by an additional $2
billion. From January 1, 2021 through February 24, 2021, the Company repurchased 8.1 million shares for approximately $1.7 billion, leaving repurchase
authority at $2.1 billion as of February 24, 2021.
(3)Approximate dollar value of shares is as of the last date of the applicable month.(1) (2) (3)
50
Stock Price Performance Graph
The graph below compares the cumulative total shareholder return on our common stock for the five years ended December 31, 2020
with the cumulative total return of the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, the Standard & Poor’s 500 Health Care Providers & Services
Index and the Standard & Poor’s Managed Health Care, Life & Health Insurance Indexes. The stock performance shown in the graph
is not intended to forecast or be indicative of future performance.
With consideration to Cigna's evolved strategy and recent divestiture of the Group Disability and Life business, for future filings we
will select to present the S&P 500 Health Care Index as our peer group for this disclosure. Peer indices disclosed in previous filings
are included herein for comparison.
Item 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
The selected financial data previously required by Item 301 of Regulation S-K has been omitted in reliance on SEC Release No. 33-
10890, Management’s Discussion and Analysis, Selected Financial Data and Supplementary Financial Information.
51
Item 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
PAGE
Executive Overview 53
Liquidity and Capital Resources 60
Critical Accounting Estimates 65
Segment Reporting 68
Evernorth 68
U.S. Medical 70
International Markets 71
Group Disability and Other 72
Corporate 73
Investment Assets 73
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations (“MD&A”) is intended to provide
information to assist you in better understanding and evaluating our financial condition as of December 31, 2020 compared with
December 31, 2019 and our results of operations for 2020 compared with 2019 and 2018 and is intended to help you understand the
ongoing trends in our business. We encourage you to read this MD&A in conjunction with our Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Form 10-K") and the “Risk Factors” contained in Part I, Item 1A
of this Form 10-K. For comparisons of our results of operations for 2019 compared with 2018, please refer to the previously filed
MD&A included in Part II, Item 7 of our Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019.
Unless otherwise indicated, financial information in this MD&A is presented in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America (“GAAP”). See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in this Form 10-K for
additional information regarding the Company’s significant accounting policies. In some of our financial tables in this MD&A, we
present either percentage changes or “N/M” when those changes are so large as to become not meaningful. Changes in percentages
are expressed in basis points (“bps”).
In this MD&A, our consolidated measures “adjusted income from operations,” earnings per share on that same basis and “adjusted
revenues” are not determined in accordance with GAAP and should not be viewed as substitutes for the most directly comparable
GAAP measures of “shareholders’ net income,” “earnings per share” and “total revenues.” We also use pre-tax adjusted income
from operations and adjusted revenues to measure the results of our segments.
We use adjusted income from operations as our principal financial measure of operating performance because management believes
it best reflects the underlying results of our business operations and permits analysis of trends in underlying revenue, expenses and
profitability. We define adjusted income from operations as shareholders’ net income (or income before taxes for the segment metric)
excluding realized investment gains and losses, amortization of acquired intangible assets, special items and prior to 2020, results of
Anthem, Inc. and Coventry Health Care Inc. (“Coventry”) (collectively, the “transitioning clients”) (see the “Key Transactions and
Business Developments” section of this MD&A for further discussion of transitioning clients). Cigna’s share of certain realized
investment results of its joint ventures reported in the International Markets segment using the equity method of accounting are also
excluded. Income or expense amounts excluded from adjusted income from operations because they are not indicative of underlying
performance or the responsibility of operating segment management include:
•Realized investment gains (losses) including changes in market values of certain financial instruments between balance
sheet dates, as well as gains and losses associated with invested asset sales.
•Amortization of acquired intangible assets because these relate to costs incurred for acquisitions.
•Results of transitioning clients prior to 2020, because those results are not indicative of ongoing results.
•Special items, if any, that management believes are not representative of the underlying results of operations due to the
nature or size of these matters.
The term adjusted revenues is defined as total revenues excluding the following adjustments: revenue contribution from transitioning
clients prior to 2020, special items and Cigna’s share of certain realized investment results of its joint ventures reported in the
International Markets segment using the equity method of accounting. We exclude these items from this measure because
management believes they are not indicative of past or future underlying performance of the business.
52
EXECUTIVE OVERVIEW
Cigna Corporation, together with its subsidiaries (either individually or collectively referred to as “Cigna,” the “Company,” “we,”
“our” or “us”) is a global health services organization with a mission of helping those we serve improve their health, well-being and
peace of mind. We offer a differentiated set of pharmacy, medical, dental and related products and services offered by our
subsidiaries. For further information on our business and strategy, see Item 1, "Business" in this Form 10-K.
COVID-19 Update
The novel strain of coronavirus (“COVID-19”) was declared a pandemic by the World Health Organization in March 2020. From the
onset of the COVID-19 pandemic we have taken actions to drive affordability, reduce uncertainty and make health care easier. For
customers, these actions include COVID-19 related cost share waivers, expanded access to virtual care, support for access to
medication and advocating for whole person health through various behavioral health initiatives. We have supported the medical
community by simplifying processes and donating medications for a COVID-19 clinical trial. Cigna and the Cigna Foundation have
assisted our communities through several initiatives including the launch of the Brave of Heart Fund that provides financial
assistance to survivors of front-line U.S. health care workers who gave their lives in the fight against COVID-19. Cigna also
provides emotional support services to their families. The Evernorth team launched ParachuteRx, a drug cost assistance program to
certain customers without health coverage due to furlough or job loss. Cigna Medical Group was among the first in the United States
to administer antibody therapies to high-risk COVID-19 patients in a non-hospital setting. Cigna also partnered with other
organizations on digital access to vaccination records for those who have received the COVID-19 vaccine to facilitate return to work
and daily activities.
We have continued to support our workforce by enabling remote work where appropriate, and implemented enhanced safety
protocols and programs that support the health and mental well-being of our employees. We have continued to execute our business
continuity plans over our operations such as leveraging purchasing volume across the pharmaceutical supply chain in order to
mitigate risk associated with prescription drug supply. We did not incur significant disruptions to our operations during 2020 from
COVID-19.
We will continue to work with our clients, customers, providers and employees to provide support during the pandemic.
The COVID-19 pandemic has pervasively impacted the economy, financial markets and the global health care delivery systems. The
effects of the COVID-19 pandemic on the Company began to emerge in the United States at the end of the first quarter and were not
material to the Company's results of operations or financial condition for that period.
Beginning in April, we experienced a significant deferral of care by our customers. The deferral of care moderated over the course of
the second quarter with utilization levels eventually returning to nearly normal levels by the end of June. In the third quarter, we
experienced increased medical utilization as we observed a reduction to the level of deferred care and our customers sought care for
COVID-19 testing and treatment.
In the fourth quarter, as COVID-19 cases increased, the costs for testing and treatment exceeded the savings related to the deferral of
care. These impacts were most prevalent in the U.S. Medical segment where fourth quarter earnings were adversely impacted by
increased costs of COVID-19 care and decreased contributions from our specialty products. Full year U.S. Medical results reflect
COVID-19 impacts of deferral of care by our customers partially offset by the cost of COVID-19 care, the cost of COVID-19 related
actions including premium relief programs for employer clients, cost share waivers for customers, customer disenrollment and
actions to support providers and employees.
Our Group Disability and Other results reflect significantly elevated life insurance claims related to the COVID-19 pandemic and its
effects in the third and fourth quarters. Quarterly and year-to-date earnings in our Evernorth segment also reflected effects of the
pandemic, specifically, a favorable mix of claims as a result of both the type of drugs dispensed as well as the distribution method
used for dispensing and fulfilling, partially offset by lower 30-day retail script volume. Segment results are discussed further in the
"Segment Reporting" section of this MD&A and discussion of the impact of COVID-19 on our investment portfolio and related
considerations regarding our investment outlook can be found in Note 11 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and in the
"Investment Assets" discussion of this MD&A.
While it is difficult to predict the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our results beyond 2020, we believe that such results may be
impacted by, among other things, higher medical costs to treat those affected by the virus, lower customer volumes due to rising
unemployment, lower future risk adjustment revenue due to disrupted care impeding appropriate documentation of customer risk
profiles in our Medicare Advantage business, the return of costs for those who had previously deferred care, vaccine costs, continued
cost share waivers, the potential for continued deferral of care, or lower investment returns.
53
Cigna has taken actions to enhance our liquidity that, combined with our other sources of liquidity described in the "Liquidity and
Capital Resources Outlook" section below, and our current projections for operating cash flows, we believe are sufficient to support
our operations and meet our obligations.
The situation surrounding COVID-19 remains fluid, and we are actively managing our response and assessing impacts to our
financial position and operating results, as well as adverse developments in our business.
For further information regarding the potential impact of COVID-19 on the Company, see “Risk Factors” contained in Part I, Item
1A of this Form 10-K.
Financial Highlights
See Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for a description of our segments. Unless otherwise specified, the commentary
provided below describes our results for the year ended December 31, 2020 compared with the year ended December 31, 2019.
Results for 2018 only include Express Scripts for the period following the acquisition on December 20, 2018.
Summarized below are certain key measures of our performance by segment for the years ended December 31:
Financial highlights by segment
For the Years Ended December 31,Increase
(Decrease)Increase
(Decrease)
(Dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Revenues
Adjusted revenues by segment
Evernorth $ 116,130 $ 96,447 $ 6,606 20 % N/M
U.S. Medical 38,451 36,519 32,791 5 11 %
International Markets 5,877 5,615 5,366 5 5 
Group Disability and Other 5,264 5,182 5,061 2 2 
Corporate, net of eliminations (5,655) (3,588) (1,713) (58) (109)
Adjusted revenues 160,067 140,175 48,111 14 191 
Revenue contribution from transitioning clients — 13,347 459 N/M N/M
Net realized investment results from certain equity method investments 130 44 (43) 195 N/M
Special items 204 — 123 N/M N/M
Total revenues $ 160,401 $ 153,566 $ 48,650 4 % 216 %
Shareholders’ net income $ 8,458 $ 5,104 $ 2,637 66 % 94 %
Adjusted income from operations $ 6,795 $ 6,476 $ 3,557 5 % 82 %
Earnings per share (diluted)
Shareholders’ net income $ 22.96 $ 13.44 $ 10.54 71 % 28 %
Adjusted income from operations $ 18.45 $ 17.05 $ 14.22 8 % 20 %
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations by segment
Evernorth $ 5,363 $ 5,092 $ 380 5 % N/M
U.S. Medical 3,807 3,831 3,502 (1) 9 %
International Markets 900 762 735 18 4 
Group Disability and Other 290 501 529 (42) (5)
Corporate, net of eliminations (1,552) (1,824) (403) 15 N/M
Consolidated pre-tax adjusted income from operations 8,808 8,362 4,743 5 76 
Adjustment for transitioning clients — 1,726 62 N/M N/M
Income attributable to noncontrolling interests 37 20 14 85 43 
Net realized investment gains (losses) 279 221 (124) 26 N/M
Amortization of acquired intangible assets (1,982) (2,949) (235) 33 N/M
Special items 3,726 (810) (879) N/M 8 
Income before income taxes $ 10,868 $ 6,570 $ 3,581 65 % 83 %
For further analysis and explanation of each segment’s results, see the “Segment Reporting” section of this MD&A.
54
Consolidated Results of Operations (GAAP basis)
For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease) Increase (Decrease)
(Dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Pharmacy revenues $107,769 $103,099 $ 5,479 $ 4,670 5 %$97,620 N/M
Premiums 42,627 39,714 36,113 2,913 7 3,601 10 %
Fees and other revenues 8,761 9,363 5,578 (602) (6) 3,785 68 
Net investment income 1,244 1,390 1,480 (146) (11) (90) (6)
Total revenues 160,401 153,566 48,650 6,835 4 104,916 216 
Pharmacy and other service costs 103,484 97,668 4,793 5,816 6 92,875 N/M
Medical costs and other benefit expenses 32,710 30,819 27,528 1,891 6 3,291 12 
Selling, general and administrative expenses 14,072 14,053 11,934 19 — 2,119 18 
Amortization of acquired intangible assets 1,982 2,949 235 (967) (33) 2,714 N/M
Total benefits and expenses 152,248 145,489 44,490 6,759 5 100,999 227 
Income from operations 8,153 8,077 4,160 76 1 3,917 94 
Interest expense and other (1,438) (1,682) (498) 244 15 (1,184) (238)
Debt extinguishment costs (199) (2) — (197) N/M (2) N/M
Gain (loss) on sale of business 4,203 — — 4,203 N/M — N/M
Net realized investment gains (losses) 149 177 (81) (28) (16) 258 N/M
Income before income taxes 10,868 6,570 3,581 4,298 65 2,989 83 
Total income taxes 2,379 1,450 935 929 64 515 55 
Net income 8,489 5,120 2,646 3,369 66 2,474 93 
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling
interests 31 16 9 15 94 7 78 
Shareholders' net income $ 8,458 $ 5,104 $ 2,637 $ 3,354 66 %$ 2,467 94 %
Consolidated effective tax rate 21.9 % 22.1 % 26.1 % (20)bps (400) bps
Medical customers (in thousands)
U.S. Medical 15,013 15,548 15,389 (535) (3)% 159 1 %
International Markets 1,660 1,597 1,572 63 4 25 2 
Total 16,673 17,145 16,961 (472) (3)% 184 1 %
Reconciliation of Shareholders’ Net Income (GAAP) to Adjusted Income from Operations
Dollars in Millions Diluted Earnings Per Share
For the Years Ended December 31, For the Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Shareholders’ net income $ 8,458 $ 5,104 $ 2,637 $ 22.96 $ 13.44 $ 10.54 
After-tax adjustments required to reconcile to adjusted income from operations
Net realized investment (gains) losses (244) (190) 104 (0.66) (0.50) 0.42 
Amortization of acquired intangible assets 1,431 2,248 177 3.88 5.92 0.71 
Adjustment for transitioning clients — (1,316) (47) — (3.46) (0.19)
Special items
Integration and transaction-related costs 404 427 669 1.10 1.11 2.67 
Debt extinguishment costs 151 — — 0.41 — — 
Charge for organizational efficiency plan 24 162 — 0.07 0.43 — 
Charges associated with litigation matters 19 41 19 0.05 0.11 0.08 
Risk corridors recovery (76) — — (0.21) — — 
Contractual adjustment for a former client (155) — — (0.42) — — 
(Gain) on sale of business (3,217) — — (8.73) — — 
Charges (benefits) associated with tax reform — — (2) — — (0.01)
Total special items (2,850) 630 686 (7.73) 1.65 2.74 
Adjusted income from operations $ 6,795 $ 6,476 $ 3,557 $ 18.45 $ 17.05 $ 14.22 
55
Commentary: 2020 versus 2019
Unless indicated otherwise, the commentary presented below, and in the segment discussions that follow, compare results for the
year ended December 31, 2020 with results for the year ended December 31, 2019.
Shareholders’ net income increase was driven by the gain on sale of the Group Disability and Life business, lower amortization
charges and higher adjusted income from operations, partially offset by the absence of earnings from transitioning clients.
Adjusted income from operations increased, driven in part by higher earnings in the Evernorth segment reflecting customer growth
and increased script volumes, an increase in the International Markets segment results and lower interest costs in Corporate due to a
lower level of outstanding debt. These favorable effects were partially offset by lower earnings in the Group Disability and Other
segment reflecting significantly elevated life claims related to the effects of COVID-19.
Medical customers decreased due to declines in the Middle Market and National Accounts market segments and increased
disenrollment driven by the impacts of COVID-19. Those decreases were partially offset by growth in the Select, International and
Medicare Advantage segments.
Pharmacy revenues increased, reflecting the transition of U.S. Medical's customers to Evernorth, higher claims volumes, driven by
the Evernorth collaboration with Prime Therapeutics and an increase in pricing, primarily due to inflation on branded drugs. These
factors were substantially offset by the absence of revenues from the transitioning clients and, to a lesser extent, an increase in the
generic fill rate. See the "Evernorth segment" section of this MD&A for further discussion of pharmacy revenues.
Premiums increased, reflecting customer growth in insured products and rate increases reflecting expected medical cost inflation and
the return of the health insurance industry tax. These factors were partially offset by the impact of premium relief programs
implemented in response to significantly lower than historical utilization as customers deferred care in 2020 due to the COVID-19
pandemic.
Fees and other revenues decreased, primarily reflecting the transition of U.S. Medical's commercial customers to Evernorth's retail
pharmacy network beginning in the third quarter of 2019 (see Note 3(K) to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further
information).
Net investment income decrease was driven by lower yields, including lower income from partnership investments due to current
economic conditions. These effects were partially offset by higher average assets. See the "Investment Assets" section of this MD&A
for further discussion.
Pharmacy and other service costs increased, reflecting the transition of U.S. Medical's customers to Evernorth, higher claims
volumes, driven by the Evernorth collaboration with Prime Therapeutics and an increase in pricing, primarily due to inflation on
branded drugs. These factors were substantially offset by the impact of the absence of the transitioning clients and, to a lesser extent,
effective management of supply chain and the favorable impact of the mix of claims.
Medical costs and other benefit expenses increased, reflecting both customer growth and direct costs associated with COVID-19,
partially offset by care deferrals in insured products in U.S. Medical and higher life claims in Group Disability and Other due to the
effects of the COVID-19 pandemic.
Selling, general and administrative expenses were essentially flat, primarily reflecting lower charges in 2020 for the organizational
efficiency plan and the risk corridors claim recovery recognized in the third quarter of 2020 (see the "Risk Mitigation Programs -
Individual ACA Business" section of this MD&A and Note 21 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion), offset
by the return of the health insurance industry tax.
Amortization of acquired intangible assets decreased, primarily reflecting lower amortization of customer-related intangibles
associated with the transitioning clients.
Income tax expense increased for 2020, largely attributable to the sale of Cigna's Group Disability and Life business. The
consolidated effective tax rate decreased slightly, driven by recognition of certain incremental federal and state tax benefits, largely
offset by the return of the nondeductible health insurance industry tax.
56
Key Transactions and Business Developments
Sale of Group Disability and Life Business
As discussed in Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, Cigna sold the U.S. Group Disability and Life business to New
York Life Insurance Company for $6.2 billion on December 31, 2020. The “Liquidity and Capital Resources” section of this MD&A
provides discussion of the use of proceeds from this divestiture.
Organizational Efficiency Plan
Consistent with our commitment to affordability for our customers and clients, during the fourth quarter of 2019 the Company
committed to a plan to increase our organizational alignment and operational efficiency and reduce costs. As a result, we recognized
a charge in Selling, general and administrative expenses of $207 million, pre-tax ($162 million, after-tax) in the fourth quarter of
2019 and an additional charge of $31 million pre-tax ($24 million, after-tax) in the first quarter of 2020. We expect to realize
annualized after-tax savings of approximately $200 million. A substantial portion of the savings was realized in 2020.
Merger with Express Scripts
As discussed in more detail in our 2019 Form 10-K, Cigna acquired Express Scripts on December 20, 2018 in a cash and stock
transaction valued at $52.8 billion. Costs related to this transaction are reported in “integration and transaction-related costs” as a
special item and excluded from adjusted income from operations because they are not indicative of future underlying performance of
the business. The integration of this acquisition has been completed.
On January 30, 2019, Anthem, a former client, exercised its early termination right and terminated its pharmacy benefit management
services agreement with us, effective March 1, 2019. There was a twelve-month transition period that ended March 1, 2020. We
excluded the results of Express Scripts’ contract with Anthem (and also Coventry) from our non-GAAP reporting metrics adjusted
revenues and adjusted income from operations for 2019 and refer to these clients as transitioning clients. As of December 31, 2019,
the transition was substantially complete; therefore, beginning in 2020, we no longer exclude results of transitioning clients from our
reported adjusted revenues and adjusted income from operations.
57
Industry Developments and Other Matters
The "Business - Regulation" section of this Form 10-K provides a detailed description of The Patient Protection and Affordable Care
Act (“ACA”) provisions and other legislative initiatives that impact our businesses, including regulations issued by the Centers for
Medicare & Medicaid Services (“CMS”) and the Departments of the Treasury and Health and Human Services. Our businesses
continue to operate in a dynamic environment, and the laws and regulations applicable to us, including the ACA, continue to be
subject to legislative, regulatory and judicial challenges. The following table provides information on the expected impact of these
items and other matters:
Item Description
Medicare
Advantage ("MA")Medicare Star Quality Ratings ("Star Ratings"): CMS uses a Star Rating system to measure how well MA
plans perform and scores performance in several categories, including quality of care and customer service.
Star Ratings range from one to five stars. CMS recognizes plans with Star Ratings of four stars or greater
with quality bonus payments and the ability to offer enhanced benefits. Approximately 77% of our MA
customers were in four star or greater plans for bonus payments received in 2020 and 87% for bonus
payments to be received in 2021. In October 2020, CMS announced the Star Ratings for bonus payments to
be received in 2022. We expect the percentage of our MA customers in four star or greater plans will increase
to 88% for bonus payments to be received in 2022.
MA Rates: Final MA reimbursement rates for 2021 were published by CMS in April 2020, and final rates for
2022 were published by CMS in January 2021. We do not expect the new rates to have a material impact on
our consolidated results of operations in 2021 or 2022.
Risk Adjustment: As discussed in the “Regulation” and “Risk Factors” sections of this Form 10-K, our MA
business is subject to reviews, including risk adjustment data validation (“RADV”) audits by CMS and the
Office of the Inspector General (“OIG”). We expect that CMS, OIG and other federal agencies will continue
to closely scrutinize components of the Medicare program.
The “Regulation” section of this Form 10-K also discusses a proposed rule issued by CMS in 2018 for RADV
audits of contract year 2011 and all subsequent years that included, among other things, extrapolation of the
error rate related to RADV audit findings without applying the adjustment for underlying fee-for-service data
errors as currently contemplated by CMS’ RADV audit methodology. RADV audits for our contract years
2011 through 2015 are currently in process. CMS has announced its intent to use third-party auditors to audit
all Medicare Advantage contracts by either a comprehensive or a targeted RADV review for each contract
year. If the proposed rule is adopted in its current form, it could result in some combination of degraded plan
benefits, higher monthly premiums and reduced choice for the population served by all MA insurers. The
Company, along with other MA organizations and additional interested parties, submitted comments to CMS
on the proposed rule as part of the notice-and-comment rulemaking process. The comment period concluded
on August 28, 2019 and CMS is expected to act by November 2021. If CMS adopts the rule as proposed,
there could be a material impact on the Company’s future results of operations, though we expect the rule
would be subject to legal challenges. In addition, the Company is subject to OIG RADV audits that are in
process.
Also, as described in Note 21 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, the U.S. Department of Justice is
currently conducting an industry-wide investigation of risk adjustment data submission practices and business
processes, which in the case of certain other MA organizations has resulted in litigation.
58
Item Description
Affordable Care Act Cost-Sharing Reduction Subsidies: The ACA provides for cost-sharing reductions that offset the amount
that qualifying customers pay for deductibles, copays and coinsurance. The federal government stopped
funding insurers for the cost-sharing reduction ("CSR”) subsidies in 2017. Certain insurers have sued the
federal government for failure to pay cost-sharing reduction subsidies and the matter remains unresolved.
In the first set of consolidated appeals, the Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit issued a decision on
August 14, 2020, finding that (i) the CSR reimbursement provision of the ACA imposes an obligation on
the government to pay, but (ii) the insurers' damages must be reduced by the amount of additional
premium tax credit payments that each insurer received as a result of the government’s termination of
CSR payments. On September 28 and October 2, 2020, the insurers filed petitions for rehearing en banc in
the Federal Circuit. The court denied those petitions on November 10 and December 16, 2020,
respectively. On February 19, 2021 two insurers filed a petition seeking Supreme Court review. As
described in Note 21 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, we filed a lawsuit in May 2020 against the
federal government seeking payment of these subsidies. Our case is stayed until either the Federal
Circuit’s judgments in the CSR appeals become final and non-appealable or the Supreme Court resolves
any petition for writ of certiorari. Our premium rates for the 2018, 2019 and 2020 plan years reflected a
lack of government funding for cost-sharing reduction subsidies.
ACA Litigation: As described in the “Business - Regulation” section of this Form 10-K, a federal district
court ruled that the “individual mandate” in the ACA is unconstitutional and that the entire law must be
struck down. On appeal, the Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit agreed that the “individual mandate” is
unconstitutional but ordered the district court to reexamine whether the other provisions of the ACA can
remain in effect, thereby leaving in doubt whether the entire ACA is unconstitutional until there is a final
judicial determination on appeal. The California-led states and the U.S. House of Representatives filed
petitions seeking to appeal the Fifth Circuit's ruling to the U.S. Supreme Court. On March 2, 2020, the
Supreme Court agreed to hear the appeals. The case was argued before the Supreme Court on November
10, 2020, and a decision is expected by the end of June 2021.
59
Risk Mitigation Programs – Individual ACA Business
Risk Corridors. In 2016, we recorded an allowance for the balance of our ACA risk corridors receivable based on court decisions and
the large program deficit. On April 27, 2020, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that insurers are entitled to the full amount due under the
risk corridors program. The Supreme Court remanded the cases before it to the lower courts for further proceedings consistent with
its opinion. We filed a lawsuit in May 2020 seeking payment of these funds. We received $120 million in payments in September
2020, which resolved our risk corridors claim.
Risk Adjustment. At the end of each program year the risk adjustment balances are subject to audit by CMS through the RADV
program. RADV audits for the 2017 and 2018 benefit years have been completed, subject to the error rates appeal period. Final
settlement for the 2017 and 2018 benefit years is expected in 2021 and 2022, respectively. Based on the information currently
available, we have adjusted our risk adjustment balances to reflect our estimate of expected outcome as of December 31, 2020 and
December 31, 2019.
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Risk Adjustment
Receivables $ 80 $ 47 
Payables (153) (213)
Total risk adjustment balance $ (73)$ (166)
(1)Receivables, net of allowances, are reported in Accounts receivable, net in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(2)Payables are reported in Accrued expenses and other liabilities (current) in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Risk adjustment program charges of $(26) million pre-tax were fully offset by RADV adjustment favorability of $26 million pre-tax
for 2020, compared with net charges of $162 million pre-tax ($126 million after-tax) in 2019 and $147 million pre-tax ($116 million
after-tax) in 2018.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
(In millions)    
Financial Summary 2020 2019 2018
Short-term investments $ 359 $ 423 $ 316 
Cash and cash equivalents $ 10,182 $ 4,619 $ 3,855 
Short-term debt $ 3,374 $ 5,514 $ 2,955 
Long-term debt $ 29,545 $ 31,893 $ 39,523 
Shareholders’ equity $ 50,321 $ 45,338 $ 41,028 
Liquidity
We maintain liquidity at two levels: the subsidiary level and the parent company level.
Liquidity requirements at the subsidiary level generally consist of:
•pharmacy, medical costs and other benefit payments;
•expense requirements, primarily for employee compensation and benefits, information technology and facilities costs;
•income taxes; and
•debt service.
Our subsidiaries normally meet their liquidity requirements by:
•maintaining appropriate levels of cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments;
•using cash flows from operating activities;
•matching investment durations to those estimated for the related insurance and contractholder liabilities;
•selling investments; and
•borrowing from affiliates, subject to applicable regulatory limits. (1)
 (2)
60
Liquidity requirements at the parent company level generally consist of:
•debt service;
•payment of declared dividends to shareholders;
•lending to subsidiaries as needed; and
•pension plan funding.
The parent company normally meets its liquidity requirements by:
•maintaining appropriate levels of cash and various types of marketable investments;
•collecting dividends from its subsidiaries;
•using proceeds from issuing debt and common stock; and
•borrowing from its subsidiaries, subject to applicable regulatory limits.
Dividends from our insurance, Health Maintenance Organization (“HMO”) and foreign subsidiaries are subject to regulatory
restrictions. See Note 19 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information regarding these restrictions. Most of
Evernorth's subsidiaries are not subject to regulatory restrictions regarding dividends and therefore provide significant financial
flexibility to Cigna.
Cash flows for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 10,350 $ 9,485 $ 3,770 
Net cash provided by (used in) investing activities:
Cash proceeds from sale of U.S. Group Disability and Life business, net of cash sold 5,592 — — 
Cash used to acquire Express Scripts, net of cash acquired — — (24,062)
Other acquisitions (139) (153) (393)
Net investment sales (purchases) (1,406) 480 (1,383)
Purchases of property and equipment and other (1,071) (1,061) (540)
Net investing activities 2,976 (734) (26,378)
Net cash (used in) provided by financing activities:
Debt (repayments) issuances (4,736) (5,175) 24,212 
Stock repurchase (4,042) (1,987) (342)
Other, net 245 (25) (355)
Net financing activities (8,533) (7,187) 23,515 
Foreign currency effect on cash 41 (8) (24)
Change in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 4,834 $ 1,556 $ 883 
The following discussion explains variances in the various categories of cash flows for the year ended December 31, 2020 compared
with the same period in 2019.
Operating activities
Cash flows from operating activities consist principally of cash receipts and disbursements for pharmacy revenues and costs,
premiums, fees, investment income, taxes, benefit costs and other expenses.
Cash flows from operating activities increased, primarily driven by higher pharmacy and services costs payables due to business
growth, offset by increases in accounts receivable due to business growth, higher inventory purchases and the resumption of the
health insurance industry tax.
Investing and Financing activities
Cash flows from investing activities increased, primarily due to the net proceeds from the sale of the Group Disability and Life
business, partially offset by higher net investment purchases.
Cash used in finance activities increased, primarily due to stock repurchases and debt repayments, partially offset by higher debt
issuance.
61
We maintain a share repurchase program authorized by our Board of Directors. Under this program, we may repurchase shares from
time to time, depending on market conditions and alternate uses of capital. The timing and actual number of shares repurchased will
depend on a variety of factors including price, general business and market conditions and alternate uses of capital. The share
repurchase program may be effected through open market purchases in compliance with Rule 10b-18 under the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended, including through Rule 10b5-1 trading plans or privately negotiated transactions. The program may be
suspended or discontinued at any time.
For the year ended December 31, 2020, we repurchased 21.9 million shares for approximately $4.1 billion. From January 1, 2021
through February 24, 2021, we repurchased 8.1 million shares for approximately $1.7 billion. Share repurchase authority was $2.1
billion as of February 24, 2021.
Capital Resources
Our capital resources consist primarily of cash, cash equivalents and investments maintained at regulated subsidiaries required to
underwrite insurance risks, cash flows from operating activities, our commercial paper program, credit agreements and the issuance
of long-term debt and equity securities. Our businesses generate significant cash flow from operations, some of which is subject to
regulatory restrictions relative to the amount and timing of dividend payments to parent. Dividends from U.S. regulated subsidiaries
were $2.3 billion in 2020 and 2019. Nonregulated subsidiaries also generate significant cash flow from operating activities, which is
typically available immediately to parent for general corporate purposes.
We prioritize our use of capital resources to:
•Invest in capital expenditures, primarily related to technology to support innovative solutions for our customers, provide the
capital necessary to maintain or improve the financial strength ratings of subsidiaries and to repay debt and fund pension
obligations if necessary;
•pay dividends to shareholders;
•consider acquisitions that are strategically and economically advantageous; and
•return capital to shareholders through share repurchases.
At December 31, 2020, our debt-to-capitalization ratio was 39.5%, a decline from 45.2% at December 31, 2019.
In connection with the sale of the Group Disability and Life business that closed on December 31, 2020, we deployed approximately
$3.0 billion to debt repayment by: (i) repaying in full our $1.4 billion 364-Day Term Loan Credit Agreement entered into on April 1,
2020, on December 31, 2020; (ii) redeeming in full the $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount of Cigna’s Senior Floating Rate
Notes due 2021 on January 15, 2021 at a redemption price calculated in accordance with the terms and conditions of the indenture
governing the Notes; and (iii) repaying certain of our outstanding commercial paper balances in January 2021.
In 2018, Cigna entered into a $3.25 billion five-year revolving credit agreement and a $3.0 billion term loan credit agreement in
financing the Express Scripts acquisition. The term loan credit agreement was repaid in full and terminated in the fourth quarter of
2019.
In 2019, Cigna entered into an additional $1.0 billion 364-day revolving credit agreement that expired in October 2020, at which
point we replaced the revolving credit agreement with a new $1.0 billion 364-day revolving credit agreement which will expire in
October 2021.
Our revolving credit agreements provide us the ability to borrow amounts for general corporate purposes, including for purpose of
providing liquidity support if necessary under our commercial paper program discussed below. As of December 31, 2020, there were
no outstanding balances under either of the revolving credit agreements.
Cigna also maintains a commercial paper program and may issue short-term, unsecured commercial paper notes privately placed on
a discount basis through certain broker dealers at any time not to exceed $4.25 billion. The net proceeds of issuances have been and
are expected to be used for general corporate purposes. The commercial paper program had approximately $1.0 billion outstanding at
December 31, 2020 at an average interest rate of 0.2%.
See Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on our credit agreements and commercial paper
program.
62
Our capital management strategy to support the liquidity and regulatory capital requirements of our foreign operations and certain
international growth initiatives is to retain overseas a significant portion of the earnings generated by our foreign operations. This
strategy does not materially limit our ability to meet our liquidity and capital needs in the United States.
Liquidity and Capital Resources Outlook
We maintain sufficient liquidity to meet our cash needs through our cash and cash equivalents balances, cash flows from operations,
commercial paper program, credit agreements and the issuance of long-term debt and equity securities. As of December 31, 2020, we
had $4.25 billion of undrawn committed capacity under our revolving credit agreements (which amounts are available for general
corporate purposes, including providing liquidity support for our commercial paper program), $3.2 billion of remaining capacity
under our commercial paper program and $10.5 billion in cash and short-term investments, approximately $5.2 billion of which was
held by the parent company or certain nonregulated subsidiaries. We actively monitor our debt obligations and engage in issuance or
redemption activities as needed in accordance with our capital management strategy. A description of our outstanding debt can be
found in Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
On January 6, 2021, Cigna initiated a quarterly cash dividend and declared the first quarterly cash dividend of $1.00 per share of
Cigna common stock to be paid on March 25, 2021 to shareholders of record as of March 10, 2021. Cigna currently intends to pay
regular quarterly dividends, with future declarations subject to approval by its Board of Directors and the Board's determination that
the declaration of dividends remains in the best interests of Cigna and its shareholders. The decision of whether to pay future
dividends and the amount of any such dividends will be based on the Company's financial position, results of operations, cash flows,
capital requirements, the requirements of applicable law and any other factors the Board of Directors may deem relevant.
As of December 31, 2020, our unfunded pension liability was $977 million, an increase of $104 million from December 31, 2019,
primarily attributable to a decrease in discount rates of approximately 80 basis points, partially offset by investment asset returns. In
2020, we made an immaterial pension contribution as required under the Pension Protection Act of 2006. We expect the required
contributions for 2021 to be immaterial. See Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
Risks to our liquidity and capital resources outlook include cash projections that may not be realized and the demand for funds could
exceed available cash if our ongoing businesses experience unexpected shortfalls in earnings or we experience material adverse
effects from one or more risks or uncertainties described more fully in the "Risk Factors" section of this Form 10-K. Though we
believe we have adequate sources of liquidity, significant disruption or volatility in the capital and credit markets could affect our
ability to access those markets for additional borrowings or increase costs. In addition to the sources of liquidity discussed above, the
parent company can borrow an additional $1.7 billion from its subsidiaries without further approvals as of December 31, 2020.
Guarantees and Contractual Obligations
We are contingently liable for various contractual obligations entered into in the ordinary course of business. See the: "Liquidity and
Capital Resources" section of this MD&A for additional information on how we manage our liquidity requirements related to these
obligations. See Note 21 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for discussion of various guarantees.
(In millions, on an undiscounted basis) Total 2021 2022 to 2023 2024 to 2025 Thereafter
On-Balance Sheet
Insurance liabilities
Contractholder deposit funds $ 5,430 $ 282 $ 502 $ 462 $ 4,184 
Future policy benefits 12,339 338 776 900 10,325 
Health Care Medical claims payable 3,041 3,041 
Unpaid claims and claim expenses 1,195 1,141 11 9 34 
Long-term debt 48,029 3,595 8,048 6,062 30,324 
Other noncurrent liabilities 623 156 104 99 264 
Operating leases 705 150 288 146 121 
Off-Balance Sheet
Purchase Obligations 3,197 1,399 1,283 493 22 
Total $ 74,559 $ 10,102 $ 11,012 $ 8,171 $ 45,274 
(1)Amounts include scheduled interest payments and current maturities of long-term debt. Finance leases are included in long-term debt and primarily represent
obligations for information technology network storage, servers and equipment. See Note 18 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for information regarding
finance leases. See Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for information regarding our long-term debt.(1)
63
On balance sheet:
•Insurance liabilities. Excluded from the table above are $4 billion of insurance liabilities ($3 billion in contractholder deposit
funds; $1 billion in future policy benefits) associated with the sold retirement benefits, individual life insurance and annuity
businesses, reinsured workers’ compensation, as well as the group life and personal accident businesses as their related net cash
flows are not expected to impact our cash flows. Excluding these amounts, the sum of the obligations presented above exceeds
the corresponding insurance and contractholder liabilities of $17 billion recorded on the balance sheet. This is because some of
the recorded insurance liabilities reflect discounting for interest and the recorded contractholder liabilities exclude future interest
crediting, charges and fees. The timing and amount of actual future cash flows may differ from those presented above.
◦Contractholder deposit funds: see Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for our accounting policy for this
liability. Expected future cash flows presented above also include estimated future interest crediting on current fund
balances based on current investment yields less the estimated cost of insurance charges and mortality and administrative
fees for universal life policies.
◦Future policy benefits and unpaid claims and claim expenses: see Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for our
accounting policies for these liabilities. Expected future cash flows for these liabilities presented in the table above are
undiscounted. The expected future cash flows for guaranteed minimum death benefit (“GMDB”) reported in future policy
benefits do not consider any of the related reinsurance arrangements.
•Long-term debt includes scheduled interest payments and current maturities of long-term debt. See Note 7 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements for information regarding long-term debt. Finance leases are included in long-term debt and primarily
represent obligations for information technology network storage, servers and equipment. See Note 18 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements for information regarding finance leases.
•Other noncurrent liabilities include estimated payments for guaranteed minimum income benefit (“GMIB”) contracts (without
considering any related reinsurance arrangements), pension, other postretirement and postemployment benefit obligations,
supplemental and deferred compensation plans, interest rate and foreign currency swap contracts and reinsurance liabilities.
Estimated payments of $61 million for deferred compensation, non-qualified and international pension plans and other
postretirement and postemployment benefit plans are expected to be paid in less than one year and are included in the table
above. We expect to make immaterial contributions to the qualified domestic pension plans during 2021 and they are reflected in
the above table. We expect to make payments subsequent to 2021 for these obligations; however, subsequent payments have
been excluded from the table as their timing is based on plan assumptions that may materially differ from actual activities. See
Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on pension obligations.
•Operating leases see Note 18 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
The table above excludes the liabilities for uncertain tax positions because we cannot reasonably estimate the timing of such future
payments. In the event we are unable to sustain all of our $1.2 billion of uncertain tax positions it could result in future tax payments
of approximately $900 million. See Note 20 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information on uncertain tax
positions.
Off-Balance Sheet:
•Purchase obligations. As of December 31, 2020, purchase obligations consisted of estimated payments required under
contractual arrangements for future services and investment commitments and they are included in the table below.
(In millions)  
Debt securities $ 149 
Commercial mortgage loans 10 
Limited liability entities (other long-term investments) 2,325 
Total investment commitments 2,484 
Future service commitments 713 
Total purchase obligations $ 3,197 
(1)See Note 11 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
Our estimated future service commitments primarily represent contracts for certain outsourced business processes and information
technology maintenance and support. We generally have the ability to terminate these agreements, but do not anticipate doing so at
this time. Purchase obligations exclude contracts that are cancellable without penalty and those that do not contractually require
minimum levels of goods or services to be purchased. (1)
64
Guarantees
We are contingently liable for various financial and other guarantees provided in the ordinary course of business. See Note 21 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information on guarantees.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES
The preparation of Consolidated Financial Statements in accordance with GAAP requires management to make estimates and
assumptions that affect reported amounts and related disclosures in the Consolidated Financial Statements. Management considers an
accounting estimate to be critical if:
•it requires assumptions to be made that were uncertain at the time the estimate was made; and
•changes in the estimate or different estimates that could have been selected could have a material effect on our consolidated
results of operations or financial condition.
Management has discussed how critical accounting estimates are developed and selected with the Audit Committee of our Board of
Directors and the Audit Committee has reviewed the disclosures presented below. We regularly evaluate items that may impact
critical accounting estimates.
As discussed in the executive overview of this MD&A, the COVID-19 pandemic has pervasively impacted the economy, financial
markets and the global health care delivery systems. If the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic beyond 2020 is worse than
management's current projections, these adverse effects to our business could impact the estimated fair value of our reporting units.
In addition to the estimates presented in the following tables, there are other accounting estimates used in preparing our Consolidated
Financial Statements, including estimates of liabilities for future policy benefits, as well as estimates with respect to pension and
postretirement benefits other than pensions and certain compensation accruals.
Management believes the current assumptions used to estimate amounts reflected in our Consolidated Financial Statements are
appropriate. However, if actual experience significantly differs from the assumptions used in estimating amounts reflected in our
Consolidated Financial Statements, the resulting changes could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of
operations and in certain situations, could have a material adverse effect on liquidity and our financial condition. The tables below
present the adverse impacts of certain possible changes in assumptions. The effect of assumption changes in the opposite direction
would be a positive impact to our consolidated results of operations, liquidity or financial condition, except for assessing impairment
of goodwill.
65
Balance Sheet Caption /
Natur e of Critical Accounting Estimate Effect if Differ ent Assumptions Used
 
Goodwill and other intangible assets
 
Goodwill represents the excess of the cost of businesses acquired over the fair
value of their net assets at the acquisition date. Intangible assets primarily reflect
the value of customer relationships and other intangibles acquired in business
combinations.
 
Fair values of reporting units are estimated using models and assumptions that we
believe a hypothetical market participant would use to determine a current
transaction price. The significant assumptions and estimates used in determining
fair value include the discount rate and future cash flows. A discount rate is
selected to correspond with each reporting unit’s weighted average cost of capital,
consistent with that used for investment decisions considering the specific and
detailed operating plans and strategies within each reporting unit. Projections of
future cash flows for each reporting unit are consistent with our annual planning
process for revenues, pharmacy costs, benefits expenses, operating expenses,
taxes, capital levels and long-term growth rates. In addition to these assumptions,
we consider market data to evaluate the fair value of each reporting unit. The fair
value of intangibles and the amortization method were determined using an
income approach that relies on projected future cash flows including key
assumptions for customer attrition and discount rates. Management revises
amortization periods if it believes there has been a change in the length of time
that an intangible asset will continue to have value.
The Company conducts its quantitative evaluation for goodwill impairment at
least annually during the third quarter at the reporting unit level and performs
qualitative impairment assessments on a quarterly basis to determine if events or
changes in circumstances indicate that it is more likely than not that the carrying
value of a reporting unit exceeds its estimated fair value.
Goodwill and other intangibles as of December 31 were as follows (in millions):
 
·2020 – Goodwill $44,648; Other intangible assets $35,179
·2019 – Goodwill $44,602; Other intangible assets $36,562
 
See Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional discussion of
our goodwill and other intangible assets.
  
We completed our normal annual evaluations for impairment of goodwill and
intangible assets during the third quarter of 2020. The evaluations indicated that
the fair value estimates of our reporting units exceed their carrying values by
significant margins. Changes in assumptions concerning future financial results or
other underlying assumptions, including macroeconomic factors, government
legislation, changes in the competitive landscape or other market conditions could
impact our ability to achieve profitability projections. If we consistently do not
achieve our earnings and cash flow projections or our cost of capital rises
significantly, the assumptions and estimates underlying the goodwill and
intangible asset impairment evaluations could be adversely affected and result in
future impairment charges that would negatively impact our operating results and
financial position.
 
 
 
Balance Sheet Caption /
Natur e of Critical Accounting Estimate Effect if Differ ent Assumptions Used
 
Income taxes – uncertain tax positions
 
We evaluate tax positions to determine whether the benefits are more likely than
not to be sustained on audit based on their technical merits. The Company
establishes a liability if the probability that the position will be sustained is 50% or
less. For uncertain positions that management believes are more likely than not to
be sustained, the Company recognizes a liability based upon management's
estimate of the most likely settlement outcome with the taxing authority. These
amounts primarily relate to federal and state uncertain positions of the value and
timing of deductions and uncertain positions of attributing taxable income to states
Balances that are included in the Consolidated Balance Sheets are as follows (in
millions):
 
·2020 – $1,210
·2019 – $1,018
 
See Note 20 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional discussion
around uncertain tax positions and the Liquidity and Capital Resource section of
this MD&A for a discussion of their potential impact on liquidity.
  
The factors that could impact our estimates of uncertain tax positions include the
likelihood of being sustained upon audit based on the technical merits of the tax
position and related assumed interest and penalties. If our positions are upheld
upon audit, our net income would increase.
66
Balance Sheet Caption /
Natur e of Critical Accounting Estimate Effect if Differ ent Assumptions Used
 
Unpaid claims and claim expenses – U.S. Medical
 
Unpaid claims and claim expenses include both reported claims and estimates for
losses incurred but not yet reported.
 
Unpaid claims and claim expenses in U.S. Medical are primarily impacted by
assumptions related to completion factors and medical cost trend. Variation of
actual results from either assumption could impact the unpaid claims balance as
noted below. A large number of factors may cause the medical cost trend to vary
from the Company’s estimates, including: changes in health management
practices, changes in the level and mix of benefits offered and services utilized,
and changes in medical practices. Completion factors may be affected if actual
claims submission rates from providers differ from estimates (that can be
influenced by a number of factors, including provider mix and electronic versus
manual submissions), or if changes to the Company’s internal claims processing
patterns occur.
 
Unpaid claims and claim expenses for the U.S. Medical segment as of December
31 were as follows (in millions):
 
·2020 – gross $3,184; net $2,960
·2019 – gross $2,892; net $2,589
 
These liabilities are presented above both gross and net of reinsurance and other
recoverables.
 
See Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information
regarding assumptions and methods used to estimate this liability.
  
Based on studies of our claim experience, it is reasonably possible that a 100 basis
point change in the medical cost trend and a 50 basis point change in completion
factors could occur in the near term.
 
A 100 basis point increase in the medical cost trend rate would increase this
liability by approximately $45 million, resulting in a decrease in net income of
approximately $35 million after-tax, and a 50 basis point decrease in completion
factors would increase this liability by approximately $90 million, resulting in a
decrease in net income of approximately $70 million after-tax.
 
Balance Sheet Caption /
Natur e of Critical Accounting Estimate Effect if Differ ent Assumptions Used
 
Valuation of debt security investments
 
Most debt securities are classified as available for sale and are carried at fair value
with changes in fair value recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) within shareholders’ equity.
 
Fair value is defined as the price at which an asset could be exchanged in an
orderly transaction between market participants at the balance sheet date.
 
Determining fair value for a financial instrument requires management judgment.
The degree of judgment involved generally correlates to the level of pricing
readily observable in the markets. Financial instruments with quoted prices in
active markets or with market observable inputs to determine fair value, such as
public securities, generally require less judgment. Conversely, private placements
including more complex securities that are traded infrequently are typically
measured using pricing models that require more judgment as to the inputs and
assumptions used to estimate fair value. There may be a number of alternative
inputs to select based on an understanding of the issuer, the structure of the
security and overall market conditions. In addition, these factors are inherently
variable in nature as they change frequently in response to market conditions.
Approximately two-thirds of our debt securities are public securities, and one-
third are private placement securities.
 
Typically, the most significant input in the measurement of fair value is the market
interest rate used to discount the estimated future cash flows of the instrument.
Such market rates are derived by calculating the appropriate spreads over
comparable U.S. Treasury securities, based on the credit quality, industry and
structure of the asset.
 
See Notes 11A. and 12 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for a discussion
of our fair value measurements, the procedures performed by management to
determine that the amounts represent appropriate estimates and our accounting
policy regarding unrealized appreciation on debt securities.
  
If the derived interest rates used to calculate fair value increased by 100 basis
points, the fair value of the total debt security portfolio of $18 billion would
decrease by approximately $1.3 billion, resulting in an after-tax decrease to
shareholders’ equity of approximately $0.8 billion as of December 31, 2020.
  
67
SEGMENT REPORTING
The following section of this MD&A discusses the results of each of our segments. See Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements for a description of our segments.
In segment discussions, we present adjusted revenues and “pre-tax adjusted income from operations,” defined as income before taxes
excluding realized investment gains (losses), amortization of acquired intangible assets, special items and, for periods prior to 2020,
results of transitioning clients. Ratios presented in this segment discussion exclude the same items as pre-tax adjusted income from
operations. See Note 22 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional discussion of these metrics and a reconciliation of
income before income taxes to pre-tax adjusted income from operations, as well as a reconciliation of total revenues to adjusted
revenues. Note 22 to the Consolidated Financial Statements also explains that segment revenues include both external revenues and
sales between segments that are eliminated in Corporate.
In these segment discussions, we also present “pre-tax adjusted margin,” defined as pre-tax adjusted income from operations divided
by adjusted revenues.
As of the third quarter 2020, the segment previously reported as Health Services is reported as Evernorth, and the segment
previously reported as Integrated Medical is reported as U.S. Medical. There are no changes to the underlying business reported in
either segment.
See the "Executive Overview" section of this MD&A for summarized financial results of each of our segments.
Evernorth Segment
Evernorth includes a broad range of coordinated and point solution health services, including pharmacy solutions, benefits
management solutions, care solutions and intelligence solutions. As described in the introduction to Segment Reporting, Evernorth
performance is measured using the below metrics:
•Adjusted gross profit and pre-tax adjusted income from operations, which exclude the impact of special items.
•Adjusted pharmacy script volume is calculated by multiplying the total non-specialty network scripts filled through 90-day
programs and home delivery scripts by three and counting all other network and specialty scripts as one script.
•Generic fill rate is defined as the total number of generic scripts divided by the total overall scripts filled. Generally, higher
generic fill rates reduce revenues, as generic drugs are typically priced lower than the branded drugs they replace. However,
as ingredient cost paid to pharmacies on generic drugs is incrementally lower than the price charged to our clients, higher
generic fill rates generally have a favorable impact on our gross profit. The home delivery generic fill rate is currently lower
than the network generic fill rate as fewer generic substitutions are available among maintenance medications (such as
therapies for chronic conditions) commonly dispensed from home delivery pharmacies as compared to acute medications
that are primarily dispensed by pharmacies in our retail networks.
The key factors that impact Evernorth revenues and costs of revenues are volume, mix of claims and price. These key factors are
discussed further below. See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements included in this Form 10-K for additional information
on revenue and cost recognition policies for this segment.
•As our clients’ claim volumes increase or decrease, our resulting revenues and cost of revenues correspondingly increase or
decrease. Our gross profit could also increase or decrease as a result of changes in purchasing discounts.
•The mix of claims generally considers the type of drug and distribution method used for dispensing and fulfilling. Types of
drugs can have an impact on our pharmacy revenues, pharmacy and other service costs and gross profit, including amounts
payable under certain financial and performance guarantees with our clients. In addition to the types of drugs, the mix of
generic claims (i.e., generic fill rate) also impacts our gross profit. Furthermore, our gross profit differs among network,
home delivery and specialty distribution methods and can impact our profitability.
•Our client contract pricing is impacted by our ongoing ability to negotiate supply chain contracts for pharmacy network,
pharmaceutical and wholesaler purchasing and manufacturer rebates. As we seek to improve the effectiveness of our
integrated solutions for the benefit of our clients, we are continuously innovating and optimizing the supply chain. Our
gross profit could also increase or decrease as a result of supply chain initiatives implemented. Inflation also impacts our
pricing because most of our contracts provide that we bill clients and pay pharmacies based on a generally recognized price
index for pharmaceuticals. Therefore, the rate of inflation for prescription drugs and our efforts to manage this inflation for
our clients can affect our revenues and cost of revenues.
68
In this MD&A, we present revenues and gross profit, as well as adjusted revenues and adjusted gross profit, consistent with our
segment reporting metrics, which exclude special items and, for periods prior to 2020, contributions from transitioning clients. As of
December 31, 2019, the transition of these clients was substantially complete; therefore, beginning in 2020, we no longer exclude
results of transitioning clients from our adjusted metrics. See the “Key Transactions and Business Developments” section of this
Form 10-K MD&A for further discussion of transitioning clients and why we present this information.
Results of Operations
Financial Summary For the Years Ended December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Total revenues $116,334 $109,794 $ 7,065 $ 6,540 6 %$102,729 N/M
Less: Transitioning clients — (13,347) (459) 13,347 N/M (12,888) N/M
Less: Contractual adjustment for a former client (204) — — (204) N/M — N/M
Adjusted revenues $116,130 $ 96,447 $ 6,606 $19,683 20 $89,841 N/M
Gross profit $ 7,797 $ 8,908 $ 604 $(1,111) (12) $ 8,304 N/M
Adjusted gross profit $ 7,593 $ 6,984 $ 531 $ 609 9 $ 6,453 N/M
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations $ 5,363 $ 5,092 $ 380 $ 271 5 %$ 4,712 N/M
Pre-tax adjusted margin 4.6 % 5.3 % 5.8 % (70)bps (50) bps
For the Years Ended December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable) (Dollars and adjusted scripts in millions) 2020 2019
Selected Financial Information
Pharmacy revenue by distribution channel
Adjusted network revenues $ 56,181 $ 41,483 35 %
Adjusted home delivery and specialty revenues 49,886 45,836 9 %
Other revenues 5,403 4,900 10 %
Total adjusted pharmacy revenues $ 111,470 $ 92,219 21 %
Pharmacy script volume
Adjusted network scripts 1,206 941 28 %
Adjusted home delivery and specialty scripts 287 283 1 %
Total adjusted scripts 1,493 1,224 22 %
Generic fill rate
Network 87.4 % 87.1 % 30 bps
Home delivery 85.2 % 84.3 % 90 bps
Overall generic fill rate 87.2 % 86.8 % 40 bps
(1)Amounts exclude special items and, for periods prior to 2020, contributions from transitioning clients.
(2)Non-specialty network scripts filled through 90-day programs and home delivery scripts are multiplied by three. All other network and specialty scripts are
counted as one script.
2020 versus 2019
In the first quarter of 2020, U.S. Government operating segment customers transitioned to Express Scripts’ retail pharmacy network.
In the third quarter of 2019, U.S. Commercial operating segment customers transitioned to Express Scripts’ retail pharmacy network.
Results of operations for 2018 reflected the results for the period following the acquisition of Express Scripts on December 20, 2018
along with the legacy Cigna home delivery business.
Adjusted network revenues. The increase reflected the transition of U.S. Medical’s customers, higher claims volume, due to our
collaboration with Prime Therapeutics, and increased prices due to inflation on branded drugs. These favorable effects were partially
offset by claims mix due to the increase in the generic fill rate.
Adjusted home delivery and specialty revenues. The increase reflected higher prices, due to inflation on branded drugs and higher
home delivery and specialty claims volume. These increases were partially offset by claims mix due to an increase in the generic fill
rate.
Adjusted gross profit. The increase reflected customer growth, higher adjusted pharmacy script volumes, benefits from the effective
management of supply chain and the favorable impact of claims mix as a result of the types of drugs dispensed, the distribution
method used for dispensing and fulfilling and an increase in the generic fill rate.(1)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
69
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations. The increase reflected customer growth, higher adjusted pharmacy scripts volumes,
benefits from the effective management of supply chain, and the favorable impact of claims mix as a result of the types of drugs
dispensed, the distribution method used for dispensing and fulfilling and an increase in the generic fill rate, partially offset by an
increase in operating expenses due to client transitions.
U.S. Medical Segment
U.S. Medical includes Cigna’s U.S. Commercial and U.S. Government businesses that provide comprehensive medical and
coordinated solutions to clients and customers. U.S. Commercial products and services include medical, pharmacy, behavioral
health, dental, vision, health advocacy programs and other products and services for insured and self-insured customers. U.S.
Government solutions include Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and Medicare Part D plans for seniors, Medicaid plans,
and individual health insurance plans both on and off the public exchanges. As described in the introduction to Segment Reporting,
performance of the U.S. Medical segment is measured using pre-tax adjusted income from operations. Key factors affecting
profitability for this segment include:
•customer growth;
•revenues from integrated specialty products, including pharmacy services sold to clients and customers across all funding
solutions;
•percentage of Medicare Advantage customers in plans eligible for quality bonus payments;
•benefit expenses as a percentage of premiums (medical care ratio or “MCR”) for our insured commercial and government
businesses; and
•selling, general and administrative expense as a percentage of adjusted revenues (expense ratio).
Results of Operations
Financial Summary For the Years Ended December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Adjusted revenues $38,451 $36,519 $32,791 $ 1,932 5 % $ 3,728 11 %
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations $3,807 $3,831 $3,502 $ (24) (1)% $ 329 9 %
Pre-tax adjusted margin 9.9 % 10.5 % 10.7 % (60)bps (20)bps
Medical care ratio 79.4 % 80.8 % 78.9 % 140 bps (190)bps
Expense ratio 22.8 % 22.9 % 24.7 % 10 bps 180 bps
For the Years Ended December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)
(In thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
U.S. Medical Customers
U.S. Commercial 2,141 2,114 1,911 27 1 % 203 11 %
U.S. Government 1,387 1,361 1,407 26 2 % (46) (3)%
Insured 3,528 3,475 3,318 53 2 % 157 5 %
Service 11,485 12,073 12,071 (588) (5)% 2 — %
Total 15,013 15,548 15,389 (535) (3)% 159 1 %
As of December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Unpaid claims and claim expenses – U.S. Medical $ 3,184 $ 2,892 $ 2,697 $ 292 10 %$ 195 7 %
70
2020 versus 2019
Adjusted revenues. The increase for the year ended December 31, 2020 compared with 2019 reflects customer growth in our
Medicare Advantage and U.S. Commercial insured businesses, as well as higher premium rates due to anticipated underlying
medical cost trend and the resumption of the health insurance industry tax. These favorable effects were partially offset by the impact
of premium relief programs for clients beginning in the second quarter of 2020 in response to significantly lower than historical
utilization as individuals deferred care due to the COVID-19 pandemic.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations was essentially flat reflecting customer growth in our U.S. Commercial insured and
Medicare Advantage businesses and net favorable COVID-19 related impacts; offset by the return of the health insurance industry
tax and less favorable prior period development. COVID-19 related impacts include deferral of care by our customers; partially
offset by direct COVID-19 costs, costs of actions we have taken to support customers, providers and employees, and increased
disenrollment resulting from the economic impacts of the pandemic.
Medical care ratio. The decrease reflects COVID-19 related impacts and the pricing effect of the health insurance industry tax.
COVID-19 related impacts include deferral of care by our customers; partially offset by direct COVID-19 costs and premium relief
programs extended to employer clients.
Expense ratio. The expense ratio was flat reflecting higher insured revenues as well as efficiencies from continued disciplined
expense management and the resumption of the health insurance industry tax.
Other Items Affecting U.S. Medical Results
Unpaid Claims and Claim Expenses
Our unpaid claims and claim expenses liability was higher as of December 31, 2020 compared with December 31, 2019, primarily
due to customer growth in our Medicare Advantage and U.S. Commercial insured businesses.
Medical Customers
Our medical customer base decreased at December 31, 2020 compared with December 31, 2019, reflecting a lower customer base in
our Middle Markets and National Accounts segments and increased disenrollment resulting from the economic impacts of the
COVID-19 pandemic; partially offset by growth in our Select segment and our Medicare Advantage business.
A medical customer is defined as a person meeting any one of the following criteria:
•is covered under a medical insurance policy, managed care arrangement or service agreement issued by us;
•has access to our provider network for covered services under their medical plan; or
•has medical claims that are administered by us.
International Markets Segment
As described in the introduction to Segment Reporting, performance of the International Markets segment is measured using pre-tax
adjusted income from operations. Key factors affecting pre-tax adjusted income from operations for this segment are:
•premium growth, including new business and customer retention;
•benefit expenses as a percentage of premiums (loss ratio);
•selling, general and administrative expense as a percentage of revenues (expense ratio and acquisition cost ratio); and
•the impact of foreign currency movements.
71
Results of Operations
Financial Summary For the Years Ended December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Adjusted revenues $ 5,877 $ 5,615 $ 5,366 $ 262 5 % $ 249 5 %
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations $ 900 $ 762 $ 735 $ 138 18 % $ 27 4 %
Pre-tax adjusted margin 15.3 % 13.6 % 13.7 % 170  bps (10)bps
Loss ratio 56.5 % 57.3 % 57.4 % 80  bps 10 bps
Acquisition cost ratio 11.3 % 12.9 % 13.1 % 160  bps 20 bps
Expense ratio (excluding acquisition costs) 20.2 % 19.5 % 18.9 % (70) bps (60)bps
2020 versus 2019
Adjusted revenues increased mainly due to business growth in Asia and Europe, partially offset by premium relief programs,
primarily in Europe and unfavorable foreign currency movements.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations increased reflecting lower acquisition and loss ratios and business growth, primarily in
Asia, partially offset by higher expense ratios. The ratios in 2020 reflect the costs of actions to support clients; additionally, the
expense ratio reflects actions to support employees and investments in the business for future growth.
The segment’s loss ratio decreased reflecting lower medical utilization due to the COVID-19 pandemic, partially offset by premium
relief programs.
The acquisition cost ratio decreased reflecting an update to our commission deferral process and lower acquisition expenses in Asia,
partially offset by premium relief programs.
The expense ratio (excluding acquisition costs) increased, reflecting strategic investments and the unfavorable impact of premium
relief programs.
Other Items Related to International Markets Results
South Korea is the single largest geographic market for our International Markets segment. For the year ended December 31, 2020,
South Korea generated 38% of the segment’s adjusted revenues and 60% of the segment’s pre-tax adjusted income from operations.
Group Disability and Other
Group Disability and Other included for the period presented, Cigna’s Group Disability and Life business which offered group long-
term and short-term disability, and group life, accident, voluntary and specialty insurance products and services. Additionally, this
segment includes Corporate Owned Life Insurance (“COLI”) and the Company’s run-off operations. As described in the introduction
of Segment Reporting, performance of Group Disability and Other is measured using pre-tax adjusted income from operations. Key
factors affecting pre-tax adjusted income from operations are:
•premium growth, including new business and customer retention;
•net investment income;
•benefit expenses as a percentage of premiums (loss ratio); and
•selling, general and administrative expense as a percentage of revenues excluding net investment income (expense ratio).
Results of Operations
Financial Summary For the Years Ended December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Adjusted revenues $ 5,264 $ 5,182 $ 5,061 $ 82 2 % $ 121 2 %
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations $ 290 $ 501 $ 529 $ (211) (42)% $ (28) (5)%
Pre-tax adjusted margin 5.5 % 9.7 % 10.5 % (420)bps (80)bps
72
2020 versus 2019
Adjusted revenues increased due to growth in disability, life and voluntary products, partially offset by lower investment income.
Pre-tax adjusted income from operations and margin decreased due to unfavorable life claims experience related to the COVID-19
pandemic, unfavorable disability claims experience and lower investment income, partially offset by favorable results in our
voluntary products.
Sale of U.S. Group Disability and Life Business. As discussed further in the Executive Overview section of this MD&A, we sold
our U.S. Group Disability and Life business on December 31, 2020. Because this business constituted the vast majority of the
segment, going forward, we would expect a substantial decline in adjusted revenues and adjusted income from operations in this
segment.
Corporate
Corporate reflects amounts not allocated to operating segments, including net interest expense (defined as interest on corporate debt
less net investment income on investments not supporting segment and other operations), certain litigation matters, expense
associated with our frozen pension plans, charitable contributions, severance, certain overhead and project costs and intersegment
eliminations for products and services sold between segments.
Financial Summary For the Years Ended December 31,Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)Change Favorable
(Unfavorable)
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Pre-tax adjusted loss from operations $ (1,552)$ (1,824)$ (403)$ 272 15 %$(1,421)N/M%
2020 versus 2019
Pre-tax adjusted loss from operations was lower, reflecting lower interest expense due to lower levels of debt.
INVESTMENT ASSETS
The following table presents our investment asset portfolio excluding separate account assets as of December 31, 2020 and
December 31, 2019. Additional information regarding our investment assets is included in Notes 11, 12, 13 and 14 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Debt securities $ 18,131 $ 23,755 
Equity securities 501 303 
Commercial mortgage loans 1,419 1,947 
Policy loans 1,351 1,357 
Other long-term investments 2,832 2,403 
Short-term investments 359 423 
Total 30,188 
Investments classified as assets of business held for sale (7,709)
Investments per Consolidated Balance Sheets $ 24,593 $ 22,479 
(1)On December 31, 2020, Cigna completed the sale of its U.S. Group Disability and Life business and transferred a total of $8.4 billion of investments to New York
Life Insurance Company as part of this divestiture. The investment assets transferred to New York Life were primarily debt securities and, to a lesser extent,
commercial mortgage loans. The table above includes $7.7 billion as of December 31, 2019 of investments associated with this business that was previously held
for sale.
Debt Securities
Investments in debt securities include publicly-traded and privately-placed bonds, mortgage and other asset-backed securities and
preferred stocks redeemable by the investor. These investments are classified as available for sale and are carried at fair value on our
balance sheet. Additional information regarding valuation methodologies, key inputs and controls is included in Note 12 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements. More detailed information about debt securities by type of issuer and maturity dates is included
in Note 11 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.(1)
73
The following table reflects our portfolio of debt securities by type of issuer as of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019.
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Federal government and agency $ 456 $ 733 
State and local government 167 810 
Foreign government 2,511 2,256 
Corporate 14,562 19,420 
Mortgage and other asset-backed 435 536 
Total $ 18,131 $ 23,755 
As a result of the U.S. Group Disability and Life business divestiture, $7.8 billion of debt securities were transferred to New York
Life on December 31, 2020, see Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information. The debt securities
transferred to New York Life were primarily Corporate and State and local government sectors. This decrease in our debt securities
portfolio was partially offset by an increase in valuations due to decreasing yields and net purchase activity during the year.
As of December 31, 2020, $15.6 billion, or 86% of the debt securities in our investment portfolio were investment grade (Baa and
above, or equivalent) and the remaining $2.5 billion were below investment grade. The majority of the bonds that are below
investment grade are rated at the higher end of the non-investment grade spectrum. Although our allocation to below investment
grade bonds has increased since the prior year, these quality characteristics have not otherwise changed materially from the prior
year and remain consistent with our investment strategy.
Investments in debt securities are diversified by issuer, geography and industry as appropriate. On an aggregate basis, the debt
securities portfolio continues to perform according to original investment expectations. However, due to the economic impacts of the
COVID-19 pandemic, there are certain issuers, particularly within the aviation, energy and hospitality sectors, that are showing signs
of distress, primarily in the form of requests for temporary covenant relief. There were no material unrealized losses in any of these
sectors as of the reporting date. We continue to monitor the economic environment and its effect on our portfolio, and consider the
impact of various factors in determining the allowance for credit losses on debt securities, which is discussed in Note 11 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
Foreign government obligations are concentrated in Asia, primarily South Korea, consistent with our risk management practice and
local regulatory requirements of our international business operations. Corporate debt securities include private placement assets of
$6.0 billion. These investments are generally less marketable than publicly-traded bonds; however, yields on these investments tend
to be higher than yields on publicly-traded bonds with comparable credit risk. We perform a credit analysis of each issuer and require
financial and other covenants that allow us to monitor issuers for deteriorating financial strength and pursue remedial actions, if
warranted.
Commercial Mortgage Loans
As of December 31, 2020, the $1.4 billion commercial mortgage loan portfolio consisted of approximately 45 loans that are in good
standing. Our commercial mortgage loans are fixed rate loans, diversified by property type, location and borrower. Given the quality
and diversity of the underlying real estate, positive debt service coverage and significant borrower cash invested generally ranging
between 30 and 40%, we remain confident that the vast majority of borrowers will continue to perform as expected under their
contract terms. For further discussion of the results and changes in key loan metrics, see Note 11 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
As a result of the U.S. Group Disability and Life business divestiture, $0.6 billion of commercial mortgage loans were transferred to
New York Life on December 31, 2020, see Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information. Loans are
secured by high quality commercial properties, located in strong institutional markets, and are generally made at less than 65% of the
property’s value at origination of the loan. Property value, debt service coverage, quality, building tenancy and stability of cash flows
are all important financial underwriting considerations. We hold no direct residential mortgage loans and do not originate or service
securitized mortgage loans.
COVID-19 has negatively impacted commercial real estate fundamentals and capital market activity with concentrated weakness in
hotels and regional malls. Our mortgage loan portfolio is well diversified by property type and geography with no material exposure
to hotels and no exposure to regional shopping malls. We continue to monitor the long-term impacts on the office sector due to
growing headwinds: expanded remote working flexibility, shorter term leases and corporate migration to lower cost states. Our
mortgage loans secured by office properties are in good standing.
74
Other Long-term Investments
Other long-term investments of $2.8 billion as of December 31, 2020 included investments in securities limited partnerships and real
estate limited partnerships, direct investments in real estate joint ventures and other deposit activity that is required to support
various insurance and health services businesses. The increase in other long-term investments is driven by net new funding activity.
These limited partnership entities typically invest in mezzanine debt or equity of privately-held companies and equity real estate.
Given our subordinate position in the capital structure of these underlying entities, we assume a higher level of risk for higher
expected returns. To mitigate risk, these investments are diversified across approximately 175 separate partnerships and
approximately 90 general partners who manage one or more of these partnerships. Also, the underlying investments are diversified
by industry sector or property type and geographic region. No single partnership investment exceeded 4% of our securities and real
estate partnership portfolio.
Income from our limited partnership investments is generally reported on a one quarter lag due to the timing of when financial
information is received from the general partner or manager of the investments. We could experience losses into future periods, but
the magnitude of these losses will depend in part on the length and extent of the economic disruption, the speed of the recovery and
the overall economic impacts.
We participate in an insurance joint venture in China with a 50% ownership interest. We account for this joint venture on the equity
method of accounting and report our share of the net assets of $0.8 billion in Other assets. Our 50% share of the investment portfolio
supporting the joint venture's business is approximately $5.6 billion, primarily invested in Chinese corporate and government debt
securities diversified by issuer, industry and geography, as appropriate. To a lesser extent and consistent with its investment strategy,
the joint venture is invested in Chinese equity investments comprised of approximately 50% equity mutual funds, with the remainder
invested in equity securities and private equity partnerships. We participate in the approval of the joint venture's investment strategy
and continuously review its execution. There were no investments with a material unrealized loss as of December 31, 2020.
Investment Outlook
The impact of COVID-19 on the economy, despite unprecedented monetary and fiscal support, and the uncertainty as to the strength
and sustainability of the recovery prior to a widely available vaccine, continues to dominate financial markets. The low interest rate
environment continues to pressure income from both short-term and longer-term investments. U.S. treasury rates remain near all-
time lows and the wider market credit spreads experienced during the beginning of the second quarter of 2020 have meaningfully
narrowed, resulting in historically low yields for investment grade assets. We continue to actively monitor the economic impact of
the pandemic, as well as fiscal and monetary responses, and their potential impact on the portfolio. Net investment income
projections into 2021 reflect continued market volatility and portfolio impacts, particularly in certain sectors such as aviation,
hospitality and energy, as well as other areas most severely impacted by COVID-19. Future realized and unrealized investment
results will be driven largely by market conditions that exist when a transaction occurs or at the reporting date. These future
conditions are not reasonably predictable; however, we believe that the vast majority of our investments will continue to perform
under their contractual terms. Based on our strategy to match the duration of invested assets to the duration of insurance and
contractholder liabilities, we expect to hold a significant portion of these assets for the long-term. Although future impairment losses
resulting from interest rate movements and credit deterioration due to both investment-specific and the global economic uncertainties
discussed above remain possible, we do not expect these losses to have a material adverse effect on our financial condition or
liquidity.
MARKET RISK
Financial Instruments
Our assets and liabilities include financial instruments subject to the risk of potential losses from adverse changes in market rates and
prices. Consistent with disclosure requirements, the following items have been excluded from this consideration of market risk for
financial instruments:
•changes in the fair values of insurance-related assets and liabilities because their primary risks are insurance rather than market
risk;
•changes in the fair values of investments recorded using the equity method of accounting and liabilities for pension and other
postretirement and postemployment benefit plans (and related assets); and
•changes in the fair values of other significant assets and liabilities, such as goodwill, deferred policy acquisition costs, taxes and
various accrued liabilities. Because they are not financial instruments, their primary risks are other than market risk.
Excluding these items, our primary market risk exposures from financial instruments are:
•Interest-rate risk on fixed-rate, medium-term instruments. Changes in market interest rates affect the value of instruments that
promise a fixed return.
75
•Foreign currency exchange rate risk of the U.S. dollar, net of derivatives used for hedging, is primarily to the South Korean
won, Chinese yuan renminbi and New Zealand dollar. An unfavorable change in exchange rates reduces the carrying value of net
assets denominated in foreign currencies.
Our Management of Market Risks
We predominantly rely on three techniques to manage our exposure to market risk:
•Investment/liability matching. We generally select investment assets with characteristics (such as duration, yield, currency and
liquidity) that correspond to the underlying characteristics of our related insurance and contractholder liabilities so that we can
match the investments to our obligations. Shorter-term investments generally support shorter-term life and health liabilities.
Medium-term, fixed-rate investments support interest-sensitive and health liabilities. Longer-term investments generally support
products with longer payout periods such as annuities.
•Use of local currencies for foreign operations. We generally conduct our international business through foreign operating
entities that maintain assets and liabilities in local currencies. This technique limits exchange rate risk to our net assets.
•Use of derivatives. We use derivative financial instruments to reduce our primary market risks. See Note 11 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements for additional information about derivative financial instruments.
Effect of Market Fluctuations
Assuming a 100 basis point increase in interest rates and 10% strengthening in the U.S. dollar to foreign currencies, the effect of
hypothetical changes in market rates or prices on the fair value of certain financial instruments, subject to the exclusions noted above
(particularly insurance liabilities), would have been as follows as of December 31:
Market scenario for certain non-insurance financial instruments Loss in Fair Value
(in billions) 2020 2019
100 basis point increase in interest rates (excluding long-term debt) $ 1.4 $ 1.6 
10% strengthening in U.S. dollar to foreign currencies $ 0.4 $ 0.3 
The effect of a hypothetical increase in interest rates, primarily on debt securities and commercial mortgage loans, was determined
by estimating the present value of future cash flows using various models, primarily duration modeling. The decrease in our
sensitivity to market interest rates since the prior year is primarily due to our decreased interest sensitive investment portfolio base,
due to the transfer of debt securities and commercial mortgage loans to New York Life on December 31, 2020. See Note 5 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information on the divestiture of our U.S. Group Disability and Life business.
In the event of a hypothetical 100 basis point increase in interest rates, the fair value of the Company’s long-term debt would
decrease approximately $3.0 billion at December 31, 2020 and $2.5 billion at December 31, 2019. Changes in the fair value of our
long-term debt do not impact our financial position or operating results. See Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for
additional information about the Company’s debt.
The effect of a hypothetical strengthening of the U.S. dollar relative to the foreign currencies of certain financial instruments held by
us was estimated to be 10% of the fair value of these instruments, translated to the U.S. dollar. Our foreign operations hold
investment assets, such as debt securities, cash and cash equivalents that are generally invested in the currency of the related
liabilities.
Item 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
The information contained under the caption “Market Risk” in the MD&A section of this Form 10-K is incorporated by reference.
76
Item 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Cigna Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Cigna Corporation and its subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, changes in total equity and
cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, including the related notes (collectively referred to as
the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of
the Company as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2020 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Also
in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December
31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company's management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting appearing under Item 9A. Our responsibility is to express
opinions on the Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the Company's internal control over financial reporting based
on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and
the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether
due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the
consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness
exists and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also
included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a
reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to
the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements
in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only
in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material
effect on the financial statements.
77
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relates to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the
critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Goodwill Impairment Assessment - Evernorth and U.S. Medical Reporting Units
As described in Note 17 to the consolidated financial statements, as of December 31, 2020, goodwill is primarily reported in the
Evernorth segment ($33.8 billion), the U.S. Medical segment ($10.4 billion) and, to a lesser extent, the International Markets
segment ($0.4 billion). Management conducts its annual quantitative evaluation for goodwill impairment during the third quarter at
the reporting unit level and writes it down through shareholders’ net income if impaired. On a quarterly basis, management performs
a qualitative impairment assessment to determine if events or changes in circumstances indicate that it is more likely than not that the
carrying value of a reporting unit exceeds its estimated fair value. Fair value of a reporting unit is generally estimated based on either
a market approach or a discounted cash flow analysis using assumptions that management believes a hypothetical market participant
would use to determine a current transaction price. The significant assumptions and estimates used in determining fair value include
the discount rate and future cash flows. A discount rate is selected to correspond with each reporting unit's weighted average cost of
capital, consistent with that used for investment decisions considering the specific and detailed operating plans and strategies within
that reporting unit. Projections of future cash flows for each reporting unit are consistent with management’s annual planning process
for revenues, pharmacy costs, benefits expenses, operating expenses, taxes, capital levels and long-term growth rates.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the goodwill impairment assessment of the
Evernorth and U.S. Medical reporting units is a critical audit matter are the significant judgment by management when determining
the fair value measurement of the reporting units. This in turn led to a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in
performing procedures and evaluating management’s estimate of the reporting units’ fair value related to the assumptions for the
discount rate and projection of future cash flows. In addition, the audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill
and knowledge to assist in performing these procedures and evaluating the audit evidence obtained.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall opinion
on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to management’s
goodwill impairment assessment, including controls over management’s methodology, inputs and assumptions used in its goodwill
impairment assessment of the Evernorth and U.S. Medical reporting units. These procedures also included, among others, testing
management’s process for determining the fair value estimate of the reporting units; evaluating the appropriateness of the discounted
cash flow analysis; testing the completeness and accuracy of underlying data used in the discounted cash flow analysis; and
evaluating the key inputs and significant assumptions related to the discount rate and the projections of future cash flows. The
underlying inputs and assumptions used in the development of the discount rate and the projections of future cash flows that were
evaluated related to the weighted average cost of capital, revenues, pharmacy costs, benefits expenses, operating expenses, capital
levels and long-term growth rates. Evaluating the reasonableness of management’s inputs and assumptions involved considering (i)
the current and past performance of the reporting unit, (ii) the consistency of the discount rate and long-term growth rates with
external market and industry data, and (iii) whether these assumptions were consistent with evidence obtained in other areas of the
audit. Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in the evaluation of certain significant assumptions
related to the discount rate.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Hartford, Connecticut
February 25, 2021
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1983.
78
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Income
For the Years Ended December 31,
(In millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Revenues
Pharmacy revenues $ 107,769 $ 103,099 $ 5,479 
Premiums 42,627 39,714 36,113 
Fees and other revenues 8,761 9,363 5,578 
Net investment income 1,244 1,390 1,480 
TOTAL REVENUES 160,401 153,566 48,650 
Benefits and expenses
Pharmacy and other service costs 103,484 97,668 4,793 
Medical costs and other benefit expenses 32,710 30,819 27,528 
Selling, general and administrative expenses 14,072 14,053 11,934 
Amortization of acquired intangible assets 1,982 2,949 235 
TOTAL BENEFITS AND EXPENSES 152,248 145,489 44,490 
Income from operations 8,153 8,077 4,160 
Interest expense and other (1,438) (1,682) (498)
Debt extinguishment costs (199) (2) — 
Gain (loss) on sale of business 4,203 — — 
Net realized investment gains (losses) 149 177 (81)
Income before income taxes 10,868 6,570 3,581 
TOTAL INCOME TAXES 2,379 1,450 935 
Net income 8,489 5,120 2,646 
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 31 16 9 
SHAREHOLDERS' NET INCOME $ 8,458 $ 5,104 $ 2,637 
Shareholders’ net income per share
Basic $ 23.17 $ 13.58 $ 10.69 
Diluted $ 22.96 $ 13.44 $ 10.54 
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
79
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
For the Years Ended December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net income $ 8,489 $ 5,120 $ 2,646 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax
Net unrealized (depreciation) appreciation on securities and derivatives (75) 957 (365)
Net translation gains (losses) on foreign currencies 252 (59) (167)
Postretirement benefits liability adjustment (105) (133) 127 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 72 765 (405)
Total comprehensive income 8,561 5,885 2,241 
Comprehensive income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests
Net income attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interest 14 11 9 
Net income attributable to other noncontrolling interests 17 5 — 
Other comprehensive (loss) attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interest (8) (5) (15)
Total comprehensive income (loss) attributable to noncontrolling interests 23 11 (6)
SHAREHOLDERS' COMPREHENSIVE INCOME $ 8,538 $ 5,874 $ 2,247 
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
80
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Balance Sheets
As of December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019
Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 10,182 $ 4,619 
Investments 1,331 937 
Accounts receivable, net 12,191 10,716 
Inventories 3,165 2,661 
Other current assets 930 1,400 
Assets of business held for sale — 9,512 
Total current assets 27,799 29,845 
Long-term investments 23,262 21,542 
Reinsurance recoverables 5,200 5,100 
Deferred policy acquisition costs 3,385 2,958 
Property and equipment 4,205 4,417 
Goodwill 44,648 44,602 
Other intangible assets 35,179 36,562 
Other assets 2,687 2,283 
Separate account assets 9,086 8,465 
TOTAL ASSETS $ 155,451 $ 155,774 
Liabilities
Current insurance and contractholder liabilities $ 5,308 $ 4,921 
Pharmacy and other service costs payable 13,347 10,454 
Accounts payable 5,478 5,090 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 8,515 7,347 
Short-term debt 3,374 5,514 
Liabilities of business held for sale — 6,812 
Total current liabilities 36,022 40,138 
Non-current insurance and contractholder liabilities 16,844 16,052 
Deferred tax liabilities, net 8,939 9,387 
Other non-current liabilities 4,629 4,460 
Long-term debt 29,545 31,893 
Separate account liabilities 9,086 8,465 
TOTAL LIABILITIES 105,065 110,395 
Contingencies — Note 21
Redeemable noncontrolling interests 58 35 
Shareholders’ equity
Common stock 4 4 
Additional paid-in capital 28,975 28,306 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (861) (941)
Retained earnings 28,575 20,162 
Less: treasury stock, at cost (6,372) (2,193)
TOTAL SHAREHOLDERS’ EQUITY 50,321 45,338 
Other noncontrolling interests 7 6 
Total equity 50,328 45,344 
Total liabilities and equity $ 155,451 $ 155,774 
(1)Par value per share, $0.01; shares issued, 390 million as of December 31, 2020 and 386 million as of December 31, 2019; authorized shares, 600 million.
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(1)
81
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Total Equity
(In millions)Common
StockAdditional
Paid-in
CapitalAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
(Loss)Retained
EarningsTreasury
StockShareholders’
EquityOther Non-
controlling
InterestsTotal
EquityRedeemable
Noncontrolling
Interests
Balance at December 31,
2017 $ 74 $ 2,940 $ (1,082)$15,800 $(4,021)$ 13,711 $ — $13,711 $ 49 
Cumulative effect of
accounting for financial
instruments and hedging (10) 68 58 58 
Reclassification
adjustment related to U.S.
tax reform legislation (229) 229 — — 
Retirement of treasury
stock (13) (529) (3,498) 4,040 — — 
Exchange of Old Cigna
common stock (58) 58 — — 
Acquisition of Express
Scripts (see Note 5) 1 25,223 25,224 7 25,231 
Effect of issuing stock for
employee benefit plans 59 (138) 206 127 127 
Other comprehensive
(loss) (390) (390) (390) (15)
Net income 2,637 2,637 2,637 9 
Common dividends
declared (per share: $0.04) (10) (10) (10)
Repurchase of common
stock (329) (329) (329)
Other transactions
impacting noncontrolling
interests — — (6)
Balance at December 31,
2018 $ 4 $27,751 $ (1,711)$15,088 $ (104)$ 41,028 $ 7 $41,035 $ 37 
Cumulative effect of
adopting new lease
accounting guidance (ASU
2016-02) (15) (15) (15)
Effect of issuing stock for
employee benefit plans 555 (104) 451 451 
Other comprehensive
income (loss) 770 770 770 (5)
Net income 5,104 5,104 5 5,109 11 
Common dividends
declared (per share: $0.04) (15) (15) (15)
Repurchase of common
stock (1,985) (1,985) (1,985)
Other transactions
impacting noncontrolling
interests — (6) (6) (8)
Balance at December 31,
2019 $ 4 $28,306 $ (941)$20,162 $(2,193)$ 45,338 $ 6 $45,344 $ 35 
Cumulative effect of
adopting new credit loss
guidance (ASU 2016-13)(30) (30) (30)
Effect of issuing stock for
employee benefit plans 672 (90) 582 582 
Other comprehensive
income (loss) 80 80 80 (8)
Net income 8,458 8,458 17 8,475 14 
Common dividends
declared (per share: $0.04) (15) (15) (15)
Repurchase of common
stock (4,089) (4,089) (4,089)
Other transactions
impacting noncontrolling
interests (3) (3) (16) (19) 17 
Balance at December 31,
2020 $ 4 $28,975 $ (861)$28,575 $(6,372)$ 50,321 $ 7 $50,328 $ 58 
(1)See Note 3 for further information about the Company's adoption of new credit loss guidance (ASU 2016-13).
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(1)
82
Cigna Corporation
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
For the Years Ended December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Cash Flows from Operating Activities
Net income $ 8,489 $ 5,120 $ 2,646 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 2,802 3,651 695 
Realized investment losses (gains), net (149) (177) 81 
Deferred income tax (benefit) (386) (313) (101)
Gain on sale of business (4,203) — — 
Debt extinguishment costs 199 2 — 
Net changes in assets and liabilities, net of non-operating effects:
Accounts receivable (1,496) (713) 705 
Inventories (504) 149 (107)
Deferred policy acquisition costs (307) (242) (237)
Reinsurance recoverable and Other assets 230 (277) (234)
Insurance liabilities 841 575 560 
Pharmacy and other service costs payable 2,891 (192) (842)
Accounts payable and Accrued expenses and other liabilities 1,346 1,343 332 
Other, net 597 559 272 
NET CASH PROVIDED BY OPERATING ACTIVITIES 10,350 9,485 3,770 
Cash Flows from Investing Activities
Proceeds from investments sold:
Debt securities and equity securities 2,283 3,487 2,655 
Investment maturities and repayments:
Debt securities and equity securities 1,519 1,825 2,151 
Commercial mortgage loans 19 199 215 
Other sales, maturities and repayments (primarily short-term and other long-term investments) 1,575 1,311 734 
Investments purchased or originated:
Debt securities and equity securities (4,765) (4,282) (5,637)
Commercial mortgage loans (113) (307) (312)
Other (primarily short-term and other long-term investments) (1,924) (1,753) (1,189)
Property and equipment purchases, net (1,094) (1,050) (528)
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired (139) (153) (24,455)
Divestiture, net of cash sold 5,592 — — 
Other, net 23 (11) (12)
NET CASH PROVIDED BY (USED IN) INVESTING ACTIVITIES 2,976 (734) (26,378)
Cash Flows from Financing Activities
Deposits and interest credited to contractholder deposit funds 1,023 955 1,040 
Withdrawals and benefit payments from contractholder deposit funds (979) (1,097) (1,151)
Net change in short-term debt 60 (681) 1,487 
Net proceeds on issuance of term loan 1,398 — — 
Repayment of term loan (1,400) — — 
Payments for debt extinguishment (212) (3) — 
Repayment of long-term debt (8,047) (4,491) (131)
Net proceeds on issuance of long-term debt 3,465 — 22,856 
Repurchase of common stock (4,042) (1,987) (342)
Issuance of common stock 376 224 68 
Other, net (175) (107) (312)
NET CASH (USED IN) PROVIDED BY FINANCING ACTIVITIES (8,533) (7,187) 23,515 
Effect of foreign currency rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 41 (8) (24)
Net increase in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 4,834 1,556 883 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash January 1, 5,411 3,855 2,972 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash, December 31, 10,245 5,411 3,855 
Cash reclassified to assets of business held for sale — (743) — 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash December 31, per Consolidated Balance Sheets $ 10,245 $ 4,668 $ 3,855 
Supplemental Disclosure of Cash Information:
Income taxes paid, net of refunds $ 1,837 $ 1,776 $ 1,019 
Interest paid $ 1,439 $ 1,645 $ 267 
(1)Includes $743 million reported in Assets of business held for sale as of January 1, 2020. See table below for Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash
reconciliation.
(2)See table below for Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash reconciliation as of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019.(1)
(2)
83
The following table provides a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash and cash equivalents reported within the
Consolidated Balance Sheets to the totals above:
As of December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019
Cash and cash equivalents $ 10,182 $ 4,619 
Restricted cash and cash equivalents, included in other long-term investments 63 49 
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash and cash equivalents $ 10,245 $ 4,668 
The accompanying Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
84
CIGNA CORPORATION
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Note Number Footnote Page
BUSINESS AND CAPITAL STRUCTURE
1 Description of Business 86
2 COVID-19 and Related Economic Impact 87
3 Summary of Significant Accounting Policies 87
4 Accounts Receivable, Net 94
5 Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures 95
6 Earnings Per Share 96
7 Debt 97
8 Common and Preferred Stock 99
INSURANCE INFORMATION
9 Insurance and Contractholder Liabilities 100
10 Reinsurance 104
INVESTMENTS
11 Investments 108
12 Fair Value Measurements 115
13 Variable Interest Entities 120
14 Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) 122
WORKFORCE MANAGEMENT AND COMPENSATION
15 Pension 123
16 Employee Incentive Plans 127
PROPERTY, LEASES AND OTHER ASSET BALANCES
17 Goodwill, Other Intangibles and Property and Equipment 130
18 Leases 132
COMPLIANCE, REGULATION AND CONTINGENCIES
19 Shareholders’ Equity and Dividend Restrictions 134
20 Income Taxes 134
21 Contingencies and Other Matters 137
RESULTS DETAILS
22 Segment Information 138
85
Note 1 – Description of Business
Cigna Corporation, together with its subsidiaries (either individually or collectively referred to as “Cigna,” the “Company,” “we,”
“our” or “us”) is a global health services organization with a mission of helping those we serve improve their health, well-being and
peace of mind. We offer a differentiated set of pharmacy, medical, dental, disability, life and accident insurance and related products
and services by our subsidiaries.
The majority of these products are offered through employers and other groups such as governmental and non-governmental
organizations, unions and associations. Cigna also offers commercial health and dental insurance, Medicare and Medicaid products
and health, life and accident insurance coverages to individuals in the United States and selected international markets. In addition to
these ongoing operations, Cigna also has certain run-off operations.
The Company reports its results in the segments detailed below:
In connection with the launch of Evernorth in the third quarter 2020, two reporting segments were re-named: Health Services was
renamed as Evernorth and Integrated Medical was renamed as U.S. Medical. In addition, two of our operating segments were re-
named: Commercial and Government were renamed as U.S. Commercial and U.S. Government, respectively. There were no changes
to the underlying businesses reported in the segments.
Evernorth includes a broad range of coordinated and point solution health services capabilities, as well as those from partners across
the health care system in pharmacy solutions, benefits management solutions, care solutions and intelligence solutions, which are
provided to health plans, employers, government organizations and health care providers.
U.S. Medical includes Cigna’s U.S. Commercial and U.S. Government businesses that provide comprehensive medical and
coordinated solutions to clients and customers. U.S. Commercial products and services include medical, pharmacy, behavioral
health, dental, vision, health advocacy programs and other products and services for insured and self-insured clients. U.S.
Government solutions include Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and Medicare Part D plans for seniors, Medicaid plans,
and individual health insurance plans both on and off the public exchanges.
International Markets includes supplemental health, life and accident insurance products and health care coverage in our
international markets, as well as health care benefits for globally mobile employees of multinational organizations.
The remainder of our business operations are reported in Group Disability and Other, consisting of the following:
•Group Disability and Life provides group long-term and short-term disability, group life, accident, voluntary and specialty
insurance products and related services. On December 31, 2020, Cigna completed the sale of its U.S. Group Disability and
Life business to New York Life Insurance Company. See Note 5 for additional information.
•Corporate-Owned Life Insurance (“COLI”) offers permanent insurance contracts sold to corporations to provide coverage
on the lives of certain employees for the purpose of financing employer-paid future benefit obligations.
•Run-off businesses:
•Reinsurance: predominantly comprised of guaranteed minimum death benefit (“GMDB”) and guaranteed
minimum income benefit (“GMIB”) business effectively exited through reinsurance with Berkshire Hathaway Life
Insurance Company of Nebraska (“Berkshire”) in 2013.
•Settlement Annuity business in run-off.
•Individual Life Insurance and Annuity and Retirement Benefits businesses: deferred gains from the sales of
these businesses.
Corporate reflects amounts not allocated to operating segments, including net interest expense (defined as interest on corporate debt
less net investment income on investments not supporting segment and other operations), certain litigation matters, expense
associated with our frozen pension plans, charitable contributions, severance, certain overhead and project costs and intersegment
eliminations for products and services sold between segments.
86
Note 2 – COVID-19 and Related Economic Impact
All aspects of our business were impacted in fiscal year 2020 by the ongoing coronavirus ("COVID-19") pandemic. The Company
initiated several actions to assist our customers, clients, health care providers and employees in this time of crisis. As described
below, management has taken a number of steps to assess the impact on our business, including the financial reporting implications
associated with this pandemic.
The COVID-19 pandemic has pervasively impacted the economy, financial markets and the global health care delivery systems. The
effects of the COVID-19 pandemic on the Company began to emerge in the United States at the end of the first quarter and were not
material to the Company's results of operations or financial condition for that period.
Beginning in April, we experienced a significant deferral of care by our customers. The deferral of care moderated over the course of
the second quarter with utilization levels eventually returning to nearly normal levels by the end of June. In the third quarter, we
experienced increased medical utilization as we observed a reduction to the level of deferred care and our customers sought care for
COVID-19 testing and treatment.
In the fourth quarter, as COVID-19 cases increased, the costs for testing and treatment exceeded the savings related to the deferral of
care. These impacts were most prevalent in the U.S. Medical segment where fourth quarter earnings were adversely impacted by
increased costs of COVID-19 care and decreased contributions from our specialty products. Full year U.S. Medical results reflect
COVID-19 impacts of deferral of care by our customers partially offset by the cost of COVID-19 care, the cost of COVID-19 related
actions including premium relief programs for employer clients, cost share waivers for customers, customer disenrollment and
actions to support providers and employees.
Our Group Disability and Other results reflect significantly elevated life insurance claims related to the COVID-19 pandemic and its
effects in the third and fourth quarters. Quarterly and year-to-date earnings in our Evernorth segment also reflected effects of the
pandemic, specifically, a favorable mix of claims as a result of both the type of drugs dispensed as well as the distribution method
used for dispensing and fulfilling, partially offset by lower 30-day retail script volume.
The Company conducted its annual quantitative evaluation of goodwill impairment during the third quarter of 2020. These
evaluations were performed at the reporting unit level, based on discounted cash flow analyses and market data. The estimated fair
value of each of our reporting units exceeded their carrying values by significant margins. During the fourth quarter of 2020, the
Company conducted its normal quarterly qualitative assessment and concluded that the current economic and business conditions did
not result in a triggering event requiring a quantitative analysis.
For all other long-lived assets, including intangible assets, the Company conducted its normal quarterly qualitative impairment
assessment and concluded that the current economic and business conditions did not result in a triggering event requiring a
quantitative impairment analysis. There were no material impairments recorded for the year ended December 31, 2020.
The Company reviewed all classes of financial instruments including investments, accounts receivable and reinsurance recoverables.
The additional allowance for expected credit losses recorded was not material for the year ended December 31, 2020.
Note 3 – Summary of Significant Accounting Policies    
Basis of Presentation
The Consolidated Financial Statements include the accounts of Cigna Corporation and its consolidated subsidiaries. Intercompany
transactions and accounts have been eliminated in consolidation. These Consolidated Financial Statements were prepared in
conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (“GAAP”).
Amounts recorded in the Consolidated Financial Statements necessarily reflect management’s estimates and assumptions about
medical costs, investment and receivable valuations, interest rates and other factors. Significant estimates are discussed throughout
these Notes; however, actual results could differ from those estimates. The impact of a change in estimate is generally included in
earnings in the period of adjustment.
Recently Adopted Accounting Guidance
The Company adopted Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”) No. 2016-13, Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial
Instruments, and its related amendments, as of January 1, 2020, using the modified retrospective transition method. The new
standard requires the use of a current expected credit loss impairment model to develop and recognize credit losses for financial
instruments at amortized cost when the asset is first originated or acquired, and each subsequent reporting period. The new standard
also eliminates the concept
87
of other-than-temporary impairments and changes the criteria for impairment of available-for-sale debt securities. A cumulative
effect adjustment of $30 million after-tax was recorded as a reduction to retained earnings as of January 1, 2020, reflecting an
additional allowance for future expected credit losses required under the new model, primarily related to reinsurance recoverables.
Subsequent changes in the allowance are reported in current period earnings. See additional information regarding the Company’s
accounting policy for establishing the allowance for credit losses in Accounts Receivable, Net (Note 4), Reinsurance (Note 10) and
Investments (Note 11).
The Company adopted ASU 2017-04, Simplifying the Test for Goodwill Impairment, as of January 1, 2020, on a prospective basis.
The new standard eliminates the need to determine the fair value of individual assets and liabilities of a reporting unit to measure a
goodwill impairment. There was no impact of adopting this new standard to the Company’s financial statements because our
quarterly qualitative assessments did not result in a triggering event for impairment of goodwill, and the results of our annual
quantitative evaluation performed in the third quarter of 2020 indicated that the estimated fair value of each of our reporting units
exceeded their carrying values by significant margins.
Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted
Facilitation of the Effects of Reference Rate Reform on Financial Reporting (ASU 2020-04)
•Optional, effective upon issuance (March 12, 2020) through December 31, 2022.
•Provides temporary optional relief to ease the potential burden of accounting for reference rate reform under existing
GAAP. Amendments are elective and apply to all entities that have contracts, hedging relationships and other transactions
that reference interbank offered rates, including LIBOR, expected to be discontinued for new contracts by December 31,
2021.
•Permits optional expedients and exceptions to simplify the accounting for contract modifications, hedging arrangements and
held-to-maturity investments, when certain changes are made to a contract or instrument to facilitate reference rate reform.
•An entity may elect to apply the amendments, by topic or subsection, at any point prospectively through December 31,
2022. When elected, the optional expedients must be applied consistently for all eligible contracts or transactions.
To date, the Company has identified minimal exposure to LIBOR and does not anticipate that LIBOR’s phase-out will have a
material impact on its operations or financial results.
88
Targeted Improvements to the Accounting for Long-Duration Contracts (ASU 2018-12)
•Effective date of January 1, 2023 for Cigna (early adoption permitted) and requires the following key provisions (for
insurance entities that issue long-duration contracts)
•Changes to the measurement of the future policy benefits liability for traditional and limited-pay insurance contracts:
•Assumptions used to measure cash flows (such as mortality, morbidity and lapse assumptions) to be updated at
least annually with the effect of changes in those assumptions remeasured retrospectively and reflected in current
period net income.
•Discount rate assumptions to be updated quarterly based on an upper-medium grade fixed-income instrument yield
that maximizes the use of observable market inputs, with any changes reflected in other comprehensive income.
•Deferred policy acquisition costs ("DAC") related to long-duration insurance contracts to be amortized on a constant-level
basis over the expected term of the related contracts. Other related deferred or capitalized balances (such as unearned
revenue liability and value of business acquired) may use this simplified amortization method.
•Market risk benefits (defined as protecting the contractholder from other-than-nominal capital market risk and exposing the
insurer to that risk) to be measured at fair value, with changes in fair value recognized in net income each period, except for
the effect of changes in the insurance entity’s credit risk to be recognized in other comprehensive income.
•Additional disclosures, including disaggregated rollforwards for the liability for future policy benefits, market risk benefits,
separate account liabilities and deferred acquisition costs, as well as information about significant inputs, judgments,
assumptions and methods used in measurement.
•Transition methods at adoption vary:
•Changes to the liability for future policy benefits to use a modified retrospective approach applied to all
outstanding contracts on the basis of their existing carrying amounts as of the beginning of the earliest period
presented, with an option to elect a full retrospective transition under certain criteria. Remeasuring the future
policy benefits liability for the discount rate to be recorded through accumulated other comprehensive income at
transition.
•DAC to follow the transition method used for future policyholder benefits.
•Market risk benefits to be transitioned retrospectively and measured at fair value at the beginning of the earliest
period presented. The difference between this fair value and carrying value to be recognized in the opening balance
of retained earnings, excluding the effect of credit risk changes that are to be recognized in accumulated other
comprehensive income.
Expected effects:
•The new guidance will apply to our long-duration insurance products predominantly within the International Markets and
Other segments.
•The Company will adopt the standard on January 1, 2023, using the modified retrospective transition method for changes to
the liability for future policy benefits and DAC.
•The Company has developed a cross-functional implementation project plan and expects to have significant changes to our
processes, systems, controls and financial results and disclosures.
•Although we continue to evaluate the new requirements of the standard and model their impacts across various products, we
are unable to project or estimate the magnitude or frequency of expected changes to our financial results. However, it is
possible that our income recognition pattern could change for several reasons:
•Applying periodic assumption updates, versus the current locked-in model, may change our timing of profit or loss
recognition.
•DAC amortization will be on a constant level basis over the expected term of the related contracts, and no longer
tied to the emergence of profit on such contracts.
•Features, such as the Company’s GMDB product, that provide market-risk benefits are not currently measured at
fair value, so these liabilities and related reinsurance recoverables will become subject to market sensitivity,
notably to interest rates.
•While not yet quantified, the cumulative effect of implementing this guidance may be material to the Company’s beginning
shareholders' equity balance upon adoption.
•The Company continues to monitor developing implementation guidance, particularly with respect to reinsured blocks of
business.
89
Significant Accounting Policies
The Company’s accounting policies are described either in this Note or in the applicable Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements as listed in the table of contents.
A.Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivalents are carried at cost that approximates fair value. Cash equivalents consist of short-term investments with
maturities of three months or less from the time of purchase. The Company reclassifies cash overdraft positions to liabilities when
the legal right of offset does not exist.
B.Inventories
Inventories consist of prescription drugs and medical supplies and are stated at the lower of first-in-first-out cost or net realizable
value.
C.Deferred Policy Acquisition Costs
Costs eligible for deferral include incremental, direct costs of acquiring new or renewal insurance and investment contracts and other
costs directly related to successful contract acquisition. Examples of deferrable costs include commissions, sales compensation and
benefits, policy issuance and underwriting costs. The Company records acquisition costs differently depending on the product line.
Acquisition costs for:
•Supplemental health, life and accident insurance products (primarily individual products) that comprise the majority of
the Company’s deferred policy acquisition costs and group health and accident insurance products are deferred and
amortized, generally in proportion to the ratio of periodic revenue to the estimated total revenues over the contract periods.
•Universal life products are deferred and amortized in proportion to the present value of total estimated gross profits over
the expected lives of the contracts.
•Other products are expensed as incurred.
Deferred policy acquisition costs also include the value of business acquired (“VOBA”) for certain acquisitions with material long-
duration insurance contracts. The Company recorded amortization of deferred policy acquisition costs of $502 million in 2020, $483
million in 2019 and $406 million in 2018 primarily in Selling, general and administrative expenses.
Each year, deferred policy acquisition costs are tested for recoverability. For universal life and other individual products,
management estimates the present value of future revenues less expected payments. For group health and accident insurance
products, management estimates the sum of unearned premiums and anticipated net investment income less future expected claims
and related costs. If management’s estimates of these sums are less than the deferred costs, the Company reduces deferred policy
acquisition costs and records an additional expense.
D.Other Assets (Current and Non-Current)
Other current assets consist primarily of prepaid expenses, accrued investment income and the current portion of reinsurance
recoverables. Other non-current assets consist primarily of GMIB assets, operating lease right-of-use assets and various other
insurance-related assets. See Note 10 for the Company’s accounting policy for GMIB assets and Note 18 for the Company's
accounting policy related to leases. Additionally, other non-current assets include the carrying value of our equity-method
investments in joint ventures in China, India, the U.S. and other foreign jurisdictions.
E.Assets and Liabilities of Business Held for Sale
The Company classifies assets and liabilities as held for sale (“disposal group”) when management commits to a plan to sell the
disposal group, the sale is probable within one year and the disposal group is available for immediate sale in its present condition.
The Company considers various factors, particularly whether actions required to complete the plan indicate it is unlikely that
significant changes to the plan will be made or the plan will be withdrawn. Assets held for sale are measured at the lower of carrying
value or fair value less costs to sell. Any loss resulting from the measurement is recognized in the period the held for sale criteria are
met. Conversely, gains are not recognized until the date of the sale. When the disposal group is classified as held for sale,
depreciation and amortization ceases and the Company tests the assets for impairment.
90
F.Redeemable Noncontrolling Interest
Redeemable noncontrolling interest on our Consolidated Balance Sheets represents the noncontrolling shareholders preferred and
common stock interests of the Company's consolidated less than fully owned subsidiaries. Those shareholders may choose to require
the Company to purchase their redeemable noncontrolling interest. We also have the right to require those shareholders to sell their
redeemable noncontrolling interest to us. The redeemable noncontrolling interest was recorded at fair value as of the date of
purchase. When the estimated redemption value for a redeemable noncontrolling interest exceeds its carrying value, an adjustment to
increase the redeemable noncontrolling interest is recorded with an offsetting reduction to retained earnings or additional paid-in
capital in the absence of retained earnings. When an adjustment is made to the carrying value of the redeemable noncontrolling
interest, the calculation of shareholders’ net income per share will be adjusted if the redemption value exceeds fair value.
G.Accrued Expenses and Other Current and Non-Current Liabilities
Accrued expenses (current) primarily includes financial and performance guarantee liabilities under pharmacy contracts (see section
I), management compensation and various insurance-related liabilities, including experience-rated refunds, reinsurance contracts and
the risk adjustment and minimum medical loss ratio rebate accruals under The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (the
“ACA”). Other non-current liabilities include obligations for pension (see Note 15), GMIB contract liabilities (see Note 10), lease
liabilities (see Note 18) and self-insured exposures not expected to be settled within one year.
The Company accrues for legal and regulatory matters when a loss contingency is both probable and estimable. The estimated loss is
generally recorded in Selling, general and administrative expenses and represents the Company’s best estimate of the loss
contingency. If the loss estimate is a range, the Company accrues the minimum amount in the range if no amount is better than any
other estimated amount in the range. Legal costs to defend the Company’s litigation and arbitration matters are expensed as incurred
in cases that the Company cannot reasonably estimate the ultimate cost to defend. If the Company can reasonably estimate the cost to
defend, a liability for these costs is accrued when the claim is reported. Litigation and legal or regulatory matters that the Company
has identified with a reasonable possibility of material loss are described in Note 21.
H.Translation of Foreign Currencies
The Company generally conducts its international business through foreign operating entities that maintain assets and liabilities in
local currencies that are their functional currencies. The Company uses exchange rates as of the balance sheet date to translate assets
and liabilities into U.S. dollars. Translation gains or losses on functional currencies, net of applicable taxes, are recorded in
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). The Company uses average monthly exchange rates during the year to translate
revenues and expenses into U.S. dollars.
I.Pharmacy revenues and Costs
Pharmacy revenues. Pharmacy revenues are primarily derived from providing pharmacy benefit management services to clients and
customers. Pharmacy revenues are recognized when control of the promised goods or services is transferred to clients and customers,
in an amount that reflects the consideration the Company expects to receive for those goods or services.
The Company provides or makes available various services supporting benefit management and claims administration and is
generally obligated to provide prescription drugs to clients’ members using multiple distribution methods including retail networks,
home delivery and specialty pharmacies. These goods and services are integrated into a single performance obligation to process
claims, dispense prescription drugs and provide other services over the contract period (generally three years). This performance
obligation is satisfied as the business stands ready to fulfill its obligation.
Revenues for dispensing prescription drugs through retail pharmacies are reported gross and consist of the prescription price
(ingredient cost and dispensing fee) contracted with clients, including the customer copayment, and any associated fees for services
because the Company acts as the principal in these arrangements. When a prescription is presented to a retail network pharmacy, the
Company is solely responsible for customer eligibility, drug utilization review, drug-to-drug interaction review, any required clinical
intervention, plan provision information, payment to the pharmacy and client billing. These revenues are recognized based on the full
prescription price when the pharmacy claim is processed and approved for payment. The Company also provides benefit design and
formulary consultation services to clients and negotiates separate contractual relationships with clients and network pharmacies.
These factors indicate that the Company has control over these transactions until the prescription is processed. Revenues are billed,
due and recognized at contract rates either on a periodic basis or as services are provided (such as based on volume of claims
processed). This recognition pattern aligns with the benefits from services provided.
91
Home delivery and specialty pharmacy revenues are due and recognized as each prescription is shipped, net of reserves for discounts
and contractual allowances estimated based on historical experience. Any differences between estimates and actual collections are
reflected in operations when payments are received. Historically, adjustments to original estimates and returns have not been
material. The Company has elected the practical expedient to account for shipping and handling as a fulfillment activity.
We may also provide certain financial and performance guarantees, including a minimum level of discounts a client may receive,
generic utilization rates and various service levels. Clients may be entitled to receive compensation if we fail to meet the guarantees.
Actual performance is compared to the contractual guarantee for each measure throughout the period and the Company defers
revenue for any estimated payouts within Accrued expenses and other liabilities (current). These estimates are adjusted at the end of
the guarantee period. Historically, adjustments to original estimates have not been material. The performance guarantee liability was
$1.1 billion as of December 31, 2020 and $1.0 billion as of December 31, 2019.
The Company administers programs through which we may receive rebates and other vendor consideration from pharmaceutical
manufacturers. The amounts of such rebates or other vendor consideration shared with pharmacy benefit management services
clients vary based on the contractual arrangement with the client and in some cases the type of consideration received from the
pharmaceutical manufacturer. Rebates and other vendor consideration payable to pharmacy benefit management services clients are
recorded as a reduction of Pharmacy revenues. Estimated amounts payable to clients are based on contractual sharing arrangements
between the Company and the client and these amounts are adjusted when amounts are collected from pharmaceutical manufacturers
in accordance with the contractual arrangement between the Company and the client. Historically, these adjustments have not been
material.
In certain retail, home delivery and specialty transactions certain amounts may be collected from third-party payors. These are billed
and collected subject to normal account receivable collections procedures.
Other pharmacy service revenues are earned by distributing specialty pharmaceuticals and medical supplies to providers, clinics and
hospitals and services to specialty pharmacy manufacturers. These revenues are recognized as prescriptions and supplies are shipped
and services are provided.
Pharmacy costs. Pharmacy costs include the cost of prescriptions sold, network pharmacy claim costs and copayments. Also
included are direct costs of dispensing prescriptions including supplies, shipping and handling and direct costs associated with
clinical programs, such as drug utilization management and medication adherence counseling. Home delivery and specialty
pharmacy costs are recognized when the drug is shipped and retail network costs are recognized when the drug is processed and
approved for payment. Rebates and other vendor consideration received when providing pharmacy benefit management services are
recorded as a reduction of pharmacy costs. Rebates are recognized as prescriptions are shipped or processed and approved for
payment. Historically, the effect of adjustments resulting from the reconciliation of rebates recognized to the amounts billed and
collected has not been material. The Company maintains reimbursement guarantees with certain retail network pharmacies. For each
such guarantee, the Company records a pharmacy and other service costs payable or prepaid asset for applicable retail network
claims based on our actual performance throughout the period against the contractual reimbursement rate. The Company’s contracts
with certain retail pharmacies give the Company the right to adjust reimbursement rates during the annual guarantee period.
Other. Incremental costs of obtaining service and pharmacy contracts for short-term arrangements are expensed as incurred.
J.Premiums and Related Expenses
Premiums for group life, accident and health insurance and managed care coverages are recognized as revenue on a pro rata basis
over the contract period. Benefits and expenses are recognized when incurred and, for our U.S. Medical insured business, are
presented net of pharmaceutical manufacturer rebates. For experience-rated contracts, premium revenue includes an adjustment for
experience-rated refunds based on contract terms and calculated using the customer’s experience (including estimates of incurred but
not reported claims).
Premium revenue also includes an adjustment to reflect the estimated effect of rebates due to customers under the commercial
minimum medical loss ratio provisions of the ACA. These rebates are settled in the subsequent calendar year.
Premiums received for the Company’s Medicare Advantage plans and Medicare Part D products from the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services (“CMS”) and customers are recognized as revenue ratably over the contract period. CMS provides risk-adjusted
premium payments for Medicare Advantage Plans and Medicare Part D products based on our customer demographics and wellness.
The Company recognizes periodic changes to risk-adjusted premiums as revenue when the amounts are determinable and collection
is reasonably assured. Additionally, Medicare Part D premiums include payments from CMS for risk-sharing adjustments. These
92
adjustments are estimated quarterly based on claim experience by comparing actual incurred drug benefit costs to estimated costs
submitted in original contracts. These adjustments may result in more or less revenue from CMS. Final revenue adjustments are
determined and settled with CMS in the year following the contract year. Premium revenue may also include an adjustment to reflect
the estimated effect of rebates due to CMS under the Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D minimum medical loss ratio
provisions of the ACA.
The ACA prescribed three programs to mitigate the risk for participating health insurance companies selling coverage on the public
exchanges: risk adjustment, reinsurance and risk corridor. The reinsurance and ACA risk corridor programs expired at the end of
2016, while the permanent risk-adjustment program continues.
The risk-adjustment program reallocates funds from insurers with lower risk populations to insurers with higher risk populations
based on the relative risk scores of participants in non-grandfathered plans in the individual and small group markets, both on and off
the exchanges. We estimate our receivable or payable based on the risk of our customers compared to the risk of other customers in
the same state and market, considering data obtained from industry studies and the United States Department of Health and Human
Services (“HHS”). Receivables or payables are recorded as adjustments to premium revenue based on our year-to-date experience
when the amounts are reasonably estimable and collection is reasonably assured. Final revenue adjustments are determined by HHS
in the year following the policy year.
Premiums for individual life, accident and supplemental health insurance and annuity products, excluding universal life and
investment-related products, are recognized as revenue when due. Benefits and expenses are matched with premiums.
Revenue for universal life products is recognized as follows:
•Investment income on assets supporting universal life products is recognized in Net investment income as earned.
•Charges for mortality, administration and policy surrender are recognized in premiums as earned. Administrative fees are
considered earned when services are provided.
Benefits and expenses for universal life products consist of benefit claims in excess of policyholder account balances and income
earned by policyholders. Expenses are recognized when claims are incurred, and income is credited to policyholders in accordance
with contract provisions.
The unrecognized portion of premiums received is recorded as unearned premiums included in insurance and contractholder
liabilities (see Note 9 for further information).
K.Fees and Related Expenses
The majority of the Company’s service fees are derived from administrative services only (“ASO”) arrangements, fee-for-service
clinical solutions and health benefit management services.
ASO arrangements allow plan sponsors to self-fund claims and assume the risk of medical or other benefit costs. Most of the
Company’s ASO arrangements are for medical and specialty services, including pharmacy benefits. Generally, the Company’s ASO
arrangements are short-term. Contract modifications typically occur on renewal and are prospective in nature.
In return for fees from these clients, the Company provides access to our participating provider networks and other services
supporting benefit management, including claims administration, behavioral health services, disease management, utilization
management and cost containment programs. In general, the Company considers these services to be a combined performance
obligation to provide cost effective administration of plan benefits over the contract period. Fees are billed, due and recognized
monthly at contracted rates based on current membership or utilization. This recognition pattern aligns with the benefits from
services provided to clients. These revenues are reported in Fees and other revenues in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
The Company may also provide performance guarantees that provide potential refunds to clients if certain service standards, clinical
outcomes or financial metrics are not met. If these standards, outcomes and metrics are not met, the Company may be financially at
risk up to a stated percentage of the contracted fee or a stated dollar amount. The Company defers revenue by recording a liability for
estimated payouts associated with these guarantees within Accrued expenses and other liabilities. The amount of revenue deferred is
estimated for each type of guarantee using either a most likely amount or expected value method depending on the nature of the
guarantee and the information available to estimate refunds. Estimates are refined each reporting period as additional information on
the Company’s performance becomes available and upon final reconciliation and settlement at the end of the guarantee period.
Amounts accrued and paid for these performance guarantees during the reporting periods were not material.
93
Rebates from pharmaceutical manufacturers for ASO client purchases at retail pharmacies, net of amounts payable to ASO clients,
were considered compensation for use of the manufacturer’s products and recorded in Fees and other revenues prior to transitioning
U.S. Commercial customers to Express Scripts’ retail pharmacy network in the third quarter of 2019. After this transition, these
rebates are reflected as a reduction to pharmacy costs (See “Pharmacy Costs” above).
Expenses associated with administrative programs and services are recognized as incurred in Selling, general and administrative
expenses.
The Company also earns revenue, as part of its integrated pharmacy benefits performance obligation, by offering fee-for-service
clinical solutions to our clients, such as drug utilization management and medication adherence counseling. These clinical programs
help clients to drive better health outcomes at a lower cost by identifying and addressing potentially unsafe or wasteful prescribing,
dispensing and utilization of prescription drugs and communicating with, or supporting communications with physicians, pharmacies
and patients. Fees are billed, due and recognized at contracted rates either on a periodic basis or as services are provided. This
recognition pattern aligns with the benefits from services provided. These revenues are reported in Fees and other revenues in the
Consolidated Statements of Income. Direct costs associated with these programs are recognized in Pharmacy and other service costs,
and other related expenses are recorded as incurred in Selling, general and administrative expenses.
The Company also earns fees by providing health benefit management solutions that drive cost reductions and improve quality
outcomes. Clients are primarily sponsors of health benefit plans and fees may be stated as a per-member-per-month fee or as a per-
claim fee. The Company considers the services to be a single performance obligation to stand ready to provide utilization
management services over the contract period (generally three years). In certain arrangements, the Company assumes the financial
obligation for third-party provider costs for medical services provided to the health plan’s customers. Fees are recorded gross in Fees
and other revenues in the Consolidated Statements of Income because the Company is acting as a principal in arranging for and
controlling the services provided by third-party network providers. Contractual fees vary based on enrollment and provider costs and
are billed, due and recognized monthly. Direct costs associated with these programs are recognized in Pharmacy and other service
costs, and other related expenses are recorded in Selling, general and administrative expenses as incurred.
Certain health benefit management contracts require the Company to share the results of medical cost experience that differ from
specified targets. This variable consideration is estimated at contract inception and adjusted through the contract period. The
estimated profits and costs are recognized net in Fees and other revenues.
Note 4 – Accounts Receivable, Net
Accounting policy. The Company's accounts receivable balances primarily include amounts due from clients, third-party payors,
customers and pharmaceutical manufacturers, and are presented net of allowances. The Company's adoption of ASU 2016-13,
Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments (ASU 2016-13), as of January 1, 2020 did not have a material impact on our
accounts receivable credit loss allowance, as there were no substantive changes to our methodology for this class of assets. The
allowance for expected credit losses for current accounts receivable is based primarily on past collections experience relative to the
length of time receivables are past due; however, when available evidence reasonably supports an assumption that counterparty
credit risk over the expected payment period will differ from current and historical payment collections, a forecasting adjustment is
reflected in the allowance for expected credit losses.
All other (non-credit) allowances are based on the current status of each customer's receivable balance as well as current economic
and market conditions and a variety of other factors, including the length of time the receivables are past due, the financial health of
customers and our past experience. We bill pharmaceutical manufacturers based on management's interpretation of contractual terms
and estimate a contractual allowance based on the best information available at the time a claim is processed. Contractual allowances
for certain rebates receivable from pharmaceutical manufacturers are determined by reviewing payment experience and specific
known items that could be adjusted under contract terms. The Company's estimation process for contractual allowances for
pharmaceutical manufacturer receivables generally results in an allowance for balances outstanding greater than 90 days. Contractual
allowances for certain receivables from third-party payors are based on their contractual terms and are estimates based on the
Company's best information available at the time revenue is recognized.
Receivables and any associated allowance are written off only when all collection attempts have failed and such amounts are
determined unrecoverable. We regularly review the adequacy of these allowances based on a variety of factors, including age of the
outstanding receivable and collection history. When circumstances related to specific collection patterns change, estimates of the
recoverability of receivables are adjusted.
94
The following amounts were included within Accounts receivable, net:
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Noninsurance customer receivables $ 5,534 $ 5,143 
Pharmaceutical manufacturers receivable 4,676 3,439 
Insurance customer receivables 1,789 2,321 
Other receivables 192 334 
Total 11,237 
Accounts receivable, net classified as assets of business held for sale (521)
Accounts receivable, net per Consolidated Balance Sheets $ 12,191 $ 10,716 
These receivables are reported net of our allowances of $1.2 billion as of December 31, 2020 and $778 million as of December 31,
2019. The allowances as of December 31, 2020 include contractual allowances for certain rebates receivable with pharmaceutical
manufacturers of $757 million and contractual allowances from third-party payors of $208 million based upon the contractual
payment terms. The remaining allowances of $224 million include allowances, discounts and claims adjustments issued to customers
in the form of client credits, an allowance for current expected credit losses and other non-credit adjustments.
The Company's allowance for current expected credit losses was $65 million as of December 31, 2020 and $39 million as of January
1, 2020 (no change to allowance for credit losses from December 31, 2019).
Note 5 – Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures
A.Divestiture of Group Disability and Life business
On December 31, 2020, Cigna completed the sale of its U.S. Group Disability and Life business to New York Life Insurance
Company for cash proceeds of $6.2 billion. The Company recognized a gain of $4.2 billion pre-tax ($3.2 billion after-tax), which
includes recognition of previously unrealized capital gains on investments sold (see Note 14 for further information).
In December 2019, Cigna entered into a definitive agreement to sell this business and since the sale was expected to close in the
fourth quarter of 2020 following applicable regulatory approvals and other customary closing conditions, the Company aggregated
and classified the assets and liabilities directly associated with the pending sale of its Group Disability and Life business as held for
sale and has reported them separately on our Consolidated Balance Sheet as of December 31, 2019.
The assets and liabilities of business held for sale were as follows:
(In millions)December 31,
2019
Cash and cash equivalents $ 743 
Accounts receivable, net 521 
Investments 7,709 
Other assets 539 
Total assets of business held for sale 9,512 
Insurance and contractholder liabilities 6,308 
Other liabilities 504 
Total liabilities of business held for sale $ 6,812 
B.Acquisition of Express Scripts
On December 20, 2018, Cigna acquired Express Scripts Holding Company (“Express Scripts") through a series of mergers for a
purchase price of $52.8 billion, which consisted of cash and stock consideration. The purchase price was allocated to the tangible and
intangible net assets acquired based on management’s final estimates of their fair values. Total goodwill of $38.4 billion was
recorded, of which $33.7 billion resides in the Company’s Evernorth segment, with the remainder in the Company’s U.S. Medical
segment. The results of Express Scripts have been included in the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements from the date of the
acquisition. Revenues of Express Scripts included in the Company’s results for 2018 approximated $2.6 billion and Express Scripts’
results of operations were immaterial to Cigna’s net income.
C.Integration and Transaction-related Costs
The Company has incurred costs detailed in the table below related to the acquisition and integration of Express Scripts, the
terminated merger with Anthem, Inc. (“Anthem”), the sale of the U.S. Group Disability and Life business and other transactions.
95
These costs consisted primarily of certain projects to integrate the Company’s systems, products and services, fees for legal, advisory
and other professional services and certain employment-related costs. Costs in 2018 also included charitable contributions and
amortization of certain financing fees and interest expense on the debt issued in the third quarter of 2018 to fund the Express Scripts
merger, net of investment income earned on proceeds of the debt issuance.
 2020 2019 2018
(In millions) Before-tax After-tax Before-tax After-tax Before-tax After-tax
Interest expense on newly-issued debt $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 227 $ 179 
Net investment income on debt proceeds — — — — (123) (97)
Charitable contributions — — — — 200 158 
Legal and advisory fees 48 36 53 41 204 185 
Bridge facility fees — — — — 140 111 
All other integration and transaction-related costs 479 368 499 386 204 133 
Integration and transaction-related costs, net $ 527 $ 404 $ 552 $ 427 $ 852 $ 669 
Note 6 – Earnings Per Share (“EPS”)
Accounting policy. The Company computes basic earnings per share using the weighted-average number of unrestricted common
and deferred shares outstanding. Diluted earnings per share also includes the dilutive effect of outstanding employee stock options
and restricted stock using the treasury stock method and the effect of strategic performance shares.
Basic and diluted earnings per share were computed as follows:
2020 2019 2018
(Shares in thousands, dollars
in millions, except per share
amounts) BasicEffect of
Dilution Diluted BasicEffect of
Dilution Diluted BasicEffect of
Dilution Diluted
Shareholders’ net income $ 8,458 $ 8,458 $ 5,104 $ 5,104 $ 2,637 $ 2,637 
Shares:
Weighted average 364,979 364,979 375,919 375,919 246,652 246,652 
Common stock equivalents 3,410 3,410 3,898 3,898 3,573 3,573 
Total shares 364,979 3,410 368,389 375,919 3,898 379,817 246,652 3,573 250,225 
EPS $ 23.17 $ (0.21)$ 22.96 $ 13.58 $ (0.14)$ 13.44 $ 10.69 $ (0.15)$ 10.54 
The following outstanding employee stock options were not included in the computation of diluted earnings per share because their
effect was anti-dilutive.
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Anti-dilutive options 4.1 3.5 0.9 
96
Note 7 – Debt
The outstanding amounts of debt and finance leases were as follows:
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Short-term debt
$1,000 million, Floating Rate Notes due 3/2020 $ — $ 999 
$300 million, 5.125% Notes due 6/2020 — 300 
$1,750 million, 3.2% Notes due 9/2020 — 1,748 
$349 million, 4.125% Notes due 9/2020 — 351 
$500 million, 2.6% Notes due 11/2020 — 496 
$400 million, Floating Rate Notes due 11/2020 — 400 
$250 million, 4.375% Notes due 12/2020 — 249 
$78 million, 6.37% Notes due 6/2021 78 — 
$1,000 million, Floating Rate Notes due 9/2021 999 — 
$1,250 million, 3.4% Notes due 9/2021 1,249 — 
Commercial paper 1,030 944 
Other, including finance leases 18 27 
Total short-term debt $ 3,374 $ 5,514 
Long-term debt
$500 million, 3.3% Notes due 2021 $ — $ 499 
$300 million, 4.5% Notes due 2021 — 298 
$78 million, 6.37% Notes due 2021 — 78 
$1,000 million, Floating Rate Notes due 2021 — 998 
$1,250 million, 3.4% Notes due 2021 — 1,247 
$1,248 million, 4.75% Notes due 2021 — 1,272 
$277 million, 4% Notes due 2022 276 747 
$973 million, 3.9% Notes due 2022 972 999 
$500 million, 3.05% Notes due 2022 490 485 
$17 million, 8.3% Notes due 2023 17 17 
$63 million, 7.65% Notes due 2023 63 100 
$700 million, Floating Rate Notes due 2023 698 698 
$1,000 million, 3% Notes due 2023 975 966 
$2,187 million, 3.75% Notes due 2023 2,181 3,088 
$1,000 million, 3.5% Notes due 2024 977 970 
$900 million, 3.25% Notes due 2025 896 895 
$2,200 million, 4.125% Notes due 2025 2,191 2,188 
$1,500 million, 4.5% Notes due 2026 1,505 1,506 
$1,500 million, 3.4% Notes due 2027 1,410 1,396 
$259 million, 7.875% Debentures due 2027 259 259 
$600 million, 3.05% Notes due 2027 595 595 
$3,800 million, 4.375% Notes due 2028 3,780 3,776 
$1,500 million, 2.4% Notes due 2030 1,489 — 
$45 million, 8.3% Step Down Notes due 2033 45 45 
$190 million, 6.15% Notes due 2036 190 190 
$2,200 million, 4.8% Notes due 2038 2,180 2,178 
$750 million, 3.2% Notes due 2040 742 — 
$121 million, 5.875% Notes due 2041 119 119 
$448 million, 6.125% Notes due 2041 490 491 
$317 million, 5.375% Notes due 2042 315 315 
$1,500 million, 4.8% Notes due 2046 1,465 1,465 
$1,000 million, 3.875% Notes due 2047 988 988 
$3,000 million, 4.9% Notes due 2048 2,966 2,964 
$1,250 million, 3.4% Notes due 2050 1,235 — 
Other, including finance leases 36 61 
Total long-term debt $ 29,545 $ 31,893 
97
Debt Issuance and Redemption. In order to decrease future interest expense and reduce future refinancing risk, the Company
entered into the following transactions during 2020:
•Debt issuance: On March 16, 2020, the Company issued $3.5 billion of new senior notes. The proceeds of this issuance
were mainly used to pay the consideration for the cash tender and redemption offer as described below. Interest on this debt
is paid semi-annually.
Principal Maturity Date Interest Rate Net Proceeds
$1,500 million March 15, 2030 2.4% $1,491 million
$750 million March 15, 2040 3.2% $743 million
$1,250 million March 15, 2050 3.4% $1,237 million
•Debt tender and redemption: In March and April 2020, the Company completed a tender offer and an optional redemption
totaling $3.5 billion of aggregate principal amount of certain of its outstanding debt securities. The principal amount
repurchased in this tender offer was $1.5 billion. Additionally, $2.0 billion of notes were repurchased via optional
redemption. The Company recorded a pre-tax loss of $199 million ($151 million after-tax), consisting primarily of premium
payments on the tender and optional redemption.
Debt Exchange . In the fourth quarter of 2019, the Company settled an exchange of approximately $12.7 billion of Notes issued by
Express Scripts Holding Company, Medco Health Solutions, Inc. and Cigna Holding Company (formerly named Cigna Corporation)
for privately placed Notes issued by Cigna with the same interest rates and maturities and comparable other terms. We initiated an
exchange offer to register such debt in the second quarter of 2020 and completed the exchange in July 2020 .
Debt Repayment. In 2020, the Company repaid $8.0 billion of long-term debt, including the $3.5 billion debt tender and redemption
described above. On December 31, 2020 Cigna issued a notice of full redemption to the holders of Cigna’s Senior Floating Rate
Notes due 2021 (the “Notes”) pursuant to which Cigna redeemed the entire $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount of the Notes
outstanding on January 15, 2021 at a redemption price calculated in accordance with the terms and conditions of the indenture
governing the Notes.
Revolving Credit Agreements. Cigna has a revolving credit and letter of credit agreement that matures in April 2023 and is
diversified among 23 banks. Cigna can borrow up to $3.25 billion for general corporate purposes, with up to $500 million available
for issuance of letters of credit. This revolving credit agreement also includes an option to increase the facility amount up to $500
million and an option to extend the termination date for additional one-year periods, subject to consent of the banks.
Additionally, Cigna has a 364-day $1.0 billion revolving credit agreement that will mature in October 2021. The agreement replaces
the $1.0 billion 364-day revolving credit agreement that expired in October 2020. The agreement is diversified among 23 banks.
Pursuant to this revolving credit agreement, Cigna can borrow up to $1.0 billion for general corporate purposes. The agreement
includes the option to “term out” any revolving loans that are outstanding at maturity by converting them into a term loan maturing
on the one year anniversary of conversion.
The revolving credit agreements contain customary covenants and restrictions including a financial covenant that the Company’s
leverage ratio may not exceed 60%. As of December 31, 2020, there were no outstanding balances under the revolving credit
agreements.
Term Loan Credit Agreement. On April 1, 2020, the Company borrowed an aggregate principal amount of $1.4 billion under a new
364-Day Term Loan Credit Agreement. In connection with the sale of the Group Life and Disability business, on December 31, 2020
we repaid the entire $1.4 billion balance outstanding.
Commercial Paper. Under our commercial paper program we may issue short-term, unsecured commercial paper notes privately
placed on a discount basis through certain broker dealers at any time not to exceed $4.25 billion. Amounts available under the
program may be borrowed, repaid and re-borrowed from time to time. The net proceeds of issuances have been and are expected to
be used for general corporate purposes. The commercial paper program had approximately $1.0 billion outstanding at December 31,
2020 at an average interest rate of 0.2%.
The Company was in compliance with its debt covenants as of December 31, 2020.
98
Maturities of outstanding long-term debt are as follows:
(in millions)Scheduled
Maturities 
2021 $ 2,328 
2022 $ 1,749 
2023 $ 3,967 
2024 $ 1,000 
2025 $ 3,100 
Maturities after 2025 $ 19,981 
(1)Long-term debt maturity amounts include current maturities of long-term debt.    
Interest expense on long-term and short-term debt was $1.4 billion in 2020, $1.6 billion in 2019 and $507 million in 2018.
Note 8 – Common and Preferred Stock
On December 20, 2018 Cigna acquired Express Scripts through a series of mergers (collectively, the "Merger"). Cigna Holding
Company (formerly named Cigna Corporation and referred to as "Old Cigna") and Express Scripts each merged with and into a
wholly-owned subsidiary of Cigna. As a result of these transactions, Cigna became the parent of the combined company. Old Cigna
shareholders exchanged each of their shares for a share of Cigna common stock and shareholders of Express Scripts received 0.2434
of a share of Cigna (and $48.75 in cash) for each share of Express Scripts. Following the Merger, Old Cigna was de-listed and shares
of Cigna were listed on the New York Stock Exchange for trading.
Cigna (and, prior to the Merger, Old Cigna) has a total of 25 million shares of $1 par value preferred stock authorized for issuance.
No shares of preferred stock were outstanding at December 31, 2020, 2019 or 2018.
The following table presents the share activity of Cigna and Old Cigna for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
(Shares in thousands) 2020 2019 2018
Common: Par value $0.01; 600,000 shares authorized - Cigna
Outstanding- January 1, 372,531 380,924 — 
Shares issued to Old Cigna shareholders 243,785 
Shares issued to Express Scripts shareholders 137,337 
Issued for stock option exercises and other benefit plans 4,142 3,413 91 
Repurchased common stock (21,902) (11,806) (289)
Outstanding- December 31, 354,771 372,531 380,924 
Treasury stock 35,505 13,012 570 
Issued- December 31, 390,276 385,543 381,494 
Common: Par value $0.25; 600,000 shares authorized - Old Cigna
Outstanding- January 1, 243,967 
Issued for stock option exercises and other benefit plans 1,118 
Repurchased common stock (1,300)
Balance, December 20, 2018 (Merger Date) 243,785 
Exchange of Old Cigna shares for shares of Cigna (243,785)
Outstanding- December 31, — 
Retirement of treasury stock on December 20, 2018 (52,358)
Exchange of Old Cigna certificated treasury stock for new Cigna certificated treasury stock (2)
Treasury stock- December 31, — 
Issued- December 31, — (1)
99
Note 9 – Insurance and Contractholder Liabilities
A.Account Balances – Insurance and Contractholder Liabilities
As of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, the Company’s insurance and contractholder liabilities were comprised of the
following:
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(In millions) Current Non-current Total Current Non-current Total
Contractholder deposit funds $ 350 $ 6,823 $ 7,173 $ 600 $ 7,139 $ 7,739 
Future policy benefits 327 9,317 9,644 553 9,281 9,834 
Unearned premiums 485 394 879 453 360 813 
Unpaid claims and claim expenses
U.S. Medical 3,166 18 3,184 2,875 17 2,892 
Other segments 980 292 1,272 2,529 3,474 6,003 
Total 7,010 20,271 27,281 
Insurance and contractholder liabilities classified as
liabilities of business held for sale (2,089) (4,219) (6,308)
Total insurance and contractholder liabilities $ 5,308 $ 16,844 $ 22,152 $ 4,921 $ 16,052 $ 20,973 
(1)Amounts classified as Liabilities of business held for sale primarily include $4.9 billion of unpaid claims, $717 million of contractholder deposit funds and $653
million of future policy benefits as of December 31, 2019.
Insurance and contractholder liabilities expected to be paid within one year are classified as current.
Accounting Policy - Contractholder Deposit Funds. Liabilities for contractholder deposit funds primarily include deposits received
from customers for investment-related and universal life products and investment earnings on their fund balances. These liabilities
are adjusted to reflect administrative charges and, for universal life fund balances, mortality charges. In addition, this caption
includes: 1) premium stabilization reserves under group health insurance contracts representing experience refunds left with the
Company to pay future premiums; 2) deposit administration funds used to fund non-pension retiree insurance programs; 3) retained
asset accounts and 4) annuities or supplementary contracts without significant life contingencies. Interest credited on these funds is
accrued ratably over the contract period.
Accounting Policy - Future Policy Benefits. Future policy benefits represent the present value of estimated future obligations under
long-term life and supplemental health insurance policies and annuity products currently in force. These obligations are estimated
using actuarial methods and consist primarily of reserves for annuity contracts, life insurance benefits, GMDB contracts (GMDB
contracts are fully reinsured, see Note 10 for additional information) and certain health, life and accident insurance products of our
International Markets segment.
Obligations for annuities represent specified periodic benefits to be paid to an individual or groups of individuals over their
remaining lives. Obligations for life insurance policies and GMDB contracts represent benefits expected to be paid to policyholders,
net of future premiums expected to be received. Management estimates these obligations based on assumptions as to premiums,
interest rates, mortality or morbidity, future claim adjudication expenses and surrenders, allowing for adverse deviation as
appropriate. Mortality, morbidity and surrender assumptions are based on the Company’s own experience and published actuarial
tables. Interest rate assumptions are based on management’s judgment considering the Company’s experience and future
expectations, and range from 1% to 9%. Obligations for the direct and assumed run-off settlement annuity business include
adjustments for realized and unrealized investment returns consistent with GAAP when a premium deficiency exists. As of
December 31, 2020, approximately 20% of the liability for future policy benefits was supported by assets held in trust for the benefit
of the ceding company under reinsurance agreements.
Accounting Policy - Unearned Premium. The unrecognized portion of premiums received is recorded as unearned premiums
included in insurance and contractholder liabilities.
B.Unpaid Claims and Claim Expenses – U.S. Medical
This liability reflects estimates of the ultimate cost of claims that have been incurred but not reported, including expected
development on reported claims, those that have been reported but not yet paid (reported claims in process) and other medical care
expenses and services payable that are primarily comprised of accruals for incentives and other amounts payable to health care
professionals and facilities. (1)
100
Accounting policy. The Company uses actuarial principles and assumptions that are consistently applied each reporting period and
recognizes the actuarial best estimate of the ultimate liability along with a margin for adverse deviation. This approach is consistent
with actuarial standards of practice that the liabilities be adequate under moderately adverse conditions.
The Company compares key assumptions used to establish the medical costs payable to actual experience for each reporting period.
The unpaid claims liability is adjusted through current period shareholders’ net income when actual experience differs from these
assumptions. Additionally, the Company evaluates expected future developments and emerging trends that may impact key
assumptions. The process used to determine this liability requires the Company to make critical accounting estimates that involve
considerable judgment, reflecting the variability inherent in forecasting future claim payments. These estimates are highly sensitive
to changes in the Company’s key assumptions, specifically completion factors and medical cost trend.
The liability is primarily calculated using “completion factors” developed by comparing the claim incurral date to the date claims
were paid. Completion factors are impacted by several key items including changes in: 1) electronic (auto-adjudication) versus
manual claim processing; 2) frequency and timeliness of provider claims submissions; 3) membership and 4) the mix of products.
The Company uses historical completion factors combined with an analysis of current trends and operational factors to develop
current estimates of completion factors. The Company estimates the liability for claims incurred in each month by applying the
current estimates of completion factors to the current paid claims data. This approach implicitly assumes that historical completion
rates will be a useful indicator for the current period.
The Company relies more heavily on medical cost trend analysis that reflects expected claim payment patterns and other relevant
operational considerations for more recent months. Medical cost trend is primarily impacted by medical service utilization and unit
costs that are affected by changes in the level and mix of health benefits offered, including inpatient, outpatient and pharmacy, the
impact of copays and deductibles, changes in provider practices and changes in consumer demographics and consumption behavior.
The total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims, including reported claims in process,
was $2.9 billion at December 31, 2020 and $2.7 billion at December 31, 2019.
Activity, net of intercompany transactions, in the unpaid claims liability for the U.S. Medical segment for the years ended December
31 was as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Beginning balance $ 2,892 $ 2,697 $ 2,420 
Less: Reinsurance and other amounts recoverable 303 264 262 
Beginning balance, net 2,589 2,433 2,158 
Acquired, net — — 40 
Incurred costs related to:
Current year 25,889 24,368 21,331 
Prior years (115) (165) (173)
Total incurred 25,774 24,203 21,158 
Paid costs related to:
Current year 23,005 21,851 18,978 
Prior years 2,398 2,196 1,945 
Total paid 25,403 24,047 20,923 
Ending balance, net 2,960 2,589 2,433 
Add: Reinsurance and other amounts recoverable 224 303 264 
Ending balance $ 3,184 $ 2,892 $ 2,697 
Reinsurance and other amounts recoverable reflect amounts due from reinsurers and policyholders to cover incurred but not reported
and pending claims of certain business for which the Company administers the plan benefits without any right of offset. See Note 10
for additional information on reinsurance.
101
Variances in incurred costs related to prior years’ unpaid claims and claim expenses that resulted from the differences between actual
experience and the Company’s key assumptions for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
Year Ended
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
$ % $ %
Actual completion factors $ 42 0.2 %$ 90 0.4 %
Medical cost trend 73 0.3 75 0.4 
Total favorable variance $ 115 0.5 %$ 165 0.8 %
(1)Percentage of current year incurred costs as reported for the year ended December 31, 2019.
(2)Percentage of current year incurred costs as reported for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Favorable prior year development in both years reflects lower than expected utilization of medical services.
The following table depicts the incurred and paid claims development as of December 31, 2020 (net of reinsurance), claims
frequency metrics and incurred but not reported liabilities reported in the U.S. Medical segment. The information about incurred and
paid claims development for the year ended December 31, 2019 is presented as supplementary information and is unaudited.
 Incurred Costs   
Incurral Year2019
(Unaudited) 2020Unpaid Claims &
Claim Expenses Claims Frequency
(In millions)    
2019 $ 23,306 $ 23,211 60 3.5  million
2020 24,927 2,764 3.7  million
Cumulative incurred costs for the periods presented $ 48,138   
 Cumulative Costs Paid   
Incurral Year2019
(Unaudited) 2020   
2019 $ 20,920 $ 23,151   
2020 22,163   
Cumulative paid costs for the periods presented $ 45,314   
Outstanding liabilities for the periods presented, net of reinsurance $ 2,824   
Other long-duration liabilities not included in development table above 136   
Net unpaid claims and claims expenses - U.S. Medical 2,960   
Reinsurance and other amounts recoverable 224   
Unpaid claims and claim expenses - U.S. Medical $ 3,184   
More than 95% of health claims incurred in a calendar year are paid within one year of their incurred date.
There is no single or common claim frequency metric used in the health care industry. The Company believes a relevant metric for
its health insurance business is the number of customers for whom an insured medical claim was paid. Customers for whom no
insured medical claim was paid are excluded from the calculation. Claims that did not result in a liability are not included in the
frequency metric.
C.Unpaid Claims and Claim Expenses – Group Disability and Other and International Markets
Accounting policy. Liabilities for unpaid claims and claim expenses are established by book of business within Group Disability and
Other and International Markets. Unpaid claims and claim expenses within the Group Disability and Other and International Markets
segments consist of (1) case or claims reserves for reported claims that are unpaid as of the balance sheet date; (2) incurred but not
reported reserves for claims when the insured event has occurred but has not been reported to the Company and (3) loss adjustment
expense reserves for the expected costs of settling these claims. The Company consistently estimates incurred but not yet reported
losses using actuarial principles and assumptions based on historical and projected claim incidence patterns, claim size and the
expected payment period. The Company recognizes the actuarial best estimate of the ultimate liability within a level of confidence,
consistent with actuarial standards of practice that the liabilities be adequate under moderately adverse conditions. The Company
immediately records an adjustment in Medical costs and other benefit expenses when estimates of these liabilities change.(1) (2)
102
See Note 5 for a discussion of the divestiture of the Group Disability and Life business on December 31, 2020. For the year ended
December 31, 2019, liabilities for unpaid claims and claim expenses within the Group Disability and Life business reflect the
following primary products: long-term and short-term disability, life insurance and accident coverages and the majority of the
Company’s liability for disability claims consisted of “disabled life reserves”, measured as the present value of estimated future
benefit payments, including expected development, for each reported claim that is currently receiving benefit payments over the
expected disability period or pending a decision on eligibility for benefits. The Company projected the expected disability period by
using historical resolution rates combined with an analysis of current trends and operational factors to develop current estimates of
resolution rates. Expected claim resolution rates may vary based upon the Company’s experience for the anticipated disability period,
the covered benefit period, the cause of disability, the benefit design and the claimant’s age, gender and income level. The gross
monthly benefit is reduced (offset) by disability income received under other benefit programs, most commonly Social Security
Disability Income, workers’ compensation, statutory disability or other group benefit plans. The Company estimated the probability
and amount of future offset awards and lapses based on the Company’s experience for certain offsets not yet finalized.
The Company also establishes a liability for the expected present value of future benefit payments for known claims that have
recently been resolved but may reopen in the future, based on Company experience. Prior to a claim becoming known, the Company
establishes a liability for incurred but not reported claims using standard actuarial techniques and calculations based on completion
factors and loss ratio assumptions using the Company’s experience combined with an analysis of current trends and operational
factors. Completion factors are impacted by several key items including changes in claim inventory levels, claim payment patterns,
changes in business volume and other factors. Loss ratio assumptions are developed using historical Company experience, adjusted
prospectively for expected changes in the underlying business including rate actions, persistency and inforce growth.
Liability balance details. The liability details for unpaid claims and claim expenses for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 
Group Disability and Other
Group Disability and Life $ 150 $ 4,972 
Other Operations 159 187 
Total Group Disability and Other 309 5,159 
International Markets 963 844 
Unpaid claims and claim expenses Group Disability and Other and International Markets $ 1,272 $ 6,003 
(1)Includes unpaid claim amounts classified as Liabilities of business held for sale, see Note 5.
Group Disability and Life balances as of December 31, 2020 include reserves associated with retained business and amounts
reinsured to New York Life as part of the sale of the Group Disability and Life business.
The Company discounts certain liabilities, predominantly long-term disability liabilities, because benefits payments are made over
extended periods. Discount rate assumptions for these liabilities are based on projected investment returns for the supporting asset
portfolios.
Details of the Company’s Group Disability and Life unpaid claim discounted liability balance as of December 31, 2019 were as
follows:
(In billions) 2019 
Discounted liabilities $ 4.5 
Aggregate amount of discount $ 1.2 
Range of discount rates 4.0 % — 5.2 %
(1)Includes unpaid claims amounts classified as Liabilities held for sale.( 1 )
(1)
103
Activity in the Company’s liabilities for unpaid claims and claim expenses, excluding Other Operations, are presented in the
following table. Liabilities associated with Other Operations are excluded because they pertain to obligations for long-duration
insurance contracts or, if short-duration, the liabilities have been fully reinsured.
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Beginning balance $ 5,816 $ 5,432 $ 5,274 
Less: Reinsurance 184 156 140 
Beginning balance, net 5,632 5,276 5,134 
Incurred claims related to:
Current year 5,810 5,616 5,350 
Prior years:
Interest accretion 154 152 156 
All other incurred 19 (40) (147)
Total incurred 5,983 5,728 5,359 
Paid claims related to:
Current year 3,595 3,488 3,391 
Prior years 2,015 1,873 1,808 
Total paid 5,610 5,361 5,199 
Acquisitions — — 23 
Foreign currency 42 (11) (41)
Divestiture of Group Disability and Life business (5,093) — — 
Ending balance, net 954 5,632 5,276 
Add: Reinsurance 159 184 156 
Ending balance $ 1,113 $ 5,816 $ 5,432 
(1)Includes unpaid claims amounts classified as Liabilities of business held for sale.
Reinsurance in the table above reflects amounts due from reinsurers related to unpaid claims liabilities. The Company’s insurance
subsidiaries enter into agreements with other companies primarily to limit losses from large exposures and to permit recovery of a
portion of incurred losses. See Note 10 for additional information on reinsurance.
Following the sale of the Company's Group Disability and Life business (see Note 5 for further information), the majority of the
liability for unpaid claims and claim expenses relates to products sold in the International Markets segment. Prior to the sale, the
majority of the liability for unpaid claims and claim expenses related to disability claims with long-tailed payouts. The rollforward
above reflects activity inclusive of these reserves, which were sold on December 31, 2020. Interest earned on assets backing these
liabilities is an integral part of pricing and reserving. Therefore, interest accreted on prior year balances is shown as a separate
component of prior year incurred claims and reported in Medical costs and other benefit expenses in the Consolidated Statements of
Income. This interest is calculated by applying the average discount rate used in determining the liability balance to the average
liability balance over the period. The remaining prior year incurred claims amount primarily reflects updates to the Company’s
liability estimates and variances between actual experience during the period relative to the assumptions and expectations reflected in
determining the liability. Assumptions reflect the Company’s expectations over the life of the book of business and will vary from
actual experience in any period, both favorably and unfavorably, with variation in resolution rates being the most significant driver
for the long-term disability business. Favorable prior year incurred claims for the year ended December 31, 2019 primarily reflected
favorable long-term disability resolution rate experience relative to expectations reflected in the prior year reserve and favorable
reserve development for life, accident and voluntary driven by lower than expected incidence. Development for the year ended
December 31, 2020 was immaterial.
Note 10 – Reinsurance
The Company’s insurance subsidiaries enter into agreements with other insurance companies to assume and cede reinsurance.
Reinsurance is ceded primarily in acquisition and disposition transactions when the underwriting company is not being acquired.
Reinsurance is also used to limit losses from large exposures and to permit recovery of a portion of direct or assumed losses.
Reinsurance does not relieve the originating insurer of liability. Therefore, reinsured liabilities must continue to be reported along
with the related reinsurance recoverables. The Company regularly evaluates the financial condition of its reinsurers and monitors
concentrations of its credit risk.(1)
104
A.Reinsurance Recoverables
Accounting policy. Reinsurance recoverables represent amounts due from reinsurers for both paid and unpaid claims of the
Company’s insurance businesses. Most reinsurance recoverables are classified as non-current assets. The current portion of
reinsurance recoverables is reported in Other current assets and consists primarily of recoverables on paid claims expected to be
settled within one year. Reinsurance recoverables are presented net of allowances for uncollectible reinsurance that, effective with
adopting ASU 2016-13 on January 1, 2020, consists primarily of an allowance for expected credit losses. $31 million was recorded
as a cumulative effect adjustment to retained earnings at adoption. Estimates of the allowance for expected credit losses are based on
internal and external data used to develop expected loss rates over the anticipated duration of the recoverable asset that vary by
external credit rating and collateral level. The Company's allowance for credit losses on reinsurance recoverables was $32 million as
of December 31, 2020, of which $31 million was recorded as a cumulative effect adjustment to retained earnings at adoption.
The majority of the Company’s reinsurance recoverables resulted from acquisition and disposition transactions in which the
underwriting company was not acquired. Included in the table below is $217 million of current reinsurance recoverables that are
reported in Other current assets as of December 31, 2020; as of December 31, 2019 there was $222 million of current reinsurance
recoverables reported in Other current assets. The Company’s reinsurance recoverables are presented in the following table by range
of external credit rating and collateral level.
(Dollars in millions)Fair value of
collateral
contractually
required to meet or
exceed carrying
value of
recoverableCollateral
provisions exist
that may mitigate
risk of credit loss No collateral Total
Ongoing Operations
Upper-medium grade and higher $ — $ — $ 173 $ 173 
Lower-medium grade — — 64 64 
Not rated 92 — 29 121 
Total recoverables related to ongoing operations 92 — 266 358 
Acquisition, disposition or runoff activities
Upper-medium grade and higher 
Lincoln National Life and Lincoln Life & Annuity of New York — 3,033 — 3,033 
Berkshire 309 409 — 718 
Prudential Retirement Insurance and Annuity 625 — — 625 
Life Insurance Company of North America — 424 — 424 
Other 232 18 20 270 
Not rated — 17 4 21 
Total recoverables related to acquisition, disposition or runoff activities 1,166 3,901 24 5,091 
Total $ 1,258 $ 3,901 $ 290 $ 5,449 
Allowance for uncollectible reinsurance (32)
Total reinsurance recoverables $ 5,417 
( 1 )Includes A- equivalent and higher current ratings certified by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization ("NRSRO")
(2)Includes BBB- to BBB+ equivalent current credit ratings certified by an NRSRO
(3)Includes collateral provisions requiring the reinsurer to fully collateralize its obligation if its external credit rating is downgraded to a specified level
Collateral levels are defined internally based on the fair value of the collateral relative to the carrying amount of the reinsurance
recoverable, the frequency at which collateral is required to be replenished and the potential for volatility in the collateral’s fair
value.
The Company bears the risk of loss if its reinsurers and retrocessionaires do not meet or are unable to meet their reinsurance
obligations to the Company. The Company reviews its reinsurance arrangements and establishes reserves against the recoverables, as
further described above.(3)
(1)
 (2)
(1)
105
B.Effects of Reinsurance
The following table presents direct, assumed and ceded premiums for both short-duration and long-duration insurance contracts. It
also presents reinsurance recoveries that have been netted against benefit expenses in the Company’s Consolidated Statements of
Income.
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Premiums
Short-duration contracts
Direct $ 38,425 $ 35,690 $ 32,148 
Assumed 85 64 77 
Ceded (230) (203) (182)
Total short-duration contract premiums 38,280 35,551 32,043 
Long-duration contracts
Direct 4,517 4,352 4,268 
Assumed 99 105 116 
Ceded
Individual life insurance and annuity business sold (119) (126) (133)
Other (150) (168) (181)
Total long-duration contract premiums 4,347 4,163 4,070 
Total premiums $ 42,627 $ 39,714 $ 36,113 
Reinsurance recoveries
Individual life insurance and annuity business sold $ 240 $ 238 $ 249 
Other 191 157 203 
Total reinsurance recoveries $ 431 $ 395 $ 452 
C.Effective Exit of GMDB and GMIB Business
The Company entered into an agreement with Berkshire to effectively exit the GMDB and GMIB business via a reinsurance
transaction in 2013. Berkshire reinsured 100% of the Company’s future claim payments in this business, net of other reinsurance
arrangements existing at that time. The reinsurance agreement is subject to an overall limit with approximately $3.2 billion
remaining at December 31, 2020.
GMDB is accounted for as assumed and ceded reinsurance and GMIB assets and liabilities are reported as derivatives at fair value as
discussed below. GMIB assets are reported in Other current assets and Other assets, and GMIB liabilities are reported in Accrued
expenses and other liabilities and Other non-current liabilities.
GMDB
The GMDB exposure arises under annuities written by ceding companies that guarantee the benefit received at death. The
Company’s exposure arises when the guaranteed minimum death benefit exceeds the fair value of the related mutual fund
investments at the time of a contractholder’s death.
Accounting policy. The Company estimates the gross liability and reinsurance recoverable with an internal model based on the
Company’s experience and future expectations over an extended period, consistent with the long-term nature of this product. As a
result of the reinsurance transaction, reserve increases have a corresponding increase in the recorded reinsurance recoverable,
provided the increased recoverable remains within the overall Berkshire limit (including the GMIB asset presented below).
106
The following table presents the account value, net amount at risk and the number of contractholders for guarantees assumed by the
Company in the event of death. The net amount at risk is the amount that the Company would have to pay if all contractholders died
as of the specified date. The Company should be reimbursed in full for these payments unless the Berkshire reinsurance limit is
exceeded.
(Dollars in millions, excludes impact of reinsurance ceded)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Account value $ 9,523 $ 9,110 
Net amount at risk $ 1,570 $ 1,764 
Average attained age of contractholders (weighted by exposure) 77 76
Number of contractholders (estimated) 185,000 200,000 
GMIB
The Company reinsured contracts with issuers of GMIB products. The Company’s exposure represents the excess of a contractually
guaranteed amount over the level of variable annuity account values. Payment by the Company depends on the actual account value
in the related underlying mutual funds and the level of interest rates when the contractholders elect to receive minimum income
payments that can only occur within 30 days of a policy anniversary after the appropriate waiting period. The Company has
purchased retrocessional coverage (“GMIB assets”) for these contracts including retrocessional coverage from Berkshire.
Accounting policy. The Company reports GMIB liabilities and assets as derivatives at fair value because cash flows of these
liabilities and assets are affected by equity markets and interest rates, but are without significant life insurance risk and are settled in
lump sum payments. The Company receives and pays fees periodically based on either contractholders’ account values or deposits
increased at a contractual rate. The Company will also pay and receive cash depending on changes in account values and interest
rates when contractholders first elect to receive minimum income payments. Cash flows on these contracts are reported in operating
activities.
Assumptions used in fair value measurement. GMIB assets and liabilities are established using capital market assumptions and
assumptions related to future annuitant behavior (including mortality, lapse and annuity election rates). The Company classifies
GMIB assets and liabilities in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy described in Note 12 because assumptions related to future
annuitant behavior are largely unobservable.
The only assumption expected to impact future shareholders’ net income is non-performance risk. The non-performance risk
adjustment reflects a market participant’s view of nonpayment risk by adding an additional spread to the discount rate in the
calculation of both (a) the GMIB liabilities to be paid by the Company, and (b) the GMIB assets to be paid by the reinsurers, after
considering collateral. The impact of non-performance risk was immaterial for the years ended December 31, 2020 and
December 31, 2019.
GMIB liabilities totaling $729 million as of December 31, 2020 and $688 million as of December 31, 2019 were reported in Accrued
expenses and other liabilities and Other non-current liabilities. There were three reinsurers covering 100% of the GMIB exposures as
of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019 as follows:
(In millions)
Line of Business ReinsurerDecember 31,
2020December 31,
2019Collateral and Other Terms at
December 31, 2020
GMIB Berkshire $ 353 $ 332 100% were secured by assets in a trust.
Sun Life Assurance Company of Canada 215 202 
Liberty Re (Bermuda) Ltd. 190 179 100% were secured by assets in a trust.
Total GMIB recoverables reported in Other current assets and Other assets $ 758 $ 713 
All reinsurers are rated A- equivalent and higher by an NRSRO.
Amounts included in shareholders’ net income for GMIB assets and liabilities were not material in 2020, 2019 and 2018.
107
Note 11 – Investments
Cigna’s investment portfolio consists of a broad range of investments including debt securities, equity securities, commercial
mortgage loans, policy loans, other long-term investments, short-term investments and derivative financial instruments. The sections
below provide more detail regarding our investment balances and realized investment gains and losses. See Note 12 for information
about the valuation of the Company’s investment portfolio. Debt securities, commercial mortgage loans, derivative financial
instruments and short-term investments with contractual maturities during the next twelve months are classified on the balance sheet
as current investments, unless they are held as statutory deposits or restricted for other purposes and then they are classified in Long-
term investments. Equity securities may include exchange traded funds that are used in our cash management strategy and are
classified as current investments. All other investments are classified as Long-term investments. The following table summarizes the
Company's investments by category and current or long-term classification.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(In millions) Current Long-term Total Current Long-term Total
Debt securities $ 959 $ 17,172 $ 18,131 $ 928 $ 22,827 $ 23,755 
Equity securities — 501 501 — 303 303 
Commercial mortgage loans 13 1,406 1,419 — 1,947 1,947 
Policy loans — 1,351 1,351 — 1,357 1,357 
Other long-term investments — 2,832 2,832 — 2,403 2,403 
Short-term investments 359 — 359 423 — 423 
Total 1,351 28,837 30,188 
Investments classified as assets of business held for sale (414) (7,295) (7,709)
Investments per Consolidated Balance Sheets $ 1,331 $ 23,262 $ 24,593 $ 937 $ 21,542 $ 22,479 
(1)On December 31, 2020, Cigna completed the sale of its U.S. Group Disability and Life business and transferred a total of $8.4 billion of investments to New York
Life Insurance Company as part of this divestiture. The table above includes $7.7 billion as of December 31, 2019 of investments associated with this business
that was previously held for sale.
A.Investment Portfolio
Debt Securities
Accounting policy. Debt securities (including bonds, mortgage and other asset-backed securities and preferred stocks redeemable by
the investor) are classified as available for sale and are carried at fair value with changes in fair value recorded either in Accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss) within Shareholders’ equity or in credit loss expense based on fluctuations in the allowance for
credit losses, as further discussed below. Net unrealized appreciation on debt securities supporting the Company’s run-off settlement
annuity business is reported in Non-current insurance and contractholder liabilities rather than Accumulated other comprehensive
income (loss). When the Company intends to sell or determines that it is more likely than not to be required to sell an impaired debt
security, the excess of amortized cost over fair value is directly written down with a charge to Realized investment gains and losses.
A portion of these investments are unconsolidated variable interest entities, see Note 13 for additional information.
As of January 1, 2020, the Company adopted ASU 2016-13 that included certain targeted improvements to the accounting for
available-for-sale debt securities. The new guidance resulted in certain policy changes related to the process used by the Company to
review declines in fair value from a security’s amortized cost basis to determine whether a credit loss exists. For example, the length
of time that a debt security has been impaired is no longer a criterion for this review. In addition, under this new guidance, the
Company recognizes an allowance for credit loss with a corresponding charge to credit loss expense, presented in Realized
investment gains and losses in the Company’s income statement. Prior to this new guidance, the Company recorded a direct write-
down of the instrument’s amortized cost basis. The allowance for credit loss represents the excess of amortized cost over the greater
of its fair value or the net present value of the debt security's projected future cash flows (based on qualitative and quantitative
factors, including the probability of default, and the estimated timing and amount of recovery). Each period, the allowance for credit
loss is adjusted through credit loss expense.
The Company elected the expedient to not measure an allowance for credit losses for accrued interest receivables. Consistent with
prior practice, when interest payments are delinquent based on contractual terms or when certain terms (interest rate or maturity date)
of the investment have been restructured, accrued interest, reported in Other current assets, is written off through a charge to Net
investment income, and interest income is recognized on a cash basis.(1)
108
Debt securities are classified as either Current or Long-term investments based on their contractual maturities.
The amortized cost and fair value by contractual maturity periods for debt securities were as follows at December 31, 2020:
(In millions)Amortized
CostFair
Value
Due in one year or less $ 991 $ 1,001 
Due after one year through five years 5,412 5,699 
Due after five years through ten years 5,581 6,178 
Due after ten years 3,809 4,818 
Mortgage and other asset-backed securities 427 435 
Total $ 16,220 $ 18,131 
Actual maturities of these securities could differ from their contractual maturities used in the table above because issuers may have
the right to call or prepay obligations, with or without penalties.
Gross unrealized appreciation (depreciation) on debt securities by type of issuer is shown below. As a result of the U.S. Group
Disability and Life business divestiture, debt securities with a fair value of $7.8 billion, primarily in the Corporate and State and
local government sectors, were transferred to New York Life on December 31, 2020. These debt securities included unrealized
appreciation of $864 million and unrealized depreciation of $2 million. See Note 5 for further information.
(In millions)Amortized
CostAllowance for
Credit LossUnrealized
AppreciationUnrealized
DepreciationFair
Value
December 31, 2020
Federal government and agency $ 334 $ — $ 122 $ — $ 456 
State and local government 150 — 17 — 167 
Foreign government 2,201 — 318 (8) 2,511 
Corporate 13,108 (19) 1,506 (33) 14,562 
Mortgage and other asset-backed 427 (7) 27 (12) 435 
Total $ 16,220 $ (26)$ 1,990 $ (53)$ 18,131 
Investments supporting liabilities of the Company’s run-off settlement
annuity business (included in total above) $ 2,282 $ (5)$ 838 $ (3)$ 3,112 
December 31, 2019
Federal government and agency $ 498 $ — $ 235 $ — $ 733 
State and local government 729 — 81 — 810 
Foreign government 2,027 — 230 (1) 2,256 
Corporate 18,149 — 1,299 (28) 19,420 
Mortgage and other asset-backed 506 — 31 (1) 536 
Total $ 21,909 $ — $ 1,876 $ (30)$ 23,755 
Investments supporting liabilities of the Company’s run-off settlement
annuity business (included in total above) $ 2,229 $ — $ 740 $ (4)$ 2,965 
(1)Net unrealized appreciation for these investments is excluded from accumulated other comprehensive income.
The Company had commitments to purchase $149 million of debt securities as of December 31, 2020, bearing interest at a fixed
market rate.
Review of declines in fair value. Management reviews impaired debt securities to determine whether a credit loss allowance is
needed based on criteria that include:
•severity of decline;
•financial health and specific prospects of the issuer; and
•changes in the regulatory, economic or general market environment of the issuer’s industry or geographic region. (1)
(1)
109
The table below summarizes debt securities with a decline in fair value from amortized cost for which an allowance for credit losses
has not been recorded, by investment grade and the length of time these securities have been in an unrealized loss position. These
debt securities are primarily corporate securities with a decline in fair value that reflects an increase in market yields since purchase.
See discussion of Realized Investment Gains and Losses below for further information on the credit loss expense recorded for the
Company's investments.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(Dollars in millions)Fair
ValueAmortized
CostUnrealized
DepreciationNumber
of IssuesFair
ValueAmortized
CostUnrealized
DepreciationNumber
of Issues
One year or less
Investment grade $ 1,026 $ 1,045 $ (19) 300$ 723 $ 729 $ (6) 267 
Below investment
grade $ 381 $ 405 $ (24) 232$ 340 $ 348 $ (8) 355 
More than one year
Investment grade $ 18 $ 18 $ — 6$ 366 $ 378 $ (12) 118 
Below investment
grade $ 90 $ 100 $ (10) 33$ 84 $ 88 $ (4) 93 
Total $ 1,515 $ 1,568 $ (53) 571$ 1,513 $ 1,543 $ (30) 833 
The table below presents a roll-forward of the allowance for credit losses on debt securities for the year ended December 31, 2020.
(In millions) 2020
Balance at beginning of period $ — 
Additions for debt securities where no credit loss has previously been recognized 82 
Reductions for securities sold during the period (15)
Decrease for debt securities where credit losses have previously been recorded (41)
Balance December 31, $ 26 
Equity Securities
Accounting policy. Changes in the fair values of equity securities that have a readily determinable fair value are reported in Net
realized investment gains (losses). Equity securities without a readily determinable fair value are carried at cost minus impairment, if
any, plus or minus changes resulting from observable price changes. Equity securities also include hybrid investments consisting of
preferred stock with call features that are carried at fair value with changes in fair value reported in Net realized investment gains
(losses) and dividends reported in Net investment income.
Equity securities with a readily determinable fair value consist primarily of mutual funds that invest in fixed income debt securities
while those without a readily determinable fair value consist of private equity investments. The amount of impairments or value
changes resulting from observable price changes on equity securities still held was not material as of December 31, 2020 or 2019.
The following table provides the values of the Company's equity security investments as of December 31, 2020 and December 31,
2019.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(In millions)  Cost Carrying Value  Cost Carrying Value
Equity securities with readily determinable fair values $ 180 $ 202 $ 61 $ 64 
Equity securities with no readily determinable fair value $ 225 $ 255 $ 183 $ 192 
Hybrid equity securities $ 58 $ 44 $ 58 $ 47 
Total $ 463 $ 501 $ 302 $ 303 
Commercial Mortgage Loans
Accounting policy. Commercial mortgage loans are carried at unpaid principal balances. Beginning January 1, 2020 with the
adoption of ASU 2016-13, unpaid principal balances are presented net of an allowance for expected credit losses. Changes in the
allowance for expected credit losses are recognized as credit loss expense and presented in Realized investment gains and losses in
the Company’s income statement. Each period, the Company establishes (or adjusts) its allowance for expected credit losses for
commercial mortgage loans. The allowance for expected credit losses is based on a credit risk category that is assigned to each loan
at origination using key credit quality indicators, including debt service coverage and loan-to-value ratios. Credit risk categories are
updated as key credit quality indicators change. An expected loss rate, assigned based on the credit risk category, is applied to each
loan's unpaid principal balance to develop an aggregate allowance for expected credit losses. Prior to adoption, impaired commercial
mortgage loans were written down to the lower of unpaid principal or fair value of the underlying collateral when it became probable
that the Company
110
would not collect all amounts due under its promissory note. The Company recorded an allowance of $7 million through a
cumulative effect adjustment to retained earnings to reflect expected credit losses at adoption. The credit loss allowance for the
Company’s commercial mortgage loan investments was $6 million as of December 31, 2020.
Commercial mortgage loans are considered impaired and written off against the allowance when it is probable that the Company will
not collect all amounts due per the terms of the promissory note. The Company elected the expedient to not measure an allowance
for credit losses for accrued interest receivables. Consistent with our prior practice, accrued interest, reported in Other current assets,
is written off through a charge to Net investment income; interest income on impaired loans is only recognized when a payment is
received.
In the event of a foreclosure, the allowance for credit losses is based on the excess of the carrying value of the mortgage loan over
the fair value of its underlying collateral.
Mortgage loans held by the Company are made exclusively to commercial borrowers and are diversified by property type, location
and borrower. Loans are generally issued at fixed rates of interest and are secured by high quality, primarily completed and
substantially leased operating properties. Commercial mortgage loans are classified as either current or long-term investments based
on their contractual maturities.
Credit quality. The Company regularly evaluates and monitors credit risk, beginning with the initial underwriting of a mortgage loan
and continuing throughout the investment holding period. Mortgage origination professionals employ an internal credit quality rating
system designed to evaluate the relative risk of the transaction at origination that is then updated each year as part of the annual
portfolio loan review. The Company evaluates and monitors credit quality on a consistent and ongoing basis.
Quality ratings are based on our evaluation of a number of key inputs related to the loan, including real estate market-related factors
such as rental rates and vacancies, and property-specific inputs such as growth rate assumptions and lease rollover statistics.
However, the two most significant contributors to the credit quality rating are the debt service coverage and loan-to-value ratios. The
debt service coverage ratio measures the amount of property cash flow available to meet annual interest and principal payments on
debt, with a ratio below 1.0 indicating that there is not enough cash flow to cover the required loan payments. The loan-to-value
ratio, commonly expressed as a percentage, compares the amount of the loan to the fair value of the underlying property
collateralizing the loan.
The following table summarizes the credit risk profile of the Company’s commercial mortgage loan portfolio based on loan-to-value
and debt service coverage ratios as of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019. As a result of the U.S. Group Disability and Life
business divestiture, $0.6 billion of commercial mortgage loans were transferred to New York Life on December 31, 2020, see Note
5 for further information.
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Loan-to-Value Ratio Carrying ValueAverage Debt
Service
Coverage RatioAverage
Loan-to-
Value Ratio Carrying ValueAverage Debt
Service
Coverage RatioAverage
Loan-to-
Value Ratio
Below 60% $ 533 2.28 $ 1,136 2.19
60% to 79% 751 2.08 723 1.98
80% to 100% 141 1.33 88 1.62
Allowance for credit losses (6)
Total $ 1,419 2.08 61 %$ 1,947 2.09 58 %
The Company’s annual in-depth review of its commercial mortgage loan investments is the primary mechanism for identifying
emerging risks in the portfolio. The Company’s investment professionals completed the annual in-depth review in the second quarter
of 2020 that included an analysis of each underlying property’s most recent annual financial statements, rent rolls, operating plans,
budgets, a physical inspection of the property and other pertinent factors. Based on historical results, current leases, lease expirations
and rental conditions in each market, the Company estimated the current year and future stabilized property income and fair value for
each loan.
The Company re-evaluates a loan’s credit quality between annual reviews if new property information is received or an event such as
delinquency or a borrower’s request for restructure causes management to believe that the Company’s estimate of financial
performance, fair value or the risk profile of the underlying property has been impacted.
All commercial mortgage loans in the Company's portfolio are current as of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019.
111
Policy Loans
Accounting policy. Policy loans, primarily associated with our corporate-owned life insurance business, are carried at unpaid
principal balances plus accumulated interest, the total of which approximates fair value. These loans are collateralized by life
insurance policy cash values and therefore have minimal exposure to credit loss. Interest rates are reset annually based on a rolling
average of benchmark interest rates.
Other Long-Term Investments
Accounting policy. Other long-term investments include investments in unconsolidated entities, including certain limited
partnerships and limited liability companies holding real estate, securities or loans. These investments are carried at cost plus the
Company's ownership percentage of reporting income or loss, based on the financial statements of the underlying investments that
are generally reported at fair value. Income or loss from these investments is reported on a one quarter lag due to the timing of when
financial information is received from the general partner or manager of the investments.
Other long-term investments also include investment real estate carried at depreciated cost less any impairment write-downs to fair
value when cash flows indicate that the carrying value may not be recoverable. Depreciation is generally recorded using the straight-
line method based on the estimated useful life of each asset. Investment real estate as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 is expected to
be held longer than one year and may include real estate acquired through the foreclosure of commercial mortgage loans.
Additionally, statutory and other restricted deposits, healthcare related investment partnerships and foreign currency swaps carried at
fair value are reported in the table below as Other. See discussion below for information on the Company’s accounting policies for
derivative financial instruments.
Other long-term investments and related commitments are diversified by issuer, property type and geographic regions. A majority of
these investments are unconsolidated variable entities, see Note 13 for additional information. The following table provides unfunded
commitment and carrying value information for these investments. The Company expects to disburse approximately 38% of the
committed amounts in 2021.
Unfunded
Commitments as of Carrying value as of December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 December 31, 2020
Real estate investments $ 951 $ 788 $ 677 
Securities partnerships 1,683 1,409 1,617 
Other 198 206 31 
Total $ 2,832 $ 2,403 $ 2,325 
Short-Term Investments and Cash Equivalents
Accounting policy. Security investments with maturities of greater than three months to one year from time of purchase are classified
as short-term, available for sale and carried at fair value that approximates cost. Cash equivalents consist of short-term investments
with maturities of three months or less from the time of purchase and are carried at cost that approximates fair value.
Short-term investments and cash equivalents included the following types of issuers. The increase since prior year end is
substantially attributable to proceeds received on December 31, 2020 from the U.S. Group Disability and Life business divestiture,
see Note 5 for further information.
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Corporate securities $ 2,669 $ 1,985 
Federal government securities $ 158 $ 472 
Foreign government securities $ 90 $ 65 
Money market funds $ 5,134 $ 631 
B.Derivative Financial Instruments
The Company uses derivative financial instruments to manage the characteristics of investment assets (such as duration, yield,
currency and liquidity) to meet the varying demands of the related insurance and contract holder liabilities. The Company also uses
derivative financial instruments to hedge the risk of changes in the net assets of certain of its foreign subsidiaries due to changes in
foreign currency exchange rates. The Company has written and purchased GMIB reinsurance contracts in its run-off reinsurance
business that are accounted for as freestanding derivatives as discussed in Note 10. Derivatives in the Company’s separate accounts
112
are excluded from the following discussion because associated gains and losses generally accrue directly to separate account
policyholders.
Derivative instruments used by the Company typically include foreign currency swap contracts and foreign currency forward
contracts. Foreign currency swap contracts periodically exchange cash flows between two currencies for principal and interest.
Foreign currency forward contracts require the Company to purchase a foreign currency in exchange for the functional currency of
its operating unit at a future date.
The Company manages the credit risk of these derivative instruments by diversifying its portfolio among approved dealers of high
credit quality and through routine monitoring of credit risk exposures. Certain of the Company’s over-the-counter derivative
instruments require either the Company or the counterparty to post collateral or demand immediate payment depending on the
amount of the net liability position of the derivative instrument and predefined financial strength or credit rating thresholds. These
collateral posting requirements vary by counterparty. The Company may incur a loss if dealers failed to perform under derivative
contracts, however collateral has been posted by dealers to cover substantially all of the net fair values owed at December 31, 2020
and December 31, 2019. The fair value of collateral posted by the Company was not significant as of December 31, 2020 or
December 31, 2019.
Accounting policy. Derivatives are recorded on our balance sheet at fair value and are classified as current or non-current according
to their contractual maturities. Further information on our policies for determining fair value are discussed in Note 12. The Company
applies hedge accounting when derivatives are designated, qualified and highly effective as hedges. Under hedge accounting, the
changes in fair value of the derivative and the hedged risk are generally recognized together and offset each other when reported in
Shareholders’ net income. Various qualitative or quantitative methods appropriate for each hedge are used to formally assess and
document hedge effectiveness at inception and each period throughout the life of a hedge.
The gross fair values of our derivative financial instruments are presented in Note 12. The following table summarizes the types and
notional quantity of derivative instruments held by the Company. As of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, the effects of
these individual hedging strategies were not material to the Consolidated Financial Statements, including gains or losses reclassified
from accumulated other comprehensive income into shareholders' net income, as well as amounts excluded from the assessment of
hedge effectiveness.
Notional Value as of
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019 Purpose Type of Instrument
Fair value hedge: To hedge the foreign exchange-related changes in fair values of
certain foreign-denominated bonds. The notional value of these derivatives matches
the amortized cost of the hedged bonds.Foreign currency swap contracts $ 925 $ 817 
Net investment hedge: To reduce the risk of changes in net assets due to changes in
foreign currency spot exchange rates for certain foreign subsidiaries that conduct
their business principally in Euros, Korean Won and Taiwan Dollar. The notional
value of hedging instruments matches the hedged amount of subsidiary net assets.Foreign currency swap contracts $ 526 $ 438 
Foreign currency forward contracts $ 636 $ 406 
Economic hedge: To hedge the foreign exchange-related changes in fair value of
U.S. dollar-denominated investment assets to reflect the local currency for the
Company’s foreign subsidiary in South Korea. The notional value of hedging
instruments generally aligns with the fair value of the hedged investments.Foreign currency forward contracts $ 538 $ 410 
The Company’s derivative financial instruments are presented as follows: 
•Fair value hedges of the foreign exchange-related changes in fair values of certain foreign-denominated bonds: Swap fair
values are reported in Long-term investments or Other non-current liabilities. Changes in fair values attributable to foreign
exchange risk of the swap contracts and the hedged bonds are reported in Realized investment gains and losses. The portion
of the swap contracts’ changes in fair value excluded from the assessment of hedge effectiveness is recorded in Other
comprehensive income and recognized in Net investment income as swap coupon payments are accrued, offsetting the
foreign-denominated coupons received on the designated bonds. Net cash flows are reported in Operating activities, while
exchanges of notional principal amounts are reported in Investing activities.
•Net investment hedges of certain foreign subsidiaries that conduct their business principally in currencies other than the
U.S. dollar: The fair values of the foreign currency swap and forward contracts are reported in Other assets or Other
liabilities. The changes in fair values of these instruments are reported in Other comprehensive income, specifically in
translation of foreign currencies. The portion of the change in fair values relating to foreign exchange spot rates will be
recognized in earnings upon deconsolidation of the hedged foreign subsidiaries. The remaining changes in fair value of
these instruments are excluded from our effectiveness assessment and recognized in interest expense when coupon
payments are accrued or ratably
113
over the term of the instrument. The notional value of hedging instruments matches the hedged amount of subsidiary net
assets. Cash flows relating to these contracts are reported in Investing activities.
•Economic hedges for derivatives not designated as accounting hedges: Fair values of forward contracts are reported in
Current investments or Accrued expenses and other liabilities. The changes in fair values are reported in Realized
investment gains and losses. Cash flows relating to these contracts are reported in Investing activities.
Concentration of Risk
The Company did not have a concentration of investments in a single issuer or borrower exceeding 10% of shareholders' equity as of
December 31, 2020 or 2019.
C.Net Investment Income
Accounting policy. When interest and principal payments on investments are current, the Company recognizes interest income when
it is earned. The Company recognizes interest income on a cash basis when interest payments are delinquent based on contractual
terms or when certain terms (interest rate or maturity date) of the investment have been restructured. For unconsolidated entities that
are included in Other long-term investments, investment income is generally recognized according to the Company’s share of the
reported income or loss on the underlying investments. Investment income attributed to the Company’s separate accounts is excluded
from our earnings because associated gains and losses generally accrue directly to separate account policyholders.
The components of Net investment income for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Debt Securities $ 962 $ 986 $ 1,009 
Equity securities 11 5 28 
Commercial mortgage loans 80 88 78 
Policy loans 64 66 70 
Other long-term investments 127 167 156 
Short-term investments and cash 52 131 194 
Total investment income 1,296 1,443 1,535 
Less investment expenses 52 53 55 
Net investment income $ 1,244 $ 1,390 $ 1,480 
D.Realized Investment Gains and Losses
Accounting policy. Realized investment gains and losses are based on specifically identified assets and result from sales, investment
asset write-downs, change in the fair value of certain derivatives and equity securities and changes in valuation reserves on
commercial mortgage loans. Commencing January 1, 2020, realized gains and losses also include credit loss expense resulting from
the impact of changes in the allowances for credit losses on debt securities and commercial mortgage loan investments under ASU
2016-13.
Gains and losses relating to the transfers of investment assets associated with the divestiture of the U.S. Group Disability and Life
business are excluded from the activity below, see Note 5 for further information. The following realized gains and losses on
investments exclude amounts required to adjust future policy benefits for the run-off settlement annuity business (consistent with
accounting for a premium deficiency, see Note 9 for further information), as well as realized gains and losses attributed to the
Company’s separate accounts because those gains and losses generally accrue directly to separate account policyholders.
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net realized investment gains (losses), excluding credit loss expense and asset write-downs $ 186 $ 189 $ (34)
Credit loss (expense) recoveries on invested assets (27) — — 
Other investment asset write-downs (10) (12) (47)
Net realized investment gains (losses), before income taxes $ 149 $ 177 $ (81)
Net realized investment gains, excluding credit loss expense and asset write-downs for the year ended December 31, 2020 was
primarily driven by mark-to-market gains on equity securities and sales of debt securities, while this activity for the year ended
December 31, 2019 was primarily driven by gains on the sales of real estate partnerships and debt securities. Net realized investment
losses, excluding credit loss expense and asset write-downs in 2018 represented mark-to-market losses on equity securities and
114
derivatives, partially offset by gains on the sales of real estate partnerships. Credit loss (expense) recoveries on invested assets for the
year ended December 31, 2020 reflects credit losses incurred primarily on debt securities due to uncertainty around issuers in certain
industries that are particularly impacted by the global COVID-19 pandemic. Realized gains and losses on equity securities still held
at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 were not material.
The following table presents sales information for available-for-sale debt securities. Gross gains on sales and gross losses on sales
exclude amounts required to adjust future policy benefits for the run-off settlement annuity business.
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Proceeds from sales $ 2,186 $ 3,077 $ 2,625 
Gross gains on sales $ 89 $ 72 $ 28 
Gross losses on sales $ (23)$ (19)$ (47)
Note 12 – Fair Value Measurements
The Company carries certain financial instruments at fair value in the financial statements including debt securities, certain equity
securities, short-term investments and derivatives. Other financial instruments are measured at fair value only under certain
conditions, such as when impaired or when there are observable price changes for equity securities with no readily determinable fair
value.
Fair value is defined as the price at which an asset could be exchanged in an orderly transaction between market participants at the
balance sheet date. A liability’s fair value is defined as the amount that would be paid to transfer the liability to a market participant,
not the amount that would be paid to settle the liability with the creditor.
The Company’s financial assets and liabilities carried at fair value have been classified based upon a hierarchy defined by GAAP.
The hierarchy gives the highest ranking to fair values determined using unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical
assets and liabilities (Level 1) and the lowest ranking to fair values determined using methodologies and models with unobservable
inputs (Level 3). An asset’s or a liability’s classification is based on the lowest level of input that is significant to its measurement.
For example, a financial asset or liability carried at fair value would be classified in Level 3 if unobservable inputs were significant
to the instrument’s fair value, even though the measurement may be derived using inputs that are both observable (Levels 1 and 2)
and unobservable (Level 3).
The Company estimates fair values using prices from third parties or internal pricing methods. Fair value estimates received from
third-party pricing services are based on reported trade activity and quoted market prices when available, and other market
information that a market participant would use to estimate fair value. The internal pricing methods are performed by the Company’s
investment professionals and generally involve using discounted cash flow analyses, incorporating current market inputs for similar
financial instruments with comparable terms and credit quality as well as other qualitative factors. In instances where there is little or
no market activity for the same or similar instruments, fair value is estimated using methods, models and assumptions that the
Company believes a hypothetical market participant would use to determine a current transaction price. These valuation techniques
involve some level of estimation and judgment that becomes significant with increasingly complex instruments or pricing models.
The Company is responsible for determining fair value and for assigning the appropriate level within the fair value hierarchy based
on the significance of unobservable inputs. The Company reviews methodologies, processes and controls of third-party pricing
services and compares prices on a test basis to those obtained from other external pricing sources or internal estimates. The Company
performs ongoing analyses of both prices received from third-party pricing services and those developed internally to determine that
they represent appropriate estimates of fair value. The controls executed by the Company include evaluating changes in prices and
monitoring for potentially stale valuations. The Company also performs sample testing of sales values to confirm the accuracy of
prior fair value estimates. The minimal exceptions identified during these processes indicate that adjustments to prices are infrequent
and do not significantly impact valuations. An annual due-diligence review of the most significant pricing service is conducted to
review their processes, methodologies and controls. This review includes a walk-through of inputs for a sample of securities held
across various asset types to validate the documented pricing process.
115
A.Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Fair Value
The following table provides information as of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019 about the Company’s financial assets and
liabilities carried at fair value. As a result of the U.S. Group Disability and Life business divestiture, debt securities with a fair value
of $7.8 billion, primarily classified in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy, were transferred to New York Life on December 31, 2020.
See Note 5 for further information. Separate account assets are also recorded at fair value on the Company’s Consolidated Balance
Sheets and are reported separately in the Separate Accounts section below as gains and losses related to these assets generally accrue
directly to policyholders.
(In millions)Quoted Prices in Active
Markets for Identical Assets
(Level 1)Significant Other Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
As of
December 31,
2020As of
December 31,
2019As of
December 31,
2020As of
December 31,
2019As of
December 31,
2020As of
December 31,
2019As of
December 31,
2020As of
December 31,
2019
Financial assets at fair
value
Debt securities
Federal government
and agency$ 207 $ 197 $ 249 $ 536 $ — $ — $ 456 $ 733 
State and local
government— — 167 810 — — 167 810 
Foreign government — — 2,498 2,228 13 28 2,511 2,256 
Corporate — — 13,878 19,063 684 357 14,562 19,420 
Mortgage and other
asset-backed— — 309 398 126 138 435 536 
Total debt securities 207 197 17,101 23,035 823 523 18,131 23,755 
Equity securities 50 7 165 72 31 32 246 111 
Short-term investments — — 325 423 — — 325 423 
Derivative assets — — 72 83 — — 72 83 
Real estate funds priced
at NAV as a practical
expedient 156 184 
Financial liabilities at
fair value
Derivative liabilities $ — $ — $ 108 $ 18 $ — $ — $ 108 $ 18 
(1)Excludes certain equity securities that have no readily determinable fair value.
(2)As a practical expedient, certain real estate funds are carried at fair value based on the Company’s ownership share of the equity of the investee (Net Asset Value
(“NAV”)) including changes in the fair value of its underlying investments. The Company has $50 million in unfunded commitments in these funds as of
December 31, 2020.
(3)Derivative assets above include $34 million that are presented in the Short-term investments category in Note 11. See Note 11 for more information on our
accounting for Derivative Financial Instruments.
Level 1 Financial Assets
Inputs for instruments classified in Level 1 include unadjusted quoted prices for identical assets in active markets accessible at the
measurement date. Active markets provide pricing data for trades occurring at least weekly and include exchanges and dealer
markets.
Assets in Level 1 include actively-traded U.S. government bonds and exchange-listed equity securities. A relatively small portion of
the Company’s investment assets are classified in this category given the narrow definition of Level 1 and the Company’s investment
asset strategy to maximize investment returns.
Level 2 Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities
Inputs for instruments classified in Level 2 include quoted prices for similar assets or liabilities in active markets, quoted prices from
those willing to trade in markets that are not active or other inputs that are market observable or can be corroborated by market data
for the term of the instrument. Such other inputs include market interest rates and volatilities, spreads and yield curves. An
instrument is classified in Level 2 if the Company determines that unobservable inputs are insignificant.
Debt and equity securities. Approximately 94% of the Company’s investments in debt and equity securities are classified in Level 2
including most public and private corporate debt and hybrid equity securities, federal agency and municipal bonds, non-government
mortgage-backed securities and preferred stocks. Third-party pricing services and internal methods often use recent trades of
securities(1)
 (3)
(2)
116
with similar features and characteristics because many debt securities do not trade daily. Pricing models are used to determine these
prices when recent trades are not available. These models calculate fair values by discounting future cash flows at estimated market
interest rates. Such market rates are derived by calculating the appropriate spreads over comparable U.S. Treasury securities based on
the credit quality, industry and structure of the asset. Typical inputs and assumptions to pricing models include, but are not limited to,
a combination of benchmark yields, reported trades, issuer spreads, liquidity, benchmark securities, bids, offers, reference data and
industry and economic events. For mortgage-backed securities, inputs and assumptions may also include characteristics of the issuer,
collateral attributes, prepayment speeds and credit rating.
Nearly all of these instruments are valued using recent trades or pricing models. Less than 1% of the fair value of investments
classified in Level 2 represents foreign bonds that are valued using a single, unadjusted market-observable input derived by
averaging multiple broker-dealer quotes, consistent with local market practice.
Short-term investments are carried at fair value that approximates cost. The Company compares market prices for these securities to
recorded amounts on a regular basis to validate that current carrying amounts approximate exit prices. The short-term nature of the
investments and corroboration of the reported amounts over the holding period support their classification in Level 2.
Derivative assets and liabilities classified in Level 2 represent over-the-counter instruments such as foreign currency forward and
swap contracts. Fair values for these instruments are determined using market observable inputs including forward currency and
interest rate curves and widely published market observable indices. Credit risk related to the counterparty and the Company is
considered when estimating the fair values of these derivatives. However, the Company is largely protected by collateral
arrangements with counterparties and determined that no adjustments for credit risk were required as of December 31, 2020 or 2019.
The nature and use of these derivative financial instruments are described in Note 11.
Level 3 Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities
Certain inputs for instruments classified in Level 3 are unobservable (supported by little or no market activity) and significant to
their resulting fair value measurement. Unobservable inputs reflect the Company’s best estimate of what hypothetical market
participants would use to determine a transaction price for the asset or liability at the reporting date.
The Company classifies certain newly-issued, privately-placed, complex or illiquid securities in Level 3. Approximately 5% of debt
and equity securities are priced using significant unobservable inputs and classified in this category.
Fair values of mortgage and other asset-backed securities, as well as corporate and government debt securities, are primarily
determined using pricing models that incorporate the specific characteristics of each asset and related assumptions including the
investment type and structure, credit quality, industry and maturity date in comparison to current market indices, spreads and
liquidity of assets with similar characteristics. Inputs and assumptions for pricing may also include characteristics of the issuer,
collateral attributes and prepayment speeds for mortgage and other asset-backed securities. Recent trades in the subject security or
similar securities are assessed when available, and the Company may also review published research in its evaluation, as well as the
issuer’s financial statements.
Quantitative Information about Unobservable Inputs
The following table summarizes the fair value and significant unobservable inputs used in pricing the following debt securities that
were developed directly by the Company as of December 31, 2020 and 2019. The range and weighted average basis point (“bps”)
amounts for liquidity and credit spreads (adjustment to discount rates) reflect the Company’s best estimates of the unobservable
adjustments a market participant would make to calculate these fair values. These liquidity and credit spreads have increased over the
reported periods, resulting from continued uncertainty over the economic impacts related to COVID-19.
Corporate and government debt securities. The significant unobservable input used to value the following corporate and
government debt securities is an adjustment for liquidity. This adjustment is needed to reflect current market conditions and issuer
circumstances when there is limited trading activity for the security.
117
Mortgage and other asset-backed securities. The significant unobservable inputs used to value the following mortgage and other
asset-backed securities are liquidity and weighting of credit spreads. An adjustment for liquidity is made as of the measurement date
that considers current market conditions, issuer circumstances and complexity of the security structure when there is limited trading
activity for the security. An adjustment to weight credit spreads is needed to value a more complex bond structure with multiple
underlying collateral and no standard market valuation technique. The weighting of credit spreads is primarily based on the
underlying collateral’s characteristics and their proportional cash flows supporting the bond obligations.
Fair Value as ofUnobservable Adjustment Range
(Weighted Average by Quantity) as of
(Fair value in millions )December 31,
2020December 31,
2019Unobservable input
December 31, 2020December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Debt securities
Corporate and government debt securities $ 696 $ 385 Liquidity 60 - 1370 (470)bps 70 - 930 (280)bps
Mortgage and other asset-backed securities 126 138 Liquidity 60 - 380 (80)bps 60 - 370 (70)bps
Weighting of credit
spreads 300 - 670 (480)bps 240 - 460 (330)bps
Securities not priced by the Company 1 — 
Total Level 3 debt securities $ 823 $ 523 
(1)The fair values for these securities use single, unadjusted non-binding broker quotes not developed directly by the Company.
Significant increases in liquidity or credit spreads would result in lower fair value measurements while decreases in these inputs
would result in higher fair value measurements. The unobservable inputs are generally not interrelated and a change in the
assumption used for one unobservable input is not accompanied by a change in the other unobservable input.
Changes in Level 3 Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Fair Value
The following tables summarize the changes in financial assets and financial liabilities classified in Level 3 for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019. Gains and losses reported in these tables may include net changes in fair value that are attributable to
both observable and unobservable inputs.
(In millions) 2020 2019
Balance at beginning of period $ 555 $ 410 
Total gains (losses) included in shareholders’ net income (7) (8)
Gains (losses) included in other comprehensive income (12) 22 
Gains (losses) required to adjust future policy benefits for settlement annuities 7 2 
Purchases, sales and settlements
Purchases 107 72 
Sales (121) — 
Settlements (89) (19)
Total purchases, sales and settlements $ (103)$ 53 
Transfers into/(out of) Level 3
Transfers into Level 3 774 170 
Transfers out of Level 3 (360) (94)
Total transfers into/(out of) Level 3 $ 414 $ 76 
Balance at December 31, $ 854 $ 555 
Total gains (losses) included in shareholders’ net income attributable to instruments held at the reporting date $ (17)$ (8)
Change in unrealized gains or losses included in other comprehensive income for assets held at the end of the reporting period $ (6) N/A
(1)Amounts do not accrue to shareholders.
(2)Sales in 2020 include $108 million of Level 3 debt securities transferred to New York Life Insurance Company on December 31, 2020 as part of the U.S. Group
Disability and Life business divestiture. See Note 5 for further details.
Total gains and losses included in Shareholders’ net income in the tables above are reflected in the Consolidated Statements of
Income as Net realized investment gains (losses) and Net investment income.
Gains and losses included in Other comprehensive income in the tables above are reflected in Net unrealized (depreciation)
appreciation on securities and derivatives in the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income.
Transfers into or out of the Level 3 category occur when unobservable inputs, such as the Company’s best estimate of what a market
participant would use to determine a current transaction price, become more or less significant to the fair value measurement. Market(1)
(1)
 (2)
118
activity typically decreases during periods of economic uncertainty, and this decrease in activity reduces the availability of market
observable data. As a result, the level of unobservable judgement that must be applied to the pricing of certain instruments increases,
and is typically observed through the widening of liquidity and credit spreads. Transfers between Level 2 and Level 3 during 2020
and 2019 primarily reflected changes in liquidity and credit risk estimates for certain private placement issuers across several sectors.
Transfers into and out of Level 3 are higher in 2020 due to fluctuations in liquidity and credit spreads over the reported periods,
resulting from continued uncertainty over the economic impacts related to COVID-19. See discussion under Quantitative
Information about Unobservable Inputs above for more information.
Separate Accounts
Accounting policy. Separate account assets and liabilities are contractholder funds maintained in accounts with specific investment
objectives. The assets of these accounts are legally segregated and are not subject to claims that arise out of any of the Company’s
other businesses. These separate account assets are carried at fair value with equal amounts recorded for related separate account
liabilities. The investment income and fair value gains and losses of separate account assets generally accrue directly to the
contractholders and, together with their deposits and withdrawals, are excluded from the Company’s Consolidated Statements of
Income and Cash Flows. Fees and charges earned for mortality risks, asset management or administrative services are reported in
either Premiums or Fees and other revenues. Investments that are measured using the practical expedient of NAV are excluded from
the fair value hierarchy.
Fair values of separate account assets at December 31 were as follows:
(In millions)Quoted Prices in Active
Markets for Identical Assets
(Level 1)Significant Other
Observable Inputs
(Level 2)Significant Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Guaranteed separate accounts
(See Note 21) $ 226 $ 219 $ 297 $ 271 $ — $ — $ 523 $ 490 
Non-guaranteed separate
accounts 1,925 1,450 5,600 5,522 355 263 7,880 7,235 
Subtotal $ 2,151 $ 1,669 $ 5,897 $ 5,793 $ 355 $ 263 8,403 7,725 
Non-guaranteed separate
accounts priced at NAV as a
practical expedient 683 756 
Total 8,481 
Separate account assets of
business classified as held for
sale (16)
Separate account assets per
Consolidated Balance Sheets $ 9,086 $ 8,465 
(1)Non-guaranteed separate accounts included $4.2 billion as of December 31, 2020 and $4.0 billion as of December 31, 2019 in assets supporting the Company’s
pension plans, including $0.3 billion classified in Level 3 as of December 31, 2020 and $0.2 billion classified in Level 3 as of December 31, 2019.
Separate account assets classified as Level 1 primarily include exchange-listed equity securities. Level 2 assets primarily include:
•corporate and structured bonds valued using recent trades of similar securities or pricing models that discount future cash flows
at estimated market interest rates as described above; and
•actively-traded institutional and retail mutual fund investments.
Separate account assets classified in Level 3 primarily support Cigna’s pension plans and include certain newly-issued, privately-
placed, complex, or illiquid securities that are priced using methods discussed above, as well as commercial mortgage loans.
Activity, including transfers into and out of Level 3, was not material in 2020 or 2019. (1)
(1)
119
Separate account investments in securities partnerships, real estate and hedge funds are generally valued based on the separate
account’s ownership share of the equity of the investee (NAV as a practical expedient) including changes in the fair values of its
underlying investments. Substantially all of these assets support the Cigna Pension Plans. The following table provides additional
information on these investments.
Fair Value as ofUnfunded
Commitment as of
December 31, 2020Redemption Frequency
(if currently eligible)Redemption Notice
Period (In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Securities partnerships $ 463 $ 531 $ 272 Not applicable Not applicable
Real estate funds 215 220 — Quarterly 30 - 90 days
Hedge funds 5 5 — Up to annually, varying by
fund 30 - 90 days
Total $ 683 $ 756 $ 272 
As of December 31, 2020, the Company does not have plans to sell any of these assets at less than fair value. These investments are
structured to satisfy longer-term investment objectives. Securities partnerships are contractually non-redeemable, and the underlying
investment assets are expected to be liquidated by the fund managers within ten years after inception.
B.Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value under Certain Conditions
Some financial assets and liabilities are not carried at fair value each reporting period, but may be measured using fair value only
under certain conditions such as when investments become impaired, including investment real estate and commercial mortgage
loans and certain equity securities with no readily determinable fair value. For 2020 and 2019, there were no such impairments.
Equity securities with no readily determinable fair value are also measured at fair value when there are observable price changes
from orderly transactions with the same issuer. There were $75 million in 2020 and $22 million in 2019 of realized investment gains
relating to price changes for equity securities with no readily determinable fair value. Carrying values represented less than 1% of
total investments as of both 2020 and 2019.
C.Fair Value Disclosures for Financial Instruments Not Carried at Fair Value
The following table includes the Company’s financial instruments not recorded at fair value that are subject to fair value disclosure
requirements at December 31, 2020 and 2019. In addition to universal life products and finance leases, financial instruments that are
carried in the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements at amounts that approximate fair value are excluded from the following
table.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(In millions)Classification in
Fair Value
Hierarchy Fair ValueCarrying
Value Fair ValueCarrying
Value
Commercial mortgage loans Level 3 $ 1,456 $ 1,419 $ 1,989 $ 1,947 
Long-term debt, including current maturities, excluding finance leases Level 2 $ 37,676 $ 31,835 $ 39,439 $ 36,375 
Off-balance sheet financial instruments include commitments to purchase debt securities or fund commercial mortgage loans at fixed
rates of interest. The fair values of off-balance sheet financial instruments were not material as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Note 13 – Variable Interest Entities
When the Company becomes involved with a variable interest entity and when there is a change in the Company’s involvement with
an entity, the Company must determine if it is the primary beneficiary and must consolidate the entity. The Company is considered
the primary beneficiary if it has the power to direct the entity’s most significant economic activities and has the right to receive
benefits or obligation to absorb losses that could be significant to the entity. The Company evaluates the following criteria:
•the structure and purpose of the entity;
•the risks and rewards created by, and shared through, the entity; and
•the Company’s ability to direct its activities, receive its benefits and absorb its losses relative to the other parties involved with
the entity including its sponsors, equity holders, guarantors, creditors and servicers.
120
The Company determined it was not a primary beneficiary in any material variable interest entities as of December 31, 2020 or
December 31, 2019. The Company’s involvement in variable interest entities for which it is not the primary beneficiary is described
below.
Securities limited partnerships and real estate limited partnerships. The Company owns interests in securities limited partnerships
and real estate limited partnerships that are defined as unconsolidated variable interest entities. These partnerships invest in the
equity or mezzanine debt of privately-held companies and real estate properties. General partners unaffiliated with the Company
control decisions that most significantly impact the partnership’s operations and the limited partners do not have substantive kick-out
or participating rights. The Company’s investments in approximately 150 limited partnerships that have a carrying value of $2.1
billion as of December 31, 2020 and are reported in Long-term investments. We have commitments to contribute an additional $1.9
billion to these entities. The Company's maximum exposure to loss from these investments is $4.0 billion, calculated as the sum of
our carrying value and the additional funding commitments. Our noncontrolling interest in each of these limited partnerships is
generally less than 15% of the partnership ownership interests. See Note 11 for further information on the Company's accounting
policy for long-term investments.
Other asset-backed and corporate securities. In the normal course of its investing activities, the Company also makes passive
investments in certain asset-backed and corporate securities that are issued by variable interest entities whose sponsors or issuers are
unaffiliated with the Company. These investments provide the Company fixed-rate cash flows and are accounted for as debt
securities. As of December 31, 2020 the carrying value of these investments is $0.5 billion, which represents the Company's
maximum exposure related to these instruments. Our combined ownership interests are insignificant relative to the total principal
amounts issued by these entities. See Note 11 for further information on the Company's accounting policy for debt securities.
The Company is involved in other types of variable interest entities, including real estate joint ventures that develop properties for
residential and commercial use, independent physician associations (IPAs) that provide care management services and international
healthcare joint ventures. The carrying values and maximum exposures for each of these types of unconsolidated variable interest
entities was not material as of December 31, 2020.
The Company has not provided, and does not intend to provide, financial support to any of the variable interest entities in excess of
its maximum exposure. We perform ongoing qualitative analyses of our involvement with these variable interest entities to determine
if consolidation is required.
121
Note 14 – Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) (“AOCI”)
AOCI includes unrealized appreciation on securities and derivatives (excluding appreciation on investments supporting future policy
benefit liabilities of the run-off settlement annuity business) (See Note 11), foreign currency translation and the net postretirement
benefits liability adjustment. AOCI includes the Company’s share from unconsolidated entities reported on the equity method.
Generally, tax effects in AOCI are established at the currently enacted tax rate and reclassified to net income in the same period that
the related pre-tax AOCI reclassifications are recognized. Changes in the components of AOCI were as follows:
For the Years Ended December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Securities and Derivatives
Beginning balance $ 975 $ 18 $ 328 
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to U.S. tax reform legislation — — 65 
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to new financial instruments guidance — — (4)
Reclassification adjustment from retained earnings related to new hedging guidance — — (6)
Adjusted beginning balance 975 18 383 
Appreciation (depreciation) on securities and derivatives 776 1,266 (512)
Tax (expense) benefit (150) (270) 100 
Net appreciation (depreciation) on securities and derivatives 626 996 (412)
Reclassification adjustment for (gains) included in shareholders' net income ((gain) loss on sale of
business) (862) — — 
Reclassification adjustment for (gains) losses included in shareholders' net income (net realized investment
(gains) losses) (26) (49) 60 
Reclassification adjustment for tax expense (benefit) included in shareholders’ net income 187 10 (13)
Net (gains) losses reclassified from AOCI to net income (701) (39) 47 
Other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax (75) 957 (365)
Ending balance $ 900 $ 975 $ 18 
Translation of foreign currencies
Beginning balance $ (275)$ (221)$ (65)
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to U.S. tax reform legislation — — (4)
Adjusted beginning balance (275) (221) (69)
Translation of foreign currencies 232 (57) (167)
Tax (expense) benefit 12 (2) — 
Net translation of foreign currencies 244 (59) (167)
Reclassification adjustment for losses included in shareholders' net income ((gain) loss on sale of business) 11 — — 
Reclassification adjustment for tax expense (benefit) included in shareholders’ net income (3) — — 
Net translation losses reclassified from AOCI to net income 8 — — 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 252 (59) (167)
Less: Net translation gain (loss) on foreign currencies attributable to noncontrolling interests (8) (5) (15)
Shareholders' other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 260 (54) (152)
Ending balance $ (15)$ (275)$ (221)
Postretirement benefits liability
Beginning balance $ (1,641)$ (1,508)$ (1,345)
Reclassification adjustment to retained earnings related to U.S. tax reform legislation — — (290)
Adjusted beginning balance (1,641) (1,508) (1,635)
Reclassification adjustment for amortization of net prior actuarial losses and prior service costs (interest
expense and other) 70 62 69 
Reclassification adjustment for settlement (interest expense and other) — 10 — 
Reclassification adjustment for tax expense (benefit) included in shareholders’ net income (17) (15) (15)
Net adjustments reclassified from AOCI to net income 53 57 54 
Valuation update (206) (249) 93 
Tax (expense) benefit 48 59 (20)
Net change due to valuation update (158) (190) 73 
Other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax (105) (133) 127 
Ending balance $ (1,746)$ (1,641)$ (1,508)
122
Note 15 – Pension
A.About Our Plans
The Company sponsors U.S. and non-U.S. defined benefit pension plans; future benefit accruals for the domestic plans are frozen.
 Accounting policy. The Company measures the assets and liabilities of its domestic pension plans as of December 31. Benefit
obligations are measured at the present value of estimated future payments based on actuarial assumptions. The Company uses the
“corridor” method to account for changes in the benefit obligation when actual results differ from those assumed, or when
assumptions change. These changes are called net unrecognized actuarial gains (losses). Under the corridor method, net
unrecognized actuarial gains (losses) are initially recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income. When the unrecognized gain
(loss) exceeds 10% of the benefit obligation, that excess is amortized to expense over the expected remaining lives of plan
participants. The net plan expense is reported in Interest expense and other in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
For balance sheet purposes, we measure plan assets at fair value. When the actual return differs from the expected return, those
differences are reflected in the net unrealized actuarial gain (loss) discussed above. However, to measure pension benefit costs, we
use a “market-related” asset valuation that differs from the actual fair value for domestic pension plan assets invested in non-fixed
income investments. The “market-related” value recognizes the difference between actual and expected long-term returns in the
portfolio over five years, a method that reduces the short-term impact of market fluctuations on pension costs. The market-related
asset value was approximately $4.4 billion, compared with a fair value of approximately $4.6 billion at December 31, 2020.
B.Funded Status and Amounts Included in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
The following table summarizes the projected benefit obligations and assets related to our U.S. and non-U.S. pension plans as of, and
for the years ended December 31:
 Pension Benefits
(In millions) 2020 2019
Change in benefit obligation
Benefit obligation, January 1 $ 5,314 $ 4,741 
Service cost 2 2 
Interest cost 168 194 
Litigation settlement — 142 
Actuarial losses, net 416 574 
Benefits paid from plan assets (285) (325)
Benefits paid — other (15) (14)
Benefit obligation, December 31 5,600 5,314 
Change in plan assets
Fair value of plan assets, January 1 4,441 4,151 
Actual return on plan assets 449 594 
Benefits paid (285) (325)
Contributions 18 21 
Fair value of plan assets, December 31 4,623 4,441 
Funded status $ (977)$ (873)
Liability in Consolidated Balance Sheets
Accrued expenses and other liabilities $ (15)$ (18)
Other non-current liabilities $ (962)$ (855)
(1)2020 Loss reflects a decrease in the discount rate, partially offset by a favorable change in the mortality assumption; 2019 loss reflects a decrease in the discount
rate and an unfavorable change in the mortality assumption.
We fund our qualified pension plans at least at the minimum amount required by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974 and the Pension Protection Act of 2006. The Company made immaterial contributions to the qualified pension plans in 2020.
For 2021, contributions to the qualified pension plans are expected to be immaterial. Future years’ contributions will ultimately be
based on a wide range of factors including but not limited to asset returns, discount rates and funding targets. Non-qualified pension
and other postretirement benefit plans are generally funded on a pay-as-you-go basis as there are no plan assets for these plans.(1)
123
Benefit payments. The following benefit payments are expected to be paid in:
(In millions)Pension
Benefits
2021 $ 328 
2022 $ 313 
2023 $ 316 
2024 $ 316 
2025 $ 315 
2026-2030 $ 1,551 
Amounts reflected in the pension liabilities shown above that have not yet been reported in net income and, therefore, have been
included in Accumulated other comprehensive loss consisted of the following as of December 31:
 Pension Benefits
(In millions) 2020 2019
Unrecognized net (losses) $ (2,277)$ (2,132)
Unrecognized prior service cost (5) (5)
Postretirement benefits liability adjustment $ (2,282)$ (2,137)
C.Cost of Our Plans
Net pension cost was as follows:
 Pension Benefits
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Service cost $ 2 $ 2 $ 3 
Interest cost 168 194 169 
Expected long-term return on plan assets (260) (245) (257)
Amortization of:
Prior actuarial losses, net 78 59 70 
Prior service cost — — — 
Litigation settlement - plan amendment — 142 32 
Settlement loss — 10 — 
Net (benefit) cost $ (12)$ 162 $ 17 
Old Cigna and the Cigna Pension Plan (the “Plan”) were defendants in a class action lawsuit related to the Plan’s conversion of
certain employees from an annuity to a cash balance benefit in 1997. In the fourth quarter of 2018, the Plan was ordered to pay $32
million representing the attorney fee portion of the settlement. This payment was recognized as an expense in 2018. In the first
quarter of 2019, the Plan implemented the court order resulting in an increase to the pension liability of $142 million. The Company
reversed a litigation reserve for the expenses recognized for this matter in both 2019 and 2018 aggregating to the same amount
resulting in no impact on net income.
D.Assumptions Used for Pension
 2020 2019
Discount rate:
Pension benefit obligation 2.49 % 3.30 %
Pension benefit cost 3.30 % 4.23 %
Expected long-term return on plan assets:
Pension benefit cost 6.75 % 6.75 %
Mortality table for pension obligationsWhite Collar mortality table
with MP 2020 projection scaleWhite Collar mortality table with
MP 2019 projection scale
124
The Company develops discount rates by applying actual annualized yields for high quality bonds by duration to the expected
pension plan liability cash flows. The bond yields represent a diverse mix of actively traded high quality fixed-income securities that
have an above average return at each duration as management believes this approach is representative of the yield achieved through
plan asset investment strategy.
The expected long-term return on plan assets was developed considering historical long-term actual returns, expected long-term
market conditions, plan asset mix and management's plan asset investment strategy.
E.Pension Plan Assets
As of December 31, 2020, pension assets included $4.2 billion invested in the separate accounts of Connecticut General Life
Insurance Company, a subsidiary of the Company, as well as an additional $0.4 billion, primarily invested directly in funds offered
by an unaffiliated insurance company.
The fair values of pension assets by category are as follows as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
(In millions) 2020 2019
Debt securities:
Federal government and agency $ 9 $ — 
Corporate 1,680 1,906 
Asset-backed 53 41 
Fund investments 380 460 
Total debt securities 2,122 2,407 
Equity securities:
Domestic 978 582 
International, including funds and pooled separate accounts 471 419 
Total equity securities 1,449 1,001 
Securities partnerships 463 531 
Real estate funds, including pooled separate accounts 219 230 
Commercial mortgage loans 95 96 
Hedge funds 1 24 
Guaranteed deposit account contract 98 100 
Cash equivalents and other current assets, net 176 52 
Total pension assets at fair value $ 4,623 $ 4,441 
(1)A pooled separate account has several participating benefit plans and each owns a share of the total pool of investments.
The Company’s current target investment allocation percentages (50% fixed income, 33% public equity securities and 17% in other
investments, including private equity (securities partnerships) and real estate) are developed by management as guidelines, although
the fair values of each asset category are expected to vary as a result of changes in market conditions. The Company will evaluate
further allocation changes to equity securities, other investments and fixed income securities as funding levels change.
See Note 12 for further details regarding how fair value is determined, including the level within the fair value hierarchy and the
procedures we use to validate fair value measurements. The Company classifies substantially all debt securities in Level 2 for
pension plan assets. These assets are valued using recent trades of similar securities or are fund investments priced using their daily
net asset value that is the exit price. A substantial portion of domestic equity securities within pension assets are classified as Level 1,
while international equity funds within pension assets are predominantly classified in Level 2 using daily net asset value.
Securities partnerships, real estate and hedge funds are valued using NAV as a practical expedient and are excluded from the fair
value hierarchy. See Note 12 for additional disclosures related to these assets invested in the separate accounts of the Company’s
subsidiaries. Certain securities as described in Note 12, as well as commercial mortgage loans and guaranteed deposit account
contracts, are classified in Level 3 because unobservable inputs used in their valuation are significant. (1)
 (1)
125
F.401(k) Plans
The Company sponsors a 401(k) plan in which the Company matches a portion of employees’ pre-tax contributions. Participants in
the plan may invest in various funds that invest in the Company’s common stock, several diversified stock funds, a bond fund or a
fixed-income fund.
The Company may elect to increase its matching contributions if the Company’s annual performance meets certain targets. The
Company’s annual expense for these plans was as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Expense $ 243 $ 256 $ 196 
126
Note 16 – Employee Incentive Plans
A.About Our Plans
The People Resources Committee (the “Committee”) of the Board of Directors awards stock options, restricted stock grants,
restricted stock units, deferred stock and strategic performance shares to certain employees.
Prior to the acquisition of Express Scripts, the Company issued shares from Treasury stock for these awards. Following the
acquisition, original issue shares were used.
Awards of Express Scripts options and restricted stock units were rolled over to Cigna stock options and restricted stock units in
connection with the Express Scripts acquisition on December 20, 2018. Information in this footnote includes the effect of the
Express Scripts rollover awards unless otherwise indicated.
The Company records compensation expense for stock and option awards over their vesting periods primarily based on the estimated
fair value at the grant date. Fair value is determined differently for each type of award as discussed below.
Shares of common stock available for award at December 31, were as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Common shares available for award 20.6 23.2 25.7 
B.Stock Options
Accounting policy. The Company awards options to purchase Cigna common stock at the market price of the stock on the grant date
except for rollover option awards issued to Express Scripts employees in connection with the acquisition. Options vest over periods
ranging from one year to three years and expire no later than 10 years from grant date. Fair value is estimated using the Black-
Scholes option-pricing model by applying the assumptions presented below. That fair value is reduced by options expected to be
forfeited during the vesting period. The Company estimates forfeitures at the grant date based on our experience and adjusts the
expense to reflect actual forfeitures over the vesting period. The fair value of options, net of forfeitures, is recognized in Selling,
general and administrative expenses on a straight-line basis over the vesting period.
Black-Scholes option-pricing model assumptions and the resulting fair value of options are presented in the following table. The
average fair value of options and the expected option life exclude the rollover options granted to Express Scripts employees in
connection with the acquisition.
 2020 2019 2018
Dividend yield — % — % — %
Expected volatility 30.0 % 30.0 % 35.0 %
Risk-free interest rate 1.4 % 2.5 % 2.5 %
Expected option life 4.5 years 4.4 years 4.4 years
Weighted average fair value of options $ 52.42 $ 53.10 $ 64.18 
The expected volatility reflects the past daily stock price volatility of Cigna stock. The Company does not consider volatility implied
in the market prices of traded options to be a good indicator of future volatility because remaining traded options will expire within
one year. The risk-free interest rate is derived using the four-year U.S. Treasury bond yield rate as of the award date for the primary
annual grant. Expected option life reflects the Company’s historical experience.
127
The following table shows the status of, and changes in, common stock options during the last three years.
(Options in thousands) 2020 2019 2018
 OptionsWeighted
Average
Exercise Price OptionsWeighted
Average
Exercise Price OptionsWeighted
Average
Exercise Price
Outstanding - January 1 11,438 $ 136.19 12,370 $ 125.46 6,156 $ 100.79 
Granted 1,851 $ 191.86 1,569 $ 183.41 7,080 $ 143.62 
Exercised (3,289)$ 115.38 (2,297)$ 106.75 (771)$ 88.35 
Expired or canceled (258)$ 188.79 (204)$ 180.08 (95)$ 165.04 
Outstanding - December 31 9,742 $ 152.40 11,438 $ 136.19 12,370 $ 125.46 
Options exercisable at year-end 6,837 $ 137.08 8,874 $ 123.87 9,446 $ 114.22 
Compensation expense of $66 million related to unvested stock options at December 31, 2020 will be recognized over the next two
years (weighted average period).
The table below summarizes information for stock options exercised during the last three years:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 304 $ 180 $ 86 
Cash received for options exercised $ 376 $ 224 $ 68 
Tax benefit from options exercised $ 57 $ 34 $ 8 
The following table summarizes information for outstanding common stock options at December 31, 2020:
 Options
OutstandingOptions
Exercisable
Number (in thousands) 9,742 6,837 
Total intrinsic value (in millions) $ 543 $ 486 
Weighted average exercise price $ 152.40 $ 137.08 
Weighted average remaining contractual life 5.8 years 4.6 years
C.Restricted Stock
The Company awards restricted stock (grants and units) to the Company’s employees that vest over periods ranging from one to
three years. Recipients of restricted stock awards accumulate dividends during the vesting period, but forfeit their awards and
accumulated dividends if their employment terminates before the vesting date.
Accounting policy. Fair value of restricted stock awards is equal to the market price of Cigna’s common stock on the date of grant.
This fair value is reduced by awards that are expected to forfeit. At the grant date, the Company estimates forfeitures based on
experience and adjusts the expense to reflect actual forfeitures over the vesting period. This fair value, net of forfeitures, is
recognized in Selling, general and administrative expenses over the vesting period on a straight-line basis.
The following table shows the status of, and changes in, restricted stock awards during the last three years.
(Awards in thousands) 2020 2019 2018
 Grants/UnitsWeighted
Average Fair
Value at
Award Date Grants/UnitsWeighted
Average Fair
Value at
Award Date Grants/UnitsWeighted
Average Fair
Value at
Award Date
Outstanding - January 1 1,945 $ 178.78 2,138 $ 168.12 1,295 $ 126.44 
Awarded 791 $ 191.22 870 $ 183.86 1,451 $ 183.29 
Vested (1,026)$ 161.58 (964)$ 160.74 (560)$ 112.53 
Forfeited (110)$ 186.63 (99)$ 168.68 (48)$ 150.84 
Outstanding - December 31 1,600 $ 186.12 1,945 $ 178.78 2,138 $ 168.12 
128
The fair value of vested restricted stock at the vesting date for the years ended December 31 was as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Fair value of vested restricted stock $ 190 $ 171 $ 107 
Approximately 10,300 employees held 1.6 million restricted stock awards at the end of 2020 with $152 million of related
compensation expense to be recognized over the next two years (weighted average period).
D.Strategic Performance Shares (“SPS”)
The Company awards SPSs to executives and certain other key employees generally with a performance period of three years. Half
of these shares are subject to a market condition (total shareholder return relative to industry peer companies) and half are subject to
a performance condition (cumulative adjusted net income). These targets are set by the Committee at the beginning of the
performance period. Holders of these awards receive shares of Cigna common stock at the end of the performance period ranging
anywhere from 0 to 200% of the original awards.
Accounting policy. Compensation expense for SPSs is recorded over the performance period. Fair value is determined at the grant
date for “market condition” SPSs using a Monte Carlo simulation model and not subsequently adjusted regardless of the final
outcome. Expense is initially accrued for “performance condition” SPSs based on the most likely outcome, but evaluated for
adjustment each period for updates in the expected outcome. Expense is adjusted to the actual outcome (number of shares awarded
times the share price at the grant date) at the end of the performance period.
The following table shows the status of, and changes in, SPSs during the last three years:
 2020 2019 2018
(Awards in thousands) SharesWeighted
Average Fair
Value at
Award Date SharesWeighted
Average Fair
Value at
Award Date SharesWeighted
Average Fair
Value at
Award Date
Outstanding - January 1 818 $ 177.94 707 $ 160.74 778 $ 136.57 
Awarded 362 $ 191.52 389 $ 184.72 221 $ 197.51 
Vested (309)$ 159.67 (244)$ 139.27 (269)$ 121.57 
Forfeited (63)$ 187.76 (34)$ 178.98 (23)$ 158.16 
Outstanding - December 31 808 $ 190.02 818 $ 177.94 707 $ 160.74 
The fair value of vested SPSs at the vesting date for the years ended December 31 was as follows:
 2020 2019 2018
(Shares in thousands; $ in millions) Shares Fair Value Shares Fair Value Shares Fair Value
Shares of Cigna common stock distributed upon SPS vesting 306 $ 55 254 $ 45 380 $ 73 
Approximately 1,500 employees held 808,000 SPSs at the end of 2020 and $63 million of related compensation expense is expected
to be recognized over the next two years. The amount of expense for “performance condition” SPSs will vary based on actual
performance in 2021 and 2022.
E.Compensation Cost and Tax Effects of Share-based Compensation
The Company records tax benefits in shareholders’ net income during the vesting period based on the amount of expense being
recognized. The difference between tax benefits based on the expense and the actual tax benefit realized are also recorded in net
income when stock options are exercised, or when restricted stock and SPSs vest.
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total compensation cost for shared-based awards $ 289 $ 299 $ 180 
Tax benefits recognized $ 63 $ 59 $ 36 
129
Note 17 – Goodwill, Other Intangibles and Property and Equipment
A.Goodwill
Accounting policy. Goodwill represents the excess of the cost of businesses acquired over the fair value of their net assets. The
resulting goodwill is assigned to those reporting units expected to realize cash flows from the acquisition, based on those reporting
units’ relative fair values. As a result, goodwill is primarily reported in the Evernorth segment ($33.8 billion), the U.S. Medical
segment ($10.4 billion) and, to a lesser extent, the International Markets segment ($0.4 billion).
The Company conducts its annual quantitative evaluation for goodwill impairment during the third quarter at the reporting unit level
and writes it down through shareholders’ net income if impaired. On a quarterly basis, the Company performs a qualitative
impairment assessment to determine if events or changes in circumstances indicate that it is more likely than not that the carrying
value of a reporting unit exceeds its estimated fair value. Fair value of a reporting unit is generally estimated based on either a
market approach or a discounted cash flow analysis using assumptions that the Company believes a hypothetical market participant
would use to determine a current transaction price. The significant assumptions and estimates used in determining fair value include
the discount rate and future cash flows. A discount rate is selected to correspond with each reporting unit’s weighted average cost of
capital, consistent with that used for investment decisions considering the specific and detailed operating plans and strategies within
that reporting unit. Projections of future cash flows for each reporting unit are consistent with our annual planning process for
revenues, pharmacy costs, benefits expenses, operating expenses, taxes, capital levels and long-term growth rates.
Goodwill activity. Goodwill activity during 2020 and 2019 was as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019
Balance at January 1, $ 44,602 $ 44,505 
Goodwill acquired, net 29 103 
Impact of foreign currency translation 17 (6)
Balance at December 31, $ 44,648 $ 44,602 
B.Other Intangibles
Accounting policy. The Company’s other intangible assets primarily include purchased customer and producer relationships,
provider networks and trademarks. The fair value of purchased customer relationships and the amortization method were determined
as of the dates of purchase using an income approach that relies on projected future net cash flows including key assumptions for
customer attrition and discount rates. The Company’s definite-lived intangible assets are amortized on an accelerated or straight-line
basis, reflecting their pattern of economic benefits, over periods from three to 39 years. Management revises amortization periods if
it believes there has been a change in the length of time that an intangible asset will continue to have value. Costs incurred to renew
or extend the terms of these intangible assets are generally expensed as incurred.
The Company’s amortized intangible assets are tested for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amount may not be recoverable. If the total of the expected future undiscounted cash flows generated by the underlying
asset group is less than the carrying amount of the asset group, the Company recognizes an impairment charge equal to the difference
between the carrying value of the asset group and its estimated fair value. The Company’s indefinite-lived intangible assets are each
reviewed for impairment at least annually by comparing their fair value with their carrying value. If the carrying value exceeds fair
value, that excess is recognized as an impairment loss.
There were no material impairments in the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 or 2018.
130
Components of other assets, including other intangibles. Other intangible assets were comprised of the following at December 31:
(In millions) CostAccumulated
AmortizationNet Carrying
Value
2020    
Customer relationships $ 29,432 3,024 26,408 
Trade Name - Express Scripts 8,400 8,400 
Other 475 104 371 
Other intangible assets 38,307 3,128 35,179 
Value of business acquired (reported in Deferred policy acquisition costs) 670 152 518 
Total $ 38,977 3,280 35,697 
2019
Customer relationships $ 31,184 3,319 27,865 
Trade Name - Express Scripts 8,400 8,400 
Other 383 86 297 
Other intangible assets 39,967 3,405 36,562 
Value of business acquired (reported in Deferred policy acquisition costs) 643 122 521 
Total $ 40,610 3,527 37,083 
The Company has indefinite-lived intangible assets totaling $8.5 billion at December 31, 2020 and $8.4 billion at December 31,
2019, largely consisting of trade names and licenses.
C.Property and Equipment
Accounting policy. Property and equipment is carried at cost less accumulated depreciation. Cost includes interest, real estate taxes
and other costs incurred during construction when applicable. Internal-use software that is acquired, developed or modified solely to
meet the Company’s internal needs, with no plan to market externally, is also included in this category. Costs directly related to
acquiring, developing or modifying internal-use software are capitalized.
The Company calculates depreciation and amortization principally using the straight-line method generally based on the estimated
useful life of each asset as follows: buildings and improvements, 10 to 40 years; purchased software, three to five years; internally
developed software, three to seven years and furniture and equipment (including computer equipment), three to 10 years.
Improvements to leased facilities are depreciated over the lesser of the remaining lease term or the estimated life of the improvement.
The Company considers events and circumstances that would indicate the carrying value of property, equipment or capitalized
software might not be recoverable. An impairment charge is recorded if the Company determines the carrying value of any of these
assets is not recoverable. The Company also reviews and shortens the estimated useful lives of these assets, if necessary.
Components of property and equipment. Property and equipment was comprised of the following as of December 31:
(In millions) CostAccumulated
AmortizationNet Carrying
Value
2020    
Internal-use software $ 7,061 $ 4,048 $ 3,013 
Other property and equipment 2,719 1,527 1,192 
Total property and equipment $ 9,780 $ 5,575 $ 4,205 
2019
Internal-use software $ 6,578 $ 3,282 $ 3,296 
Other property and equipment 2,569 1,353 1,216 
Total property and equipment 9,147 4,635 4,512 
Property and equipment classified as Assets held for sale (226) (131) (95)
Total property and equipment per Consolidated Balance Sheet $ 8,921 $ 4,504 $ 4,417 
131
Components of depreciation and amortization. Depreciation and amortization expense was comprised of the following for the years
ended December 31:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Internal-use software $ 971 $ 850 $ 323 
Other property and equipment 276 284 146 
Value of business acquired (reported in deferred policy acquisition costs) 28 34 16 
Other intangibles 1,527 2,483 210 
Total depreciation and amortization $ 2,802 $ 3,651 $ 695 
The Company estimates annual pre-tax amortization for intangible assets, including internal-use software, over the next five calendar
years to be as follows:
(In millions)Pre-tax
Amortization
2021 $ 2,719 
2022 $ 2,236 
2023 $ 2,014 
2024 $ 1,821 
2025 $ 1,760 
Note 18 – Leases
Cigna adopted ASU 2016-2, Leases, as of January 1, 2019. As permitted by the standard, the Company did not restate its
Consolidated Financial Statements for periods prior to the adoption date and the required disclosures presented below are prospective
from the date of adoption. The Company’s leases are primarily for office space and certain computer and other equipment, and have
terms of up to 34 years.
Accounting policy. The Company determines if an arrangement is a lease and its lease classification (operating or finance) at
inception. Beginning in the first quarter of 2019, both operating and finance leases result in (1) a right-of-use (“ROU”) asset that
represents our right to use the underlying asset for the lease term and (2) a lease liability that represents our obligation to make lease
payments arising from the lease. ROU assets and lease liabilities are reflected in the following lines in the Company’s Consolidated
Balance Sheet:
  ROU Asset  Current Lease Liability  Non-Current Lease Liability
Operating lease  Other assets  Accrued expenses and other liabilities
(current) Other liabilities (non-current)
Finance lease  Property and equipment  Short-term debt  Long-term debt
These lease assets and liabilities are recognized at the lease commencement date based on the present value of the lease payments
over the lease term. Most of the Company’s leases do not provide an implicit rate, so the Company uses its incremental borrowing
rate based on the information available at commencement date in determining the present value of lease payments. The ROU asset
also includes any lease pre-payments made and excludes lease incentives for operating leases. The Company’s expected life of a
lease may consider options to extend or terminate a lease when it is reasonably certain that the Company will exercise that option.
The Company has lease agreements with lease and non-lease components that are accounted for as a single lease component.
Variable lease payments are expensed as incurred and represent amounts that are neither fixed in nature, such as maintenance and
other services provided by the lessor, nor tied to an index or rate.
132
The components of lease expense were as follows:
For the Years Ended December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019
Operating lease cost $ 190 $ 188 
Finance lease cost:
Amortization of ROU assets 28 28 
Interest on lease liabilities 3 3 
Total finance lease cost 31 31 
Variable lease cost 48 50 
Total lease cost $ 269 $ 269 
Rental expense under operating lease agreements was $162 million for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Supplemental cash flow information related to leases was as follows:
For the Years Ended December 31,
(In millions) 2020 2019
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities:
Operating cash outflows from operating leases $ 189 $ 173 
Operating cash outflows from finance leases $ 3 $ 3 
Financing cash outflows from finance leases $ 26 $ 25 
 
ROU assets obtained in exchange for lease obligations:
Operating leases $ 189 $ 89 
Finance leases $ 9 $ 68 
The non-cash impact of adopting the new lease guidance in 2019 was an increase of Other assets of $615 million and an increase to
Accrued expenses and other liabilities of $630 million.
Operating and finance lease ROU assets and lease liabilities were as follows:
(In millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Operating leases:
Operating lease ROU assets $ 552 $ 536 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities $ 152 $ 166 
Other non-current liabilities 491 465 
Total operating lease liabilities $ 643 $ 631 
Finance leases:
Property and equipment, gross $ 98 $ 110 
Accumulated depreciation (46) (23)
Property and equipment, net $ 52 $ 87 
Short-term debt $ 18 $ 27 
Long-term debt 36 61 
Total finance lease liabilities $ 54 $ 88 
133
As of December 31, 2020, the weighted average remaining lease term was five years for operating leases and four years for finance
leases, and the weighted average discount rate was 3.51% for operating leases and 3.95% for finance leases.
Maturities of lease liabilities as of December 31, 2020 were as follows:
(In millions)Operating
Leases Finance Leases
2021 $ 150 $ 20 
2022 170 18 
2023 118 6 
2024 89 3 
2025 57 3 
Thereafter 121 10 
Total lease payments 705 60 
Less: imputed interest 62 6 
Total $ 643 $ 54 
Note 19 – Shareholders' Equity and Dividend Restrictions
State insurance departments and foreign jurisdictions that regulate certain of the Company’s subsidiaries prescribe accounting
practices (differing in some respects from GAAP) to determine statutory net income and surplus. The Company’s life, accident and
health insurance and Health Maintenance Organization (“HMO”) subsidiaries are regulated by such statutory requirements. The
statutory net income of the Company’s life, accident and health insurance and HMO subsidiaries for the years ended, and their
statutory surplus as of December 31, were as follows:
(In billions) 2020 2019 2018
Net income $ 4.0 $ 3.8 $ 3.4 
Surplus $ 12.9 $ 13.8 $ 12.2 
The Company’s HMO and life, accident and health insurance subsidiaries are also subject to minimum statutory surplus
requirements and may be required to maintain investments on deposit with state departments of insurance or other regulatory bodies.
Additionally, these subsidiaries may be subject to regulatory restrictions on the amount of annual dividends or other distributions
(such as loans or cash advances) that insurance companies may extend to their parent companies without prior approval. As of
December 31, 2020, these amounts, including restricted GAAP net assets of the Company’s subsidiaries, were as follows:
(In billions) 2020
Minimum statutory surplus required by regulators $ 4.9 
Investments on deposit with regulatory bodies $ 0.4 
Maximum dividend distributions permitted in 2021 without regulatory approval $ 2.5 
Maximum loans to the parent company permitted without regulatory approval $ 0.8 
Restricted GAAP net assets of Cigna Corporation's subsidiaries $ 13.5 
Permitted practices used by the Company’s insurance subsidiaries in 2020 that differed from prescribed regulatory accounting had an
immaterial impact on statutory surplus.
Note 20 – Income Taxes
Accounting policy. Deferred income taxes are reflected in the Consolidated Balance Sheets for differences between the financial and
income tax reporting bases of the Company’s underlying assets and liabilities, and established based upon enacted tax rates and laws.
Deferred income tax assets are recognized when available evidence indicates that realization is more likely than not, and a valuation
allowance is established to the extent this standard is not met. The deferred income tax provision generally represents the net change
in deferred income tax assets and liabilities during the reporting period excluding adjustments to accumulated other comprehensive
income or amounts recorded in connection with a business combination. The current income tax provision generally represents
estimated amounts due on income tax returns for the year reported to various jurisdictions plus the effect of any uncertain tax
positions. The Company recognizes a liability for uncertain tax positions if management believes the probability that the positions
will be sustained is 50% or less. For uncertain positions that management believes are more likely than not to be sustained, the
Company recognizes a liability based upon management's estimate of the most likely settlement outcome with the taxing authority.
The
134
liabilities for uncertain tax positions are classified as current when the position is expected to be settled within 12 months or the
statute of limitation expires within 12 months.
Income taxes attributable to the Company’s foreign operations are generally provided using the respective foreign jurisdictions’ tax
rate.
The liquidity and regulatory capital requirements of our foreign operations and certain international growth initiatives are supported
by retaining overseas a significant portion of the earnings generated by our foreign operations. This strategy does not materially limit
Cigna's ability to meet the Company's liquidity and capital needs in the United States. The Company generally does not intend to
repatriate these earnings.
A.Income Tax Expense
The components of income taxes for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Current taxes
U.S. income taxes $ 2,128 $ 1,476 $ 804 
Foreign income taxes 334 173 185 
State income taxes 303 114 47 
Total current taxes 2,765 1,763 1,036 
Deferred taxes (benefits)
U.S. income taxes (benefits) (217) (236) (75)
Foreign income taxes 11 16 8 
State income tax (benefits) (180) (93) (34)
Total deferred taxes (benefits) (386) (313) (101)
Total income taxes $ 2,379 $ 1,450 $ 935 
Total income taxes for the years ended December 31 were different from the amount computed using the nominal federal income tax
rate for the following reasons:
 2020 2019 2018
(In millions) $ % $ % $ %
Tax expense at nominal rate $ 2,282 21.0 %$ 1,380 21.0 %$ 752 21.0 %
Effect of U.S. tax reform legislation — — — — (4) (0.1)
Impact of sale of business 104 1.0 — — — — 
Effect of foreign earnings (61) (0.6) 24 0.4 74 2.1 
Health insurance industry tax 93 0.9 — — 78 2.2 
State income tax (net of federal income tax benefit) 24 0.2 32 0.5 10 0.3 
Other (63) (0.6) 14 0.2 25 0.6 
Total income taxes $ 2,379 21.9 %$ 1,450 22.1 %$ 935 26.1 %
Consolidated pre-tax income from the Company’s foreign operations was approximately 14% of the Company’s pre-tax income in
2020, 12% in 2019 and 15% in 2018.
135
B.Deferred Income Taxes
Deferred income tax assets and liabilities as of December 31, were as follows:
(In millions) 2020 2019
Deferred tax assets
Employee and retiree benefit plans $ 477 $ 511 
Other insurance and contractholder liabilities 278 282 
Loss carryforwards 177 260 
Other accrued liabilities 358 183 
Other 209 218 
Deferred tax assets before valuation allowance 1,499 1,454 
Valuation allowance for deferred tax assets (207) (196)
Deferred tax assets, net of valuation allowance 1,292 1,258 
Deferred tax liabilities
Depreciation and amortization 660 630 
Acquisition-related basis differences 8,989 9,386 
Policy acquisition expenses 289 113 
Unrealized appreciation on investments and foreign currency translation 171 223 
Other 122 293 
Total deferred tax liabilities 10,231 10,645 
Net deferred income tax (liabilities) assets $ (8,939)$ (9,387)
Management believes that future results will be sufficient to realize a majority of the Company’s gross deferred tax assets. Valuation
allowances are established against deferred tax assets when it is determined that it is more likely than not that the asset will not be
recognized. Valuation allowances have been established against certain federal, state and foreign tax attributes. There are multiple
expiration dates associated with these tax attributes.
C.Uncertain Tax Positions and Other Tax Matters
Reconciliations of unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended December 31 follow:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Balance at January 1, $ 1,018 $ 928 $ 35 
Increase due to prior year positions 128 68 40 
Increase due to business combinations — — 860 
Increase due to current year positions 88 29 6 
Reduction related to settlements with taxing authorities — — (1)
Reduction related to lapse of applicable statute of limitations (24) (7) (12)
Balance at December 31, $ 1,210 $ 1,018 $ 928 
Substantially all unrecognized tax benefits would impact shareholders’ net income if recognized.
The Company classifies net interest expense on uncertain tax positions as a component of income tax expense and in Accrued
expenses and other liabilities on the balance sheet. In addition to the amounts in the table above, the liability for net interest expense
on uncertain tax positions was approximately $127 million as of December 31, 2020, $100 million as of December 31, 2019 and
immaterial for 2018.
D.Other Tax Matters
The statute of limitations for Cigna's consolidated federal income tax returns through 2015 have closed. However, Cigna filed an
amended return for the 2015 tax year, and it is being reviewed by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS). Additionally, the IRS has
opened an examination of Cigna's 2017 return. It is expected that the IRS will add tax years 2016 and 2018 to the existing Cigna
cycle. The IRS has examined Express Scripts’ tax returns for 2010 through 2012, for which there is a significant disputed tax matter,
and is currently examining returns for 2013 through 2017. In addition, the Company has pending refund claims for various years.
136
The Company conducts business in a number of state and foreign jurisdictions and may be engaged in multiple audit proceedings at
any given time. Generally, no further state or foreign audit activity is expected for tax years prior to 2012 for Cigna’s entities and
2006 for Express Scripts’ entities.
Note 21 – Contingencies and Other Matters
The Company, through its subsidiaries, is contingently liable for various guarantees provided in the ordinary course of business.
A.Financial Guarantees: Retiree and Life Insurance Benefits
The Company guarantees that separate account assets will be sufficient to pay certain life insurance or retiree benefits. For the
majority of these benefits, the sponsoring employers are primarily responsible for ensuring that assets are sufficient to pay these
benefits and are required to maintain assets that exceed a certain percentage of benefit obligations. If employers fail to do so, the
Company or an affiliate of the buyer of the retirement benefits business has the right to redirect the management of the related assets
to provide for benefit payments. As of December 31, 2020, employers maintained assets that generally exceeded the benefit
obligations under these arrangements of approximately $450 million. An additional liability is established if management believes
that the Company will be required to make payments under the guarantees; there were no additional liabilities required for these
guarantees, net of reinsurance, as of December 31, 2020. Separate account assets supporting these guarantees are classified in Levels
1 and 2 of the GAAP fair value hierarchy.
The Company does not expect that these financial guarantees will have a material effect on the Company’s consolidated results of
operations, liquidity or financial condition.
B.Certain Other Guarantees
The Company had indemnification obligations as of December 31, 2020 in connection with acquisition and disposition transactions.
These indemnification obligations are triggered by the breach of representations or covenants provided by the Company, such as
representations for the presentation of financial statements, filing of tax returns, compliance with law or identification of outstanding
litigation. These obligations are typically subject to various time limitations, defined by the contract or by operation of law, such as
statutes of limitation. In some cases, the maximum potential amount due is subject to contractual limitations based on a percentage of
the transaction purchase price, while in other cases limitations are not specified or applicable. The Company does not believe that it
is possible to determine the maximum potential amount due under these obligations because not all amounts due under these
indemnification obligations are subject to limitation. There were no liabilities for these indemnification obligations as of
December 31, 2020.
C.Guaranty Fund Assessments
The Company operates in a regulatory environment that may require its participation in assessments under state insurance guaranty
association laws. The Company’s exposure to assessments for certain obligations of insolvent insurance companies to policyholders
and claimants is based on its share of business written in the relevant jurisdictions.
There were no material effects for existing or new guaranty fund assessments for the year ended December 31, 2020.
D.Legal and Regulatory Matters
The Company is routinely involved in numerous claims, lawsuits, regulatory inquiries and audits, government investigations,
including under the federal False Claims Act and state false claims acts initiated by a government investigating body or by a qui tam
relator’s filing of a complaint under court seal, and other legal matters arising, for the most part, in the ordinary course of managing a
global health service business. Additionally, the Company has received and is cooperating with subpoenas or similar processes from
various governmental agencies requesting information, all arising in the normal course of its business. Disputed tax matters arising
from audits by the Internal Revenue Service or other state and foreign jurisdictions, including those resulting in litigation, are
accounted for under GAAP guidance for uncertain tax positions. See Note 20 for additional information on income tax matters.
Pending litigation and legal or regulatory matters that the Company has identified with a reasonably possible material loss and
certain other material litigation matters are described below. For those matters that the Company has identified with a reasonably
possible material loss, the Company provides disclosure in the aggregate of accruals and range of loss, or a statement that such
information cannot be estimated. The Company’s accruals for the matters discussed below under “Litigation Matters” and
“Regulatory Matters” are not material. Due to numerous uncertain factors presented in these cases, it is not possible to estimate an
aggregate range of loss (if any) for these matters at this time. In light of the uncertainties involved in these matters, there is no
assurance that their ultimate
137
resolution will not exceed the amounts currently accrued by the Company. An adverse outcome in one or more of these matters could
be material to the Company’s results of operations, financial condition or liquidity for any particular period. The outcomes of
lawsuits are inherently unpredictable and we may be unsuccessful in these ongoing litigation matters or any future claims or
litigation.
Litigation Matters
Risk Corridors and CSR Litigation with the Federal Government. As a result of a Supreme Court decision in April 2020, the
Company filed suit in early May 2020 against the United States in the U.S. Court of Federal Claims seeking to recover two types of
payments the Federal Government owes Cigna under the risk corridors and cost-sharing reduction (“CSR”) programs of The Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act. In aggregate, the complaint seeks to recover more than $315 million: $120 million in risk
corridors payments and more than $195 million in CSR payments. We received $120 million in payments in September 2020, which
resolved our risk corridors claim. Our claim seeking recovery for CSR payments is stayed until either the Federal Circuit’s
judgments in the CSR appeals become final and non-appealable or the Supreme Court resolves any petition for writ of certiorari.
Cigna Litigation with Anthem. In February 2017, the Company filed suit against Anthem, Inc. in the Delaware Court of Chancery
(the “Chancery Court”) seeking, among other relief, payment of the $1.85 billion reverse termination fee under the parties’ 2015
merger agreement and damages. Anthem countersued, alleging its own claims for damages. A trial was held during the first quarter
of 2019. In August 2020, the Chancery Court issued an opinion finding that, although Cigna breached its contractual obligation to
use reasonable best efforts to support the Anthem/Cigna merger, its actions did not cause the merger to fail. The Court denied claims
by both parties for damages and further denied Cigna’s claim for the reverse termination fee. The Company filed a Notice of Appeal
with the Delaware Supreme Court on October 30, 2020, and seeks reversal of the portion of the Chancery Court’s decision denying
Cigna the reverse termination fee. Briefing on the appeal was completed on January 29, 2021 and oral arguments are scheduled for
April 14, 2021.
Express Scripts Litigation with Anthem. In March 2016, Anthem filed a lawsuit in the United States District Court for the Southern
District of New York alleging various breach of contract claims against Express Scripts relating to the parties’ rights and obligations
under the periodic pricing review section of the pharmacy benefit management agreement between the parties including allegations
that Express Scripts failed to negotiate new pricing concessions in good faith, as well as various alleged service issues. Anthem also
requested that the court enter declaratory judgment that Express Scripts is required to provide Anthem competitive benchmark
pricing, that Anthem can terminate the agreement and that Express Scripts is required to provide Anthem with post-termination
services at competitive benchmark pricing for one year following any termination by Anthem. Anthem claims it is entitled to $13
billion in additional pricing concessions over the remaining term of the agreement, as well as $1.8 billion for one year following any
contract termination by Anthem and $150 million damages for service issues (“Anthem’s Allegations”). On April 19, 2016, in
response to Anthem’s complaint, Express Scripts filed its answer denying Anthem’s Allegations in their entirety and asserting
affirmative defenses and counterclaims against Anthem. The court subsequently granted Anthem’s motion to dismiss two of six
counts of Express Scripts’ amended counterclaims. The current scheduling order runs through the completion of summary judgment
briefing in August 2021. There is no tentative trial date.
Regulatory Matters
Civil Investigative Demand. The U.S. Department of Justice (“DOJ”) is conducting an industry-wide investigation of Medicare
Advantage organizations’ risk adjustment practices under Medicare Parts C and D including medical chart reviews and health exams.
For certain other Medicare Advantage organizations, the investigation has resulted in litigation. The Company is currently
responding to information requests (civil investigative demands) received from the DOJ (U.S. Attorney’s Offices for the Eastern
District of Pennsylvania and the Southern District of New York ("SDNY")). We will continue to cooperate with the DOJ’s
investigation. Additionally, in relation to the SDNY’s pending investigation, a qui tam action that was filed by a relator in the United
States District Court for the Southern District of New York in 2017 was unsealed on August 6, 2020. The action asserts claims
related to risk adjustment practices arising from certain health exams conducted as part of Cigna’s Medicare Advantage business.
The DOJ has not intervened in the case at this time.
Note 22 – Segment Information
See Note 1 for a description of our segments. A description of our basis for reporting segment operating results is outlined below.
Intersegment revenues primarily reflect pharmacy related transactions between the Evernorth and U.S. Medical segments. Effective
with the first quarter of 2019, the Company began allocating compensation cost for stock options to segments. Prior year segment
information was not restated for this change. A description of our basis for reporting segment operating results is outlined below.
The Company uses “pre-tax adjusted income from operations” and “adjusted revenues” as its principal financial measures of
segment operating performance because management believes they best reflect the underlying results of business operations and
permit
138
analysis of trends in underlying revenue, expenses and profitability. Pre-tax adjusted income from operations is defined as income
before taxes excluding realized investment results, amortization of acquired intangible assets, special items and, for periods prior to
2020, earnings contribution from transitioning clients Anthem Inc. and Coventry Health Care, Inc. (the “transitioning clients”). As of
December 31, 2019, the transition of these clients was substantially complete; therefore, beginning in 2020, we no longer exclude
results of transitioning clients from our adjusted revenues and adjusted income from operations. Income or expense amounts that are
excluded from adjusted income from operations because they are not indicative of underlying performance or the responsibility of
operating segment management include:
•Realized investment gains (losses) including changes in market values of certain financial instruments between balance
sheet dates, as well as gains and losses associated with invested asset sales.
•Amortization of acquired intangible assets because these relate to costs incurred for acquisitions.
•Results of transitioning clients, for periods prior to 2020, because those results were not indicative of ongoing results.
•Special items, if any, that management believes are not representative of the underlying results of operations due to the
nature or size of these matters.
The Company does not report total assets by segment because this is not a metric used to allocate resources or evaluate segment
performance.
Adjusted revenues is defined as revenues excluding: 1) revenue contribution from transitioning clients for periods prior to 2020; 2)
the Company’s share of certain realized investment results of its joint ventures reported in the International Markets segment using
the equity method of accounting; and 3) special items, if any.
The following tables present the special items recorded by the Company in 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Three Months Ended
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Description of Special Item Charges (Benefits) and
Financial Statement Line Item(s) After-tax Before-tax After-tax Before-tax After-tax Before-tax
Integration and transaction-related costs:
- Selling, general and administrative expenses $ 404 $ 527 $ 427 $ 552 $ 587 $ 748 
- Interest expense and other — — — — 179 227 
- Net investment income — — — — (97) (123)
Integration and transaction-related costs $ 404 $ 527 $ 427 $ 552 $ 669 $ 852 
Debt extinguishment costs $ 151 $ 199 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Charge for organizational efficiency plan (Selling,
general and administrative expenses) 24 31 162 207 — — 
Charges associated with litigation matters (Selling,
general and administrative expenses) 19 25 41 51 19 25 
Risk corridors recovery (Selling, general and
administrative expenses) (76) (101) — — — — 
Contractual adjustment for a former client (Pharmacy
revenues) (155) (204) — — — — 
(Gain) on sale of business (3,217) (4,203) — — — — 
Charges (benefits) associated with tax reform:
- Selling, general and administrative expenses $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ 2 
- Tax (benefit) — — — — (3) — 
Charges (benefits) associated with tax reform $ — $ — $ — $ — $ (2)$ 2 
Total impact from special items $ (2,850)$ (3,726)$ 630 $ 810 $ 686 $ 879 
139
Summarized segment financial information for the years ended December 31 was as follows:
(In millions) Evernorth U.S. MedicalInternational
MarketsGroup
Disability and
OtherCorporate and
Eliminations Total
2020
Revenues from external customers $ 112,647 $ 36,027 $ 5,853 $ 4,630 $ — $ 159,157 
Inter-segment revenues 3,655 1,977 — 23 (5,655)
Net investment income 32 447 154 611 — 1,244 
Total revenues $ 116,334 $ 38,451 $ 6,007 $ 5,264 $ (5,655)$ 160,401 
Net realized investment results from certain equity
method investments — — (130) — — (130)
Special item related to contractual adjustment for a
former client (204) — — — — (204)
Adjusted revenues $ 116,130 $ 38,451 $ 5,877 $ 5,264 $ (5,655)$ 160,067 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,248 $ 426 $ 68 $ 35 $ 25 $ 2,802 
Income (loss) before taxes $ 3,684 $ 3,956 $ 1,048 $ 4,514 $ (2,334)$ 10,868 
Pre-tax adjustments to reconcile to adjusted income from operations
(Income) attributable to noncontrolling interests (17) — (20) — — (37)
Net realized investment (gains) losses (17) (77) (161) (24) — (279)
Amortization of acquired intangible assets 1,917 29 33 3 — 1,982 
Special items
Integration and transaction-related costs — — — — 527 527 
Debt extinguishment costs — — — — 199 199 
Charge for organizational efficiency plan — — — — 31 31 
Charges associated with litigation matters — — — — 25 25 
Risk corridors recovery — (101) — — — (101)
Contractual adjustment for a former client (204) — — — — (204)
(Gain) on sale of business — — — (4,203) — (4,203)
Pre-tax adjusted income (loss) from operations $ 5,363 $ 3,807 $ 900 $ 290 $ (1,552)$ 8,808 
(In millions) Evernorth U.S. MedicalInternational
MarketsGroup
Disability and
OtherCorporate and
Eliminations Total
2019
Revenues from external customers $ 107,354 $ 34,861 $ 5,500 $ 4,461 $ — $ 152,176 
Inter-segment revenues 2,380 1,180 — 26 (3,586)
Net investment income (loss) 60 478 159 695 (2) 1,390 
Total revenues $ 109,794 $ 36,519 $ 5,659 $ 5,182 $ (3,588)$ 153,566 
Revenue contribution from transitioning clients (13,347) — — — — (13,347)
Net realized investment results from certain equity
method investments — — (44) — — (44)
Adjusted revenues $ 96,447 $ 36,519 $ 5,615 $ 5,182 $ (3,588)$ 140,175 
Depreciation and amortization $ 3,071 $ 449 $ 87 $ 41 $ 3 $ 3,651 
Income (loss) before taxes $ 3,983 $ 3,904 $ 785 $ 562 $ (2,664)$ 6,570 
Pre-tax adjustments to reconcile to adjusted income from operations
Adjustment for transitioning clients (1,726) — — — — (1,726)
(Income) attributable to noncontrolling interests (4) — (16) — — (20)
Net realized investment (gains) losses — (112) (43) (66) — (221)
Amortization of acquired intangible assets 2,839 69 36 5 — 2,949 
Special items
Integration and transaction-related costs — — — — 552 552 
Charge for organizational efficiency plan — — — — 207 207 
Charges associated with litigation matters — (30) — — 81 51 
Pre-tax adjusted income (loss) from operations $ 5,092 $ 3,831 $ 762 $ 501 $ (1,824)$ 8,362 
(1)Includes the Company's share of certain realized investment gains (losses) of its joint ventures reported using the equity method of accounting.(1)
(1)
140
(In millions) Evernorth U.S. MedicalInternational
MarketsGroup
Disability and
OtherCorporate and
Eliminations Total
2018
Revenues from external customers $ 5,902 $ 31,759 $ 5,174 $ 4,335 $ — $ 47,170 
Inter-segment revenues 1,154 573 — 14 (1,741)
Net investment income (loss) 9 459 149 712 151 1,480 
Total revenues $ 7,065 $ 32,791 $ 5,323 $ 5,061 $ (1,590)$ 48,650 
Revenue contributions from transitioning clients (459) — — — — (459)
Net realized investment results from certain equity
method investments — — 43 — — 43 
Special items reported in integration and transaction-
related costs — — — — (123) (123)
Adjusted revenues $ 6,606 $ 32,791 $ 5,366 $ 5,061 $ (1,713)$ 48,111 
Depreciation and amortization $ 120 $ 466 $ 55 $ 53 $ 1 $ 695 
Income (loss) before taxes $ 329 $ 3,342 $ 670 $ 497 $ (1,257)$ 3,581 
Pre-tax adjustments to reconcile to adjusted income from operations
Adjustment for transitioning clients (62) — — — — (62)
(Income) attributable to noncontrolling interests — — (14) — — (14)
Net realized investment (gains) losses — 36 61 25 2 124 
Amortization of acquired intangible assets 113 99 18 5 — 235 
Special items
Integration and transaction-related costs — — — — 852 852 
Charges associated with litigation matters — 25 — — — 25 
Charges (benefits) associated with tax reform — — — 2 — 2 
Pre-tax adjusted income (loss) from operations $ 380 $ 3,502 $ 735 $ 529 $ (403)$ 4,743 
(1)Includes the Company's share of certain realized investment gains (losses) of its joint ventures reported using the equity method of accounting.(1)
141
Revenue from external customers includes pharmacy revenues, premiums and fees and other revenues. The following table presents
these revenues by product, premium and service type for the years ended December 31:
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
Products (Pharmacy revenues) (ASC 606)
Network revenues $ 53,574 $ 50,431 $ 1,415 
Home delivery and specialty revenues 48,792 47,768 3,997 
Other 5,403 4,900 67 
Total pharmacy revenues $ 107,769 $ 103,099 $ 5,479 
Insurance premiums (ASC 944)
U.S. Medical premiums
U.S. Commercial
Health Insurance 13,389 12,523 10,710 
Stop loss 4,614 4,328 4,008 
Other 1,135 1,040 1,038 
U.S. Government
Medicare Advantage 7,565 6,314 5,832 
Medicare Part D 1,593 1,699 764 
Other 4,301 4,185 4,496 
Total U.S. Medical premiums 32,597 30,089 26,848 
International Markets premiums 5,511 5,266 5,043 
Domestic disability, life and accident premiums 4,423 4,225 4,000 
Other premiums 96 134 222 
Total premiums 42,627 39,714 36,113 
Services (ASC 606)
Fees 8,532 9,229 5,558 
Other external revenues 229 134 20 
Total services 8,761 9,363 5,578 
Total revenues from external customers $ 159,157 $ 152,176 $ 47,170 
Foreign and U.S. revenues from external customers for the three years ended December 31 are shown below. The Company’s foreign
revenues are generated by its foreign operating entities. In the periods shown, no foreign country contributed more than 5% of
consolidated revenues from external customers.
(In millions) 2020 2019 2018
United States $ 154,042 $ 147,332 $ 42,773 
South Korea 2,123 2,022 2,093 
All other foreign countries 2,992 2,822 2,304 
Total $ 159,157 $ 152,176 $ 47,170 
Revenues from U.S. Federal Government agencies, under a number of contracts, were 15% of consolidated revenues in 2020, 14% in
2019 and 16% in 2018.
142
Item 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
Item 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
A.Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Based on an evaluation of the effectiveness of Cigna’s disclosure controls and procedures conducted under the supervision and with
the participation of Cigna’s management (including Cigna’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer), Cigna's Chief
Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that, as of the end of the period covered by this report, Cigna’s disclosure
controls and procedures are effective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by Cigna in the reports that it files or
submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the Securities
and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms and is accumulated and communicated to Cigna’s management, including Cigna’s
Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
B.Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Management of Cigna Corporation is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal controls over financial
reporting. The Company’s internal controls were designed to provide reasonable assurance that the Company’s consolidated
published financial statements for external purposes were prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in
the United States. The Company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that:
(i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and
dispositions of the assets of the Company;
(ii)provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in
accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States, and that receipts and expenditures of the
Company are being made only in accordance with authorization of management and directors of the Company; and
(iii)provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisitions, use or disposition of
the Company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Management assessed the effectiveness of the Company’s internal controls over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020. In
making this assessment, management used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (“COSO”) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on management’s assessment and the criteria set
forth by COSO, it was determined that the Company’s internal controls over financial reporting are effective as of December 31,
2020.
The Company’s independent registered public accounting firm, PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, has audited the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting, as stated in their report located in Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Change in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
There have been no changes in our internal control over financial reporting during the quarter ended December 31, 2020 that have
materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, Cigna's internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
 None.
143
PART III
Item 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
A.Directors of the Registrant
The information under the captions “Corporate Governance Matters – Board of Directors’ Nominees” and “– Board Meetings and
Committees” (as it relates to Audit Committee disclosure) in Cigna’s definitive proxy statement related to the 2021 annual meeting
of shareholders is incorporated herein by reference.
B.Executive Officers of the Registrant
See PART I – “Information about our Executive Officers” in this Form 10-K.
C.Code of Ethics and Other Corporate Governance Disclosures
The information under the caption “Corporate Governance Matters – Codes of Ethics” in Cigna’s definitive proxy statement related
to the 2021 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated herein by reference. We intend to promptly disclose on our website, in
accordance with applicable rules, any required disclosure of changes to or waivers, if any, of our Code of Ethics or our Director Code
of Business Conduct and Ethics.
D.Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports
The information under the caption “Ownership of Cigna Common Stock – Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports”, if included in Cigna’s
definitive proxy statement related to the 2021 annual meeting of shareholders, is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
The information under the captions “Corporate Governance Matters – Non-Employee Director Compensation,” “Certain
Transactions – Compensation Committee Interlocks and Inside Participation,” “Compensation Matters – Compensation Discussion
and Analysis,” “– Report of the People Resources Committee” and “– Executive Compensation Tables” in Cigna’s definitive proxy
statement related to the 2021 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated herein by reference.
144
Item 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
The following table presents information regarding Cigna’s equity compensation plans as of December 31, 2020:
 (a) (b) (c)
Plan CategorySecurities To Be Issued
Upon Exercise Of
Outstanding Options,
Warrants And RightsWeighted Average
Exercise Price Of
Outstanding Options,
Warrants And RightsSecurities Remaining
Available For Future
Issuance Under Equity
Compensation Plans
(Excluding Securities
Reflected In Column (a))
Equity Compensation Plans Approved by Security Holders 11,725,097 $ 152.40 23,618,311 
Equity Compensation Plans Not Approved by Security Holders — — — 
Total 11,725,097 $ 152.40 23,618,311 
(1)Includes, in addition to outstanding stock options:
(i) 82,426 restricted stock units, 122,887 deferred shares and 1,615,392 strategic performance shares that are reported at the maximum 200% payout rate granted
under the Cigna Long-Term Incentive Plan, the Corporation Stock Plan and the Cigna Corporation Director Equity Plan; and
(ii) 637,546 shares of common stock underlying stock option awards and 153,959 restricted stock units granted under the Express Scripts Holding Company 2016
Long-Term Incentive Plan, 5,728 deferred shares granted under the Express Scripts, Inc. Executive Deferred Compensation Plan of 2005, 1,327,353 shares of
common stock underlying stock option awards granted under the Express Scripts, Inc. 2011 Long-Term Incentive Plan, 1,091,220 shares of common stock
underlying stock option awards and 3,300 restricted stock units granted under the Medco Health Solutions, Inc. 2002 Stock Incentive Plan, and 43,737 shares of
common stock underlying stock option awards granted under the Accredo Health, Incorporated 2002 Long-Term Incentive Plan that were all approved by the
applicable company’s shareholders before Cigna’s acquisition of Express Scripts in December 2018.
(2)The weighted-average exercise price is based only on outstanding stock options. The outstanding stock options assumed due to Cigna's acquisition of Express
Scripts, in aggregate, have a weighted-average exercise price of $143.21. Excluding the assumed options from this acquisition results in a weighted-average
exercise price of $156.69.
(3)Includes 213,471 shares of common stock available as of the close of business December 31, 2020 for future issuance under the Cigna Corporation Director
Equity Plan, 20,591,667 shares of common stock available as of the close of business on December 31, 2020 for future issuance under the Cigna Long-Term
Incentive Plan that includes 10,728,281 shares of common stock available assumed from the Express Scripts, Inc. 2016 Long-Term Incentive Plan, and 2,813,173
shares of common stock available as of the close of business December 31, 2020 for future issuance under the Express Scripts, Inc. Executive Deferred
Compensation Plan of 2005. Because no further grants may be made under the Express Scripts, Inc. 2011 Long-Term Incentive Plan, the Medco Health Solutions,
Inc. 2002 Stock Incentive Plan and the Accredo Health, Incorporated 2002 Long-Term Incentive Plan, shares available for issuance under these plans are not
included.
The information under the captions “Ownership of Cigna Common Stock – Stock Held by Directors, Nominees and Executive
Officers” and “Ownership of Cigna Common Stock – Stock Held by Certain Beneficial Owners” in Cigna’s definitive proxy
statement related to the 2021 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
The information under the captions “Corporate Governance Matters – Director Independence” and “– Certain Transactions” in
Cigna’s definitive proxy statement related to the 2021 annual meeting of shareholders is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
The information under the captions “Audit Matters – Policy for the Pre-Approval of Audit and Non-Audit Services” and “– Fees to
Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” in Cigna’s definitive proxy statement related to the 2021 annual meeting of
shareholders is incorporated herein by reference.(1) (2) (3)
145
PART IV
Item 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)(1) The following Financial Statements can be found under Part II Item 8 of this Form 10-K:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Total Equity for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
(2)The financial statement schedules listed in the Index to Financial Statement Schedules on page FS-1 which list is
incorporated herein.
(3)Set forth in this Item 15 is a list of exhibits filed or incorporated by reference as part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(b)The exhibits listed in the accompanying “Index to Exhibits” in this Item 15 are filed or incorporated by reference as part of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(c)The financial statement schedules listed in the Index to Financial Statement Schedules on page FS-1 are filed as part of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
146
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
Number Description Method of Filing
2.1(a) Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of March 8, 2018, by and
among Cigna Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.),
Express Scripts Holding Company, Cigna Holding Company
(formerly Cigna Corporation), Halfmoon I, Inc. and Halfmoon II,
Inc.Filed by Cigna Holding Company (“CHC”) as
Exhibit 2.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-
K on March 13, 2018 and incorporated herein
by reference.
2.1(b) Amendment No. 1, dated as of June 27, 2018, to the Agreement and
Plan of Merger, dated as of March 8, 2018, by and among Cigna
Corporation, Express Scripts Holding Company, Cigna Holding
Company, Halfmoon I, Inc. and Halfmoon II, Inc.Filed by CHC as Exhibit 2.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on July 2, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the registrant
as last amended December 20, 2018Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 3.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on December 20,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of the registrant as last amended
February 26, 2020.Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 3.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on February 27,
2020 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(a) Indenture, dated as of September 17, 2018, between Cigna
Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.) and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trusteeFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on September 21, 2018
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(b) Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 17, 2018, between
Cigna Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.) and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trusteeFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on September 21, 2018
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(c) Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of December 20, 2018, by
and among Express Scripts Holding Company, Cigna Holding
Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as TrusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.7 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on December 20,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(d) Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 11, 2019, by and
among Cigna Corporation, as the Issuer, Cigna Holding Company
and Express Scripts Holding Company, each as guarantors, and U.S.
Bank, National Association, as trusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on October 11,
2019 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.1(e) Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 16, 2020,
between Cigna Corporation and U.S. Bank, National Association, as
trusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on March 16,
2020 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.2 Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of October 11, 2019, by
and among Cigna Corporation, as the Issuer, Cigna Holding
Company and Express Scripts Holding Company, each as
guarantors, and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Deutsche Bank
Securities Inc., and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, each as dealer
managersFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.2 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on October 11,
2019 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(a) Senior Indenture dated August 16, 2006 between Cigna Holding
Company (formerly Cigna Corporation) and U.S. Bank National
AssociationFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.1(a) to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2012 and incorporated herein
by reference.
4.3(b) Supplemental Indenture No. 1 dated November 10, 2006 between
Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank National AssociationFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.1(b) to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2012 and incorporated herein
by reference.
4.3(c) Supplemental Indenture No. 2 dated March 15, 2007 between Cigna
Holding Company and U.S. Bank National Association
 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 4.1(c) to the
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarterly period ended March 31, 2011 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(d) Supplemental Indenture No. 3 dated March 7, 2008 between Cigna
Holding Company and U.S. Bank National AssociationFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on March 10, 2008 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(e) Supplemental Indenture No. 5 dated May 17, 2010 between Cigna
Holding Company and U.S. Bank National AssociationFiled by CHC as Exhibit 99.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on May 28, 2010 and
incorporated herein by reference.
147
4.3(f) Supplemental Indenture No. 6 dated December 8, 2010 between
Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank National AssociationFiled by CHC as Exhibit 99.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on December 9, 2010
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(g) Supplemental Indenture No. 7 dated March 7, 2011 between Cigna
Holding Company and U.S. Bank National AssociationFiled by CHC as Exhibit 99.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on March 8, 2011 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(h) Supplemental Indenture No. 8 dated November 10, 2011 between
Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank National AssociationFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on November 14, 2011
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(i) Supplemental Indenture No. 9 dated as of March 20, 2015, between
Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as
trusteeFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on March 26, 2015 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(j) Supplemental Indenture No. 10 dated as of September 14, 2017
between Cigna Holding Company and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trusteeFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K filed September 14, 2017
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(k) Supplemental Indenture No. 11 dated as of December 20, 2018, by
and among Cigna Corporation, Cigna Holding Company and U.S.
Bank National Association, as trusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on December 20,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.3(l) Supplemental Indenture No. 12, dated as of October 11, 2019,
among Cigna Holding Company, as Issuer, Cigna Corporation, as
parent guarantor, and U.S. Bank National Association, as trusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.3 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on October 11,
2019 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.4(a) Indenture dated January 1, 1994 between Cigna Holding Company
(formerly Cigna Corporation ) and Marine Midland BankFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.2 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
4.4(b) Supplemental Indenture No. 1 dated as of December 20, 2018, by
and among Cigna Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.),
Cigna Holding Company and HSBC Bank USA, National
Association (as successor to Marine Midland Bank, N.A.), as
TrusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.2 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on December 20,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.4(c) Supplemental Indenture No. 2, dated as of October 11, 2019, among
Cigna Holding Company, as Issuer, Cigna Corporation, as parent
guarantor, and HSBC Bank USA, National Association, as trusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.4 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on October 11,
2019 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.5(a) Indenture dated June 30, 1988 between Cigna Holding Company
(formerly Cigna Corporation) and Bankers Trust CompanyFiled by CHC as Exhibit 4.3 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
4.5(b) Supplemental Indenture No. 1 dated as of December 20, 2018, by
and among Cigna Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.),
Cigna Holding Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company
Americas, a New York banking corporation (as successor to
Bankers Trust Company), as TrusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.3 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on December 20,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(a) Indenture, dated as of November 21, 2011, among Express Scripts,
Inc., Express Scripts Holding Company (formerly Aristotle
Holding, Inc.), the other subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding
Company party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as TrusteeFiled by Express Scripts, Inc. (“ESI”) as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-
K filed November 25, 2011 and incorporated
herein by reference.
4.6(b) Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 21, 2011,
among Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts Holding Company, the
other subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESI as Exhibit 4.4 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on November 25, 2011
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(c) Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 21, 2011,
among Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts Holding Company, the
other subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESI as Exhibit 4.5 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on November 25, 2011
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(d) Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 9, 2012,
among Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts Holding Company, the
other subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee,
related to Express Scripts Holding Company’s 3.900% senior notes
due 2022Filed by ESI as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K filed February 10, 2012
and incorporated herein by reference.
148
4.6(e) Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 2, 2012, among
Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts Holding Company, Medco
Health Solutions, Inc., the other subsidiaries of Express Scripts
Holding Company party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as TrusteeFiled by Express Scripts Holding Company
(“ESRX”) as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report
on Form 8-K on April 6, 2012 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(f) Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 5, 2014, among
Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on June 5, 2014 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(g) Twelfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 5, 2014, among
Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on June 5, 2014 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(h) Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 5, 2014, among
Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on June 5, 2014 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(i) Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 25, 2016,
among Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary
Guarantors party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on February 25, 2016
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(j) Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 25, 2016,
among Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary
Guarantors party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on February 25, 2016
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(k) Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 5, 2016, among
Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on July 5, 2016 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(l) Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 5, 2016,
among Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary
Guarantors party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on July 5, 2016 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(m) Twentieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 5, 2016, among
Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors party
thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on July 5, 2016 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(n) Twenty-Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 30,
2017, among Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary
Guarantors party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on November 30, 2017
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(o) Twenty-Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 30,
2017, among Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary
Guarantors party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Trustee and Calculation AgentFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on November 30, 2017
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(p) Twenty-Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 30,
2017, among Express Scripts Holding Company, the Subsidiary
Guarantors party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.3 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on November 30, 2017
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(q) Twenty-Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of December 20,
2018, by and among Cigna Corporation, Express Scripts Holding
Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as TrusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.4 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on December 20,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.6(r) Twenty-Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 11,
2019, among Express Scripts Holding Company, as Issuer, Cigna
Corporation, as parent guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.5 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on October 11,
2019 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.7(a) Indenture, dated as of June 9, 2009, among Express Scripts, Inc., the
Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto and Union Bank, N.A., as
TrusteeFiled by ESI as Exhibit 4.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on June 10, 2009 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.7(b) Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 9, 2009, among
Express Scripts, Inc., the Subsidiary Guarantors party thereto and
Union Bank, N.A., as TrusteeFiled by ESI as Exhibit 4.4 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on June 10, 2009 and
incorporated herein by reference.
149
4.7(c) Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 21, 2011,
among Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts Holding Company, the
other subsidiaries of Express Scripts Holding Company party
thereto and Union Bank, N.A., as TrusteeFiled by ESI as Exhibit 4.6 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on November 25, 2011
and incorporated herein by reference.
4.7(d) Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 2, 2012, among
Express Scripts, Inc., Express Scripts Holding Company, Medco
Health Solutions, Inc., the other subsidiaries of Express Scripts
Holding Company party thereto and Union Bank, N.A., as TrusteeFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 4.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on April 6, 2012 and
incorporated herein by reference.
4.7(e) Ninth Supplemental Indenture dated as of December 20, 2018, by
and among Cigna Corporation (formerly Halfmoon Parent, Inc.),
Express Scripts, Inc. and MUFG Union Bank, N.A. (as successor to
Union Bank, N.A.), as TrusteeFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 4.5 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on December 20,
2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
4.8 Description of Securities Filed herewith
Exhibits 10.1 through 10.37 are identified as compensatory plans, management contracts or arrangements pursuant to Item 15 of
Form 10-K.
10.1(a) Cigna Long-Term Incentive Plan as amended and restated effective
as of April 26, 2017 (the “Cigna LTIP”)Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on May 1, 2017
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.1(b) Amendment No. 1, effective January 25, 2018, to the Cigna LTIP Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.3 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period
ended March 31, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.1(c) Form of Cigna LTIP: Nonqualified Stock Option and Grant LetterFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.21 to Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2011 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.1(d) Form of Cigna LTIP: Nonqualified Stock Option Grant AgreementFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q
for the period ended March 31, 2014 and
incorporated herein by
10.1(e) Form of Cigna LTIP: Nonqualified Stock Option Grant AgreementFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.3 to Form 10-Q
for the period ended March 31, 2015 and
incorporated herein by
10.1(f) Form of Cigna LTIP: Nonqualified Stock Option Grant AgreementFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.3 to Form 10-Q
for the period ended March 31, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.1(g) Form of Cigna LTIP: Strategic Performance Share Grant AgreementFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.4 to Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended
March 31, 2018 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.1(h) Form of Cigna LTIP: Restricted Stock Grant Agreement Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.6 to Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended
March 31, 2018 and incorporated herein by
reference
10.1(i) Form of Cigna LTIP: Nonqualified Stock Option Grant AgreementFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.5 to Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended
March 31, 2018 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.1(j) Form of Cigna LTIP: Strategic Performance Share Grant AgreementFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 10.1 to
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2019 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.1(k) Form of Cigna LTIP: Nonqualified Stock Option Grant Agreement
 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.2 to
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2019 and incorporated
herein by reference.
150
10.1(l) Form of Cigna LTIP: Restricted Stock Grant Agreement Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.3 to
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2019 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.1(m) Form of Cigna LTIP: Strategic Performance Share Grant AgreementFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 10.1 to
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2020 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.1(n) Form of Cigna LTIP: Nonqualified Stock Option Grant AgreementFiled by the registrant as Exhibit 10.2 to
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2020 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.1(o) Form of Cigna LTIP: Restricted Stock Grant Agreement Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.3 to
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2020 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.1(p) Form of Cigna LTIP: Covenant Agreement Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.5 to
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2020 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.2 Cigna Corporation Stock Plan, as amended through July 2000 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.7 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.3 Cigna Stock Unit Plan, as amended and restated effective February
22, 2017Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.5 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period
ended March 31, 2017 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.4(a) Express Scripts Holding Company 2016 Long-Term Incentive Plan
(the “ESRX LTIP”)
 Filed by ESRX as Appendix A to ESRX’s
Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A
for its 2016 Annual Meeting of Stockholders,
filed March 21, 2016 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.4(b) Form of Stock Option Grant Notice for Non-Employee Directors
used with respect to grants of stock options by Express Scripts
Holding Company to non-employee directors under the ESRX LTIPFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 10.4 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.4(c) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Grant Notice used with respect to
grants of restricted stock units by Express Scripts Holding Company
under the ESRX LTIPFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 10.5 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.4(d) Form of Stock Option Grant Notice used with respect to grants of
stock options by Express Scripts Holding Company under the
ESRX LTIPFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 10.7 to Current
Report on Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.5(a) Express Scripts, Inc. 2011 Long-Term Incentive Plan (as amended
and restated effective April 2, 2012) (the “ESI LTIP”)Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.10 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.5(b) Form of Stock Option Grant Notice for Non-Employee Directors
used with respect to grants of stock options by Express Scripts
Holding Company under the ESI LTIPFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 10.6 to Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2012 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.5(c) Form of Stock Option Grant Notice used with respect to certain
grants of stock options by Express Scripts Holding Company prior
to 2013 under the ESI LTIPFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 10.14 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on April 2, 2012
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.5(d) Form of Stock Option Grant Notice used with respect to grants of
stock options by Express Scripts Holding Company under the ESI
LTIPFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 10.1 to the
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2013 and
incorporated herein by reference.
151
10.6(a) Medco Health Solutions, Inc. 2002 Stock Incentive Plan (as
amended and restated effective April 2, 2012).Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.11 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.6(b) Form of terms and conditions for director stock option and
restricted stock unit awardsFiled by Medco as Exhibit 10.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on February 8, 2005 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.7 Accredo Health, Incorporated 2002 Long-Term Incentive Plan Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.12 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.8 Deferred Compensation Plan for Directors of Cigna Corporation, as
amended and restated January 1, 1997
 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2011 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.9 Cigna Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated
October 24, 2001
 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.14 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2011 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.10 Cigna Deferred Compensation Plan of 2005 effective as of January
1, 2005Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.6 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.11 Express Scripts, Inc. Amended and Restated Executive Deferred
Compensation Plan (effective December 31, 2004 and
grandfathered for the purposes of Section 409A of the Code)Filed by ESI as Exhibit No. 10.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on May 25, 2007
and incorporated herein by reference.
10.12(a) Express Scripts, Inc. Executive Deferred Compensation Plan of
2005 (as amended and restated effective December 20, 2018)Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.13 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.12(b) Amendment No. 1 to the Express Scripts, Inc. Executive Deferred
Compensation Plan of 2005Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.12(b) to
the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2019 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.13(a) Cigna Supplemental Pension Plan as amended and restated effective
August 1, 1998Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.15(a) to the
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2009 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.13(b) Amendment No. 1 to the Cigna Supplemental Pension Plan,
amended and restated effective as of September 1, 1999Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.15(b) to the
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2009 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.13(c) Amendment No. 2 dated December 6, 2000 to the Cigna
Supplemental PensionFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.16(c) to the
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2011 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.14(a) Cigna Supplemental Pension Plan of 2005 effective as of January 1,
2005Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.15 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2007 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.14(b) Amendment No. 1 to the Cigna Supplemental Pension Plan of 2005Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period
ended June 30, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.15(a) Cigna Supplemental 401(k) Plan effective January 1, 2010 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.7 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
152
10.15(b) Amendment No. 1 to the Cigna Supplemental 401(k) Plan Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.15(b) to
the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2019 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.15(c) Amendment No. 2 to the Cigna Supplemental 401(k) Plan Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.15(c) to
the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2019 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.15(d) Amendment No. 3 to the Cigna Supplemental 401(k) Plan Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.15(d) to
the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2019 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.16 Cigna Corporation Non-Employee Director Compensation Program
amended and restated effective February 26, 2014
 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period
ended March 31, 2014 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.17 Cigna Corporation Non-Employee Director Compensation Program,
amended and restated effective January 1, 2019
 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.18 to the
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.18 Cigna Corporation Director Equity Plan, as amended December 4,
2020Filed herewith.
10.19 Cigna Restricted Share Equivalent Plan for Non-Employee
Directors as amended and restated effective January 1, 2008Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.4 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2012 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.20 Deferred Compensation Plan of 2005 for Directors of Cigna
Corporation, Amended and Restated effective April 28, 2010Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 4.8 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-8 (No. 333-
228930) on December 20, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.21 Form of Indemnification Agreement with Express Scripts Holding
Company’s executive officers and former members of the Express
Scripts Holding Company’s board of directorsFiled by ESRX as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on March 5, 2014 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.22 Cigna Executive Severance Benefits Plan as amended and restated
effective December 21, 2020Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.1 to the
Current Report on Form 8-K on October 30,
2020 and incorporated herein by reference.
10.23 Description of Severance Benefits for Executives in Non-Change of
Control Circumstances
 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.10 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.24 Cigna Executive Incentive Plan amended and restated as of January
1, 2012Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period
ended March 31, 2012 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.25 Description of Cigna Corporation Financial Services Program Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.18 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.26 Offer Letter for Eric P. Palmer dated June 16, 2017 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on June 19, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.27 Nicole Jones’ Offer of Employment dated April 27, 2011 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.2 to the Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended
March 31, 2012 and incorporated herein by
reference.
153
10.28 Employment Agreement for Jason D. Sadler dated May 7, 2010 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1(a) to the
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2015 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.29 Promotion letter for Jason Sadler dated June 2, 2014 Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1(b) to the
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period
ended March 31, 2015 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.30 Retention Agreement by and between Cigna Corporation and Mr.
Timothy Wentworth, dated as of May 12, 2018.
 Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.1 to
Amendment No. 1 to the Registration
Statement on Form S-4 (No. 333-224960) on
June 20, 2018 and incorporated herein by
reference.
10.31 Express Scripts Holding Company Executive Employment
Agreement with Timothy Wentworth dated May 4, 2016Filed by ESRX as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on May 4, 2016 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.32 Schedule regarding Amended Deferred Stock Unit Agreements
effective December 31, 2008 with John M. Murabito and Form of
Amended Deferred Stock Unit AgreementFiled by CHC as Exhibit 10.20 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2008 and incorporated herein
by reference.
10.33 Retention Agreement between the Cigna Corporation and Steven B.
Miller dated October 9, 2018Filed by the registrant as Exhibit 10.34 to the
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2018 and incorporated
herein by reference.
10.34 Agreement and Release between the Company and Matthew G.
Manders dated October 16, 2017Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K on October 18, 2017 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.35 Offer letter for Eric Palmer dated December 6, 2020 Filed herewith.
10.36 Offer letter for Matthew Manders dated December 6, 2020 Filed herewith.
10.37 Offer letter for Brian Evanko dated December 6, 2020 Filed herewith.
10.38 Revolving Credit and Letter of Credit Agreement, dated as of April
6, 2018Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.1 to Current
Report on Form 8-K on April 12, 2018 and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.39
 Master Transaction Agreement, dated February 4, 2013 among
Connecticut General Life Insurance Company, Berkshire Hathaway
Life Insurance Company of Nebraska and, solely for purposes of
Sections 3.10, 6.1, 6.3, 6.4, 6.6, 6.9 and Articles II, V, VII and VIII,
thereof, National Indemnity Company (including the Forms of
Retrocession Agreement, the Collateral Trust Agreement, the
Security and Control Agreement, the Surety Policy and the ALC
Model Purchase Option Agreement as exhibits)Filed by CHC as Exhibit 10.29 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2012 and incorporated herein
by reference.
21 Subsidiaries of the Registrant Filed herewith.
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm Filed herewith.
31.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer of Cigna Corporation
pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934Filed herewith.
31.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer of Cigna Corporation
pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934Filed herewith.
32.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer of Cigna Corporation
pursuant to Rule 13a-14(b) or Rule 15d-14(b) and 18 U.S.C. Section
1350Furnished herewith.
32.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer of Cigna Corporation
pursuant to Rule 13a-14(b) or Rule 15d-14(b) and 18 U.S.C. Section
1350Furnished herewith.
154
101 The following materials from Cigna Corporation’s Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020, formatted in
inline XBRL (Extensible Business Reporting Language): (i) the
Consolidated Balance Sheets; (ii) the Consolidated Statements of
Income; (iii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive
Income; (iv) the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows; (v) the
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Total Equity; (vi) the Notes
to Consolidated Financial Statements; and (vii) Financial Statement
Schedules I and II.Filed herewith.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as inline XBRL and
contained in Exhibit 101)Filed herewith.
The agreements and other documents filed as exhibits to this report are not intended to provide factual information or other
disclosure other than the terms of the agreements or other documents themselves, and you should not rely on them for that purpose.
In particular, any representations and warranties made by the Company in these agreements or other documents were made solely
within the specific context of the relevant agreement or document and may not describe the actual state of affairs at the date they
were made or at any other time.
Item 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
155
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 25, 2021
 CIGNA CORPORATION
  
 
 By: /s/ Brian C. Evanko  
 Brian C. Evanko
 Executive Vice President and
Chief Financial Officer
 (Principal Financial Officer)
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons
on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities indicated as of February 25, 2021.
Signature  Title
   
   
/s/ David M. Cordani   
David M. Cordani  Chief Executive Officer and Director
(Principal Executive Officer)
/s/ Brian C. Evanko   
Brian C. Evanko  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)
/s/ Mary T. Agoglia Hoeltzel   
Mary T. Agoglia Hoeltzel  Senior Vice President, Tax and Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer)
/s/ William J. DeLaney   
William J. DeLaney  Director
 
/s/ Eric J. Foss   
Eric J. Foss  Director
/s/ Elder Granger, M.D.   
Elder Granger, M.D.  Director
/s/ Isaiah Harris, Jr.   
Isaiah Harris, Jr.
  Chairman of the Board
 
156
/s/ Kathleen M. Mazzarella   
Kathleen M. Mazzarella  Director
 
 
/s/ Mark McClellan, M.D.   
Mark McClellan, M.D.  Director
 
 
/s/ John M. Partridge   
John M. Partridge  Director
 
 
/s/ William L. Roper, M.D.   
William L. Roper, M.D.  Director
 
 
/s/ Kimberly A. Ross   
Kimberly A. Ross  Director
 
 
/s/ Eric C. Wiseman   
Eric C. Wiseman
  Director
 
 
/s/ Donna F. Zarcone   
Donna F. Zarcone
  Director
 
 
157
CIGNA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
INDEX TO FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
   PAGE
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on Financial Statement Schedules FS-2
    
Schedules  
 I Condensed Financial Information of Cigna Corporation (Registrant) FS-3
  Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 FS-3
  Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 FS-4
  Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 FS-5
  Notes to Condensed Financial Statements FS-6
 II Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for the Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 FS-8
Schedules other than those listed above are omitted because they are not required or are not applicable, or the required information is
shown in the financial statements or notes thereto.
FS-1
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on
Financial Statement Schedules
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Cigna Corporation
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements referred to in our report dated February 25, 2021 (which report and consolidated
financial statements are included under Item 8 in this Annual Report on Form 10-K) also included an audit of the financial statement
schedules listed on page FS-1 in Item 15 of this Form 10-K. In our opinion, these financial statement schedules present fairly, in all
material respects, the information set forth therein when read in conjunction with the related consolidated financial statements.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Hartford, Connecticut
February 25, 2021
FS-2
CIGNA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE I
CONDENSED FINANCIAL INFORMATION OF CIGNA CORPORATION
(REGISTRANT)
STATEMENTS OF INCOME
 For the years ended
 December 31,
 Cigna Cigna Cigna
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Revenues
Net investment income $ 1 $ — $ 123 
Intercompany interest income 475 6 — 
Total revenues 476 6 123 
Operating expenses
Selling, general and administrative expenses 4 (85) 200 
Total operating expenses 4 (85) 200 
Income (loss) from operations 472 91 (77)
Interest and other (expense) (1,324) (1,032) (244)
Intercompany interest (expense) (48) (127) (5)
Debt extinguishment costs (171) — — 
Realized investment (loss) — — (1)
Loss before taxes (1,071) (1,068) (327)
Income tax (benefit) (234) (251) (74)
Loss of Parent Company (837) (817) (253)
Equity in income of subsidiaries 9,295 5,921 2,890 
Shareholders' net income 8,458 5,104 2,637 
Shareholders' other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax
Net unrealized appreciation (depreciation) on securities and derivatives (75) 957 (365)
Net translation (losses) gains of foreign currencies 260 (54) (152)
Postretirement benefits liability adjustment (105) (133) 127 
Shareholders' other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 80 770 (390)
Shareholders' comprehensive income $ 8,538 $ 5,874 $ 2,247 
 See Notes to Financial Statements on the following pages.
FS-3
CIGNA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE I
CONDENSED FINANCIAL INFORMATION OF CIGNA CORPORATION
(REGISTRANT)
BALANCE SHEETS
 As of December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019
Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 4,157 $ — 
Short-term investments 49 30 
Other current assets 4 4 
Total current assets 4,210 34 
Intercompany receivable 1,666 4,111 
Investments in subsidiaries 76,040 77,380 
Other noncurrent assets 22 19 
TOTAL ASSETS $ 81,938 $ 81,544 
Liabilities
Short-term debt $ 3,278 $ 4,043 
Other current liabilities 616 457 
Total current liabilities 3,894 4,500 
Intercompany payable 5 2,341 
Long-term debt 27,718 29,365 
TOTAL LIABILITIES 31,617 36,206 
Shareholders’ Equity
Common stock (shares issued, 390 and 386; authorized, 600) 4 4 
Additional paid-in capital 28,975 28,306 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (861) (941)
Retained earnings 28,575 20,162 
Less treasury stock, at cost (6,372) (2,193)
TOTAL SHAREHOLDERS’ EQUITY 50,321 45,338 
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND SHAREHOLDERS’ EQUITY $ 81,938 $ 81,544 
See Notes to Financial Statements on the following pages.
FS-4
CIGNA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE I
CONDENSED FINANCIAL INFORMATION OF CIGNA CORPORATION
(REGISTRANT)
STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
 For the years ended
December 31,
 Cigna Cigna Cigna
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Cash Flows from Operating Activities    
Shareholders’ net income $ 8,458 $ 5,104 $ 2,637 
Adjustments to reconcile shareholders’ net income
to net cash provided by operating activities
Equity in income of subsidiaries (9,295) (5,921) (2,890)
Debt extinguishment costs 171 — — 
Dividends received from subsidiaries 8,627 2,457 — 
Other liabilities 112 43 412 
Other, net 500 20 (14)
NET CASH PROVIDED BY OPERATING ACTIVITIES 8,573 1,703 145 
Cash Flows from Investing Activities
Net change in loans due to (from) affiliates (265) — — 
Short-term investment purchased, net (19) (30) — 
Other, net — — (27,115)
NET CASH (USED IN) INVESTING ACTIVITIES (284) (30) (27,115)
Cash Flows from Financing Activities
Net change in amounts due to affiliates 2,262 2,015 4,437 
Proceeds on issuance of commercial paper 86 944 — 
Payments for debt extinguishment (181) — — 
Repayment of long-term debt (5,996) (3,002) — 
Net proceeds on issuance of long-term debt 3,465 — 22,856 
Issuance of common stock 376 224 1 
Common dividends paid (15) (15) — 
Repurchase of common stock (4,042) (1,987) (32)
Tax withholding on stock compensation and other (87) (82) (49)
Other — (13) — 
NET CASH (USED IN) PROVIDED BY FINANCING ACTIVITIES (4,132) (1,916) 27,213 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents 4,157 (243) 243 
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year — 243 — 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year 4,157 — 243 
See Notes to Financial Statements on the following pages.
FS-5
CIGNA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE I
CONDENSED FINANCIAL INFORMATION OF CIGNA CORPORATION
(REGISTRANT)
NOTES TO CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The accompanying condensed financial statements should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements and the
accompanying notes thereto contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K (“Form 10-K”).
Note 1 — Cigna Holding Company (formerly Cigna Corporation) was incorporated in Delaware in 1981. Halfmoon Parent, Inc. was
incorporated in Delaware in March 2018. Halfmoon Parent, Inc. was renamed Cigna Corporation and Cigna Holding Company
became its subsidiary concurrent with the consummation of the combination with Express Scripts on December 20, 2018.
For purposes of these condensed financial statements, Cigna Corporation’s (the “Company”) wholly-owned and majority-owned
subsidiaries are recorded using the equity method of accounting.
Note 2 — See Note 7 – Debt included in Part II, Item 8 of this Form 10-K for a description of the short-term and long-term debt
obligations of Cigna Corporation and its subsidiaries.
Debt Issuance and Redemption. In order to decrease future interest expense and reduce future refinancing risk, the Company
entered into the following transactions during 2020:
•Debt issuance: On March 16, 2020, the Company issued $3.5 billion of new senior notes. The proceeds of this issuance
were mainly used to pay the consideration for the cash tender and redemption offer as described below. Interest on this debt
is paid semi-annually.
Principal Maturity Date Interest Rate Net Proceeds
$1,500 million March 15, 2030 2.4% $1,491 million
$750 million March 15, 2040 3.2% $743 million
$1,250 million March 15, 2050 3.4% $1,237 million
•Debt tender and redemption: In March and April 2020, the Company completed a tender offer and an optional redemption
totaling $2.9 billion of aggregate principal amount of certain of its outstanding debt securities. The principal amount
repurchased in this tender offer was $1.3 billion. Additionally, $1.6 billion of notes were repurchased via optional
redemption. The Company recorded a pre-tax loss of $171 million ($124 million after-tax), consisting primarily of premium
payments on the tender and optional redemption.
Debt Exchange . In the fourth quarter of 2019, the Company settled an exchange of approximately $12.7 billion of Notes issued by
Express Scripts Holding Company, Medco Health Solutions, Inc. and Cigna Holding Company for privately placed Notes issued by
Cigna with the same interest rates and maturities and comparable other terms. We initiated an exchange offer to register such debt in
the second quarter of 2020 and completed the exchange in July 2020 .
Debt Repayment. In 2020, the Company repaid $6.0 billion of long-term debt, including the $2.9 billion debt tender and redemption
described above. On December 31, 2020 Cigna issued a notice of full redemption to the holders of Cigna’s Senior Floating Rate
Notes due 2021 (the “Notes”) pursuant to which Cigna redeemed the entire $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount of the Notes
outstanding on January 15, 2021 at a redemption price calculated in accordance with the terms and conditions of the indenture
governing the Notes.
Revolving Credit Agreements. Cigna has a revolving credit and letter of credit agreement that matures in April 2023 and is
diversified among 23 banks. Cigna can borrow up to $3.25 billion for general corporate purposes, with up to $500 million available
for issuance of letters of credit. This revolving credit agreement also includes an option to increase the facility amount up to $500
million and an option to extend the termination date for additional one-year periods, subject to consent of the banks.
Additionally, Cigna has a 364-day $1.0 billion revolving credit agreement that will mature in October 2021. The agreement replaces
the $1.0 billion 364-day revolving credit agreement that expired in October 2020. The agreement is diversified among 23 banks.
Pursuant to this revolving credit agreement, Cigna can borrow up to $1.0 billion for general corporate purposes. The agreement
includes the option to “term out” any revolving loans that are outstanding at maturity by converting them into a term loan maturing
on the one year anniversary of conversion.
FS-6
The revolving credit agreements contain customary covenants and restrictions including a financial covenant that the Company’s
leverage ratio may not exceed 60%. As of December 31, 2020, there were no outstanding balances under the revolving credit
agreements.
Term Loan Credit Agreement. On April 1, 2020, the Company borrowed an aggregate principal amount of $1.4 billion under a new
364-Day Term Loan Credit Agreement. In connection with the sale of the Group Life and Disability business, on December 31, 2020
we repaid the entire $1.4 billion balance outstanding.
Commercial Paper. Under our commercial paper program we may issue short-term, unsecured commercial paper notes privately
placed on a discount basis through certain broker dealers at any time not to exceed $4.25 billion. Amounts available under the
program may be borrowed, repaid and re-borrowed from time to time. The net proceeds of issuances have been and are expected to
be used for general corporate purposes. The commercial paper program had approximately $1.0 billion outstanding at December 31,
2020 at an average interest rate of 0.2%.
The Company was in compliance with its debt covenants as of December 31, 2020.
Maturity of the Company’s long-term debt is as follows:
(in millions)  
2021 $ 2,250 
2022 $ 1,378 
2023 $ 3,754 
2024 $ 714 
2025 $ 2,957 
Maturities after 2025 $ 19,182 
Note 3 — Intercompany receivables of the Company consist primarily of net amounts due from Express Scripts Holdings of
$1.4 billion (consisting of an $8.2 billion receivable offset by a $6.8 billion payable) as of December 31, 2020 and $3.9 billion
(consisting of an $8.2 billion receivable offset by a $4.3 billion payable) as of December 31, 2019. Interest income on the receivable
was accrued at an annual fixed rate of 5.50%. Interest expense on the payable was accrued at an average rate of 0.97% in 2020.
Note 4 — The Company had guarantees of approximately $87 million as of December 31, 2020. These guarantees are primarily
related to outstanding letters of credit. In 2020, no payments have been made on these guarantees.
FS-7
CIGNA CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE II
VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS AND RESERVES
(in millions)Balance at
beginning of
yearCharged
(Credited) to
costs and
expensesCharged
(Credited) to
other accountsOther
deductionsBalance at end
of year Description
2020      
Investment asset valuation reserves
Available-for-sale debt securities $ — $ 82 $ — $ (56)$ 26 
Accounts receivable, net $ 252 $ (50)$ (12)$ (34)$ 156 
Deferred tax asset valuation allowance $ 196 $ 10 $ 1 $ — $ 207 
Reinsurance recoverables $ 2 $ (1)$ 31 $ — $ 32 
2019
Accounts receivable, net $ 217 $ 51 $ — $ (16)$ 252 
Deferred tax asset valuation allowance $ 199 $ (6)$ 3 $ — $ 196 
Reinsurance recoverables $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ 2 
2018
Accounts receivable, net $ 207 $ 18 $ (3)$ (5)$ 217 
Deferred tax asset valuation allowance $ 72 $ (5)$ 132 $ — $ 199 
Reinsurance recoverables $ 3 $ (1)$ — $ — $ 2 
(1)The Company recorded an additional allowance of $31 million on January 1, 2020 upon the adoption of ASU 2016-13
(2)Deferred tax valuation allowance amount includes amount assumed from Express Scripts in 2018.(1)
(2)
FS-8
